CHAPTER 27 Issues for the 21st Century
UNIT PROJECT
This unit brings American history to the present day. Use your knowledge of historical eras, the unit's content, and the major characteristics of history to identify the eras in this unit. Then create a webpage that describes the defining characteristics of each era.
Exhibit at the Ellis Island Immigration Museum, design by MetaForm; portraits in flag by Pablo Delano
Photograph © Norman McGrath
Passage to a New ' Century
1968-Present k
*1
k
k
k
k

II

'W M:

	

■■■ ft ;
■

-r r<
■


< ' *
-------<5^

Essential Question
myhiGtebook
What were the political, social, and economic events of the 1970s?
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills (TEKS)
9G, 10A, 10C, 10D, 14B, 17E, 19C, 30C, 31A
SECTION 1:The Nixon Administration Main Idea President Richard M. Nixon tried to steer the country in a conservative direction and away from federal control.
SECTION 2: Watergate: Nixon's Downfall Main Idea President Richard Nixon’s involvement in the Watergate scandal forced him to resign from office.
SECTION 3: The Ford and Carter Years
Main Idea The Ford and Carter administrations attempted to remedy the nation’s worst economic crisis in decades.
SECTION 4: Environmental Activism Main Idea During the 1970s, Americans strengthened their efforts to address the nation’s environmental problems.
Richard Nixon leaves the White House after resigning as president on Friday, August 9,1974.

USA!
world!
|1968i Richard M. Nixon is elected president.
: [19691 Astronaut : Nell Armstrong : becomes the first : person to walk on : the moon.

[1970J America celebrates the first Earth Day.
:	Nixon visits
: China and the : Soviet Union.
11972] Nixon is reelected.
1973! Energy crisis begins, and gasoline prices soar.
: il9?4| Vice President • Gerald R. Ford becomes
: president after the ; Watergate scandal forces : President Nixon to resign.
1969
1970
1971	1972	1973 | j 1974
China gives the U.S. two pandas.
|l972j Terrorists kill eleven Israeli athletes at the XX Olympiad in Munich.
: 1973| War breaks :outTnthe Middle : East when seven : Arab states attack • Israel on Yom Klppur-
792 Chapter 24 An Age of Limits


Nixon and HISTORY Watergate
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
VIDEO
/nyNotebook
INTERACT
The date is August 9,1974. You are serving your country as an honor guard at the White House. As a member of the military, you've always felt patriotic pride in your government. Now the highest officer of that government, President Richard M. Nixon, is stepping down in disgrace. The trust you once placed in your leaders has been broken. As you read the chapter and explore the issues below, use the annotation tools in your eBook to record your thoughts.
Explore the Issues
•	What are some powers granted to the president?
•	What systems exist to protect against abuse of power?
•	How can a president lose or restore the nation's trust?
|l976l President Jimmy
Carter is elected president.
11976 Americans celebrate the nation’s | bicentennial.
1977 The movie | : Saturday Night Fever inspires disco fashion.
: 119791A nuclear power : accident occurs at : Three Mile Island in : Pennsylvania.
1979
1978 Egyptian and Israeli : leaders meet and sign the : Camp David Accords with : President Carter.
[19791 Ayatollah Khomeini seizes power in Iran.
An Age of Limits
nmn ffinn
The Nixon Administration
MAIN IDEA
ir
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
President Richard ML Nixon tried to steer the country in a conservative direction and away from federal control.
American leaders of the early 1970s laid the foundations for the broad conservative base that exists today.
M.
Nixon •	New Federalism
•	revenue sharing
•	Family Assistance Plan (FAP)
•Southern strategy •stagflation
One American's Story
•OPEC (Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries)
• realpolitik •detente •SALT I Treaty
1^3^ hmhsocialstudies.com 1
i
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on Richard’s Nixon’s policies and whether they promoted or slowed change.
In November of 1968, Richard M. Nixon had just been elected president of the United States. He chose Henry Kissinger to be his special adviser on foreign affairs. During Nixon's second term in 1972, as the United States struggled to achieve an acceptable peace in Vietnam, Kissinger reflected on his relationship with Nixon.
A
Personal Voice henry kissinger “ I ... am not at all so sure I could have done what I’ve done with him with another president. ... I don’t know many leaders who would entrust to their aide the task of negotiating with the North Vietnamese, informing only a tiny group of people of the initiative. ” i
! !
—quoted in The New Republic, December 16,1972
President Nixon (right)
Nixon and Kissinger ended America's involvement in Vietnam, but as the war confers with wound down, the nation seemed to enter an era of limits. The economic prosperi- Henry Kissinger, ty that had followed World War II was ending. President Nixon wanted to limit the
federal government to reduce its power and to reverse some of Johnson's liberal
policies. At the same time, he would seek to restore America's prestige and influence
on the world stage—prestige that had been hit hard by the Vietnam experience.
Nixon’s New Conservatism
I !
* t ' ^1
h.
President Richard M. Nixon entered office in 1969 determined to turn America in
a more conservative direction. Toward that end, he tried to instill a sense of order
into a nation still divided over the continuing Vietnam War.
794 Chapter 24

Analyzing
Poll tint I Cartaans'y
“DOMESTIC LIFE”
Pulitzer Prize-winning cartoonist Paul Szep frequently used Nixon as the subject of his cartoons. Although President Nixon focused his domestic policy on dismantling a number of Great Society social programs, his chief interest was foreign policy.
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons
1.	What does the cartoonist suggest about Nixon by showing him leaving with his bags packed?
2.	Whom do the children represent in this cartoon?
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
$ What was the goal of Nixon’s New Federalism?
NEW FEDERALISM
One of the main items on President Nixon's agenda was to decrease the size and influence of the federal government. Nixon believed that Lyndon Johnson's Great Society programs, by promoting greater federal involvement with social problems, had given the federal government too much responsibility. Nixon's plan, known as New Federalism, was to distribute a portion of federal power to state and local governments. A/ To implement this program, Nixon proposed a plan to give more financial freedom to local governments. Normally, the federal government told state and local governments how to spend their federal money. Under revenue sharing, state and local governments could spend their federal dollars however they saw fit within certain limitations. In 1972, the revenue-sharing bill, known as the State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act, became law.
WELFARE REFORM
Nixon was not as successful, however, in his attempt to overhaul welfare, which he believed had grown cumbersome and inefficient. In 1969, the president advocated the so-called Family Assistance Plan (FAP). Under the FAP, every family of four with no outside income would receive a basic federal payment of $1,600 a year, with a provision to earn up to $4,000 a year in supplemental income. Unemployed participants, excluding mothers of preschool children, would have to take job training and accept any reasonable work offered them. Nixon presented the plan in conservative terms—as a program that would reduce the supervisory role of the federal government and make welfare recipients responsible for their own lives. The House approved the plan in 1970. However, when the bill reached the Senate, lawmakers from both parties attacked it. Liberal legislators considered the minimum payments too low and the work requirement too stiff, while conservatives objected to the notion of guaranteed income. The bill went down in defeat.
NEW FEDERALISM WEARS TWO FACES
In the end, Nixon's New Federalism enhanced several key federal programs as it dismantled others. To win backing for
his New Federalism program from a Democrat-controlled Congress, Nixon sup-
ported a number of congressional measures to increase federal spending for some
social programs. Without fanfare, the Nixon administration increased Social
An Age of Limits
Security, Medicare, and Medicaid payments and made food stamps more accessible.
However, the president also worked to dismantle some of the nation's social programs. Throughout his term, Nixon tried unsuccessfully to eliminate the Job Corps program that provided job training for the unemployed and in 1970 he vetoed a bill to provide additional funding for Housing and Urban Development. Confronted by laws that he opposed, Nixon also turned to a little-used presidential practice called impoundment. Nixon impounded, or withheld, necessary funds for programs, thus holding up their implementation. By 1973, it was believed that Nixon had impounded almost $15 billion, affecting more than 100 federal programs, including those for health, housing, and education.
The federal courts eventually ordered the release of the impounded funds. They ruled that presidential impoundment was unconstitutional and that only Congress had the authority to decide how federal funds should be spent. Nixon did use his presidential authority to abolish the Office of Economic Opportunity, a cornerstone of Johnson's antipoverty program, Jj/
LAW AND ORDER POLITICS
As President Nixon fought with both houses of Congress, he also battled the more liberal elements of society, including the antiwar movement. Nixon had been elected in 1968 on a dual promise to end the war in Vietnam and mend the divisiveness within America that the war had created. Throughout his first term, Nixon aggressively moved to fulfill both pledges. The president de-escalated America's involvement in Vietnam and oversaw peace negotiations with North Vietnam. At the same time, he began the 'Taw and order" policies that he had promised his "silent majority"—those middle-class Americans who wanted order restored to a country beset by urban riots and antiwar demonstrations. To accomplish this, Nixon used the full resources of his office—sometimes illegally. Nixon and members of his staff ordered wiretaps of many left-wing individuals and the Democratic Party offices at the Watergate office building in Washington, D.C. The CIA also investigated and compiled documents on thousands of American dissidents—people who objected to the government's policies. The administration even used the Internal Revenue Service to audit the tax returns of antiwar and civil rights activists. Nixon began building a personal "enemies list" of prominent Americans whom the administration would harass.
Nixon also enlisted the help of his combative vice-president, Spiro T. Agnew, to denounce the opposition. The vice-president confronted the antiwar protesters and then turned his scorn on those who controlled the media, whom he viewed as liberal cheerleaders for the antiwar movement. Known for his colorful quotes, Agnew lashed out at the media and liberals as "an effete [weak] corps of impudent snobs" and "nattering nabobs of negativism."
HISTORICAL
spotlight
AMERICANS WALK ON THE MOON
Not all was political war during the Nixon administration. On July 20, 1969, one of America’s long-held dreams became a reality.
Nearly ten years after John F. Kennedy challenged America to put a person on the moon, astronaut Neil Armstrong climbed down the ladder of his lunar module and stepped onto the surface of the moon. “That’s one small step for man,” Armstrong said, “one giant leap for mankind.” Americans swelled with pride and accomplishment as they watched the historic moon landing on their televisions. Speaking to the astronauts from the White House, President Nixon said, “For every American, this has to be the proudest day of our lives.”
Neil Armstrong’s photograph of Buzz Aldrin on the moon
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
In what ways did Nixon both strengthen and weaken federal programs?
Nixon’s Southern Strategy
Even as President Nixon worked to steer the country along a more conservative
course, he had his eyes on the 1972 presidential election. Nixon had won a slim
majority in 1968—less than one percent of the popular vote. As president, he began
796 Chapter 24
J MAIN IDEA
Forming
Generalizations
Q
Why had many Democratic voters in the South become potential Republican supporters by 1968? working to forge a new conservative coalition to build on his support. In one approach, known as the Southern strategy, Nixon tried to attract Southern conservative Democrats. By winning over these voters and other discontented Democrats, the president and his fellow Republicans hoped not only to keep the White House but also to recapture a majority in Congress.
A NEW SOUTH
Since Reconstruction, the South had been a Democratic stronghold. But by 1968 many white Southern Democrats had grown disillusioned with their party. In their eyes, the party—champion of the Great Society and civil rights—had grown too liberal. This conservative backlash first surfaced in the 1968 election, when thousands of Southern Democrats helped former Alabama governor George Wallace, a conservative segregationist running as an independent, carry five Southern states and capture 13 percent of the popular vote. These Southern Democrats were unhappy with federal desegregation policies and a liberal Supreme Court. They formed a Congressional bloc in an effort to block integration and maintain the status quo.
NIXON SLOWS INTEGRATION
To attract white voters in the South, President Nixon decided on a policy of slowing the country's desegregation efforts. In September of 1969, less than a year after being elected president, Nixon made clear his views on civil rights. "There are those who want instant integration and those who want segregation forever. I believe we need to have a middle course between those two extremes," he said. Throughout his first term, President Nixon worked to reverse several civil rights policies. In 1969, he ordered the Department of Health, Education, and Welfare (HEW) to delay desegregation plans for school districts in South Carolina and Mississippi. Nixon's actions violated the Supreme Court's second Brown v. Board of Education ruling—which called for the desegregation of schools "with all deliberate speed." In response to an NAACP suit, the high court ordered Nixon to abide by the second Brown ruling. The president did so reluctantly, and by 1972, nearly 90 percent of children in the South attended desegregated schools—up

from about 20 percent in 1969.
In a further attempt to chip away at civil rights advances, Nixon opposed the extension of the Voting Rights Act of 1965. The act had added nearly one million African Americans to the voting rolls. Despite the president's opposition, Congress voted to extend the act. JJ,
CONTROVERSY OVER BUSING
President Nixon then attempted to yet another civil rights initiative—the integration of schools through busing. In 1971, the Supreme Court ruled in Swann v. Charlotte-Mecklenburg Board of Education that school districts may bus students to other schools to end the pattern of all-black or all-white educational institutions. White students and parents in cities such as Boston and Detroit angrily protested busing. One South Boston mother spoke for other white Northerners, many of whom still struggled with the integration process. mm idea
Analyzing
Motives
Why did
President Nixon oppose the extension of the Voting Rights Act?
A demonstrator in Boston protests court-ordered school busing during the early 1970s.
▼
SPOTLIGHT
HISTORICAL
THE TWENTY-SIXTH AMENDMENT
During President Nixon’s first term, the Twenty-sixth Amendment was ratified in 1971, extending voting rights to Americans 18 years or older. The amendment was one example of efforts in the 1960s and 1970s to expand opportunities to participate in government.
At the time, liberals supported the amendment because they believed that young people were more likely to be liberal. Conservatives opposed it because they didn’t want to extend the vote to more liberals.
Opponents also argued that the amendment would be too expensive for states to administer and that 18-year-olds were not mature enough for the responsibility. Many Americans, however, considered it unfair to be asked to fight and die for their country in Vietnam without being allowed to vote.
Nixon also opposed integration through busing and
went on national television to urge Congress to halt the
practice. While busing continued in some cities, Nixon had
made his position clear to the country—and to the South.
A BATTLE OVER THE SUPREME COURT
During the 1968 campaign, Nixon had criticized the Warren Court for being too liberal. Once in the White House, Nixon suddenly found himself with an opportunity to change the direction of the court. During Nixon's first term, four justices, including chief justice Earl Warren, left the bench through retirement. President Nixon quickly moved to put a more conservative face on the Court. In 1969, the Senate approved Nixon's chief justice appointee, U.S. Court of Appeals judge Warren Burger. Eventually, Nixon placed on the bench three more justices, who tilted the Court in a more conservative direction. However, the newly shaped Court did not always take the conservative route—for example, it handed down the 1971 ruling in favor of racially integrating schools through busing. $
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
Jp What was Nixon’s Southern strategy and how did he implement it?
Confronting a Stagnant Economy
One of the more pressing issues facing Richard Nixon was a
troubled economy. Between 1967 and 1973, the United
States faced high inflation and high unemployment—a sit-
uation economists called stagflation.
THE CAUSES OF STAGFLATION
The economic problems of the late 1960s and early 1970s had several causes. Chief
among them was high inflation—a result of Lyndon
Johnson's policy to fund the war and social programs
through deficit spending. A flood of new workers, includ-
ing women and baby boomers, also led to stagflation. In
addition, the nation's economic woes reflected the dynamic Dependent on relationship between international trade policies and the foreign oil,
U.S. free enterprise system. Increased competition in inter- Americans in national trade as well as the nation's heavy dependency wait in line
for gas during the
oil embargo.
Vocabulary cartel: a bloc of independent business
organizations that controls a service or business
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
$ What factors brought on the country’s economic problems in the late 1960s and early 1970s?
on foreign oil were also contributing factors. During the 1960s, America received much of its petroleum from the oil-producing countries of the Middle East. Many of these countries belonged to a cartel called OPEC (Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries). The United States was dependent on OPEC oil for a significant amount of its large petroleum needs, and that dependence was growing. In 1970, the United States had gotten just over a fifth of its oil from foreign sources. By 1973, that figure had risen to about a third.
During the 1960s, OPEC gradually raised oil prices. Then in 1973, Egypt and Syria started the Yorn Kippur War against Israel. The war—the climax of years of intense border disputes—was short but brutal. The Soviet Union offered supplies to the Egyptians and the Syrians. In turn, the United States sent massive amounts of military aid to Israel, its longtime ally. U.S. officials also worked to broker a cease-fire between the warring nations. Still, Arab oil-producing nations responded by cutting off all oil sales to the United States. When they resumed selling oil to the United States in 1974, the price had quadrupled. This sharp rise in oil prices only worsened the problem of inflation.
NIXON BATTLES STAGFLATION
President Nixon took several steps to combat stagflation, but none met with much success. To reverse deficit spending, Nixon attempted to raise taxes and cut the budget. Congress, however, refused to go along with this plan. In another effort to slow inflation, Nixon tried to reduce the amount of money in circulation by urging that interest rates be raised. This measure did little except drive the country into a mild recession, or an overall slowdown of the economy. In August 1971, the president turned to price and wage controls to stop inflation. He froze workers' wages as well as businesses' prices and fees for 90 days. Inflation eased for a short time, but the recession continued.
Nixon’s Foreign Policy Triumphs
Richard Nixon admittedly preferred world affairs to domestic policy. "I've always thought this country could run itself domestically without a president," he said in 1968. Throughout his presidency, Nixon's top priority was gaining an honorable peace in Vietnam. At the same time, he also made significant advances in America's relationships with China and the Soviet Union.
KISSINGER AND REALPOLITIK
The architect of Nixon's foreign policy was his adviser for national security affairs, Henry Kissinger. Kissinger, who would later become Nixon's secretary of state, promoted a philosophy known as realpolitik, from a German term meaning "political realism." According to realpolitik, foreign policy should be based solely on consideration of power, not ideals or moral principles. Kissinger believed in evaluating a nation's power, not its philosophy or beliefs. If a country was weak, Kissinger argued, it was often more practical to ignore that country, even if it was Communist. Realpolitik marked a departure from the former confrontational policy of containment, which refused to recognize the major Communist countries. On the other hand, Kissinger's philosophy called for the United States to fully confront the powerful nations of the globe. In the world of realpolitik, however, confrontation largely meant negotiation as well as military engagement.
Nixon shared Kissinger's belief in realpolitik, and together the two men adopted a more flexible approach in dealing with Communist nations. They called their policy detente-a policy aimed at easing Cold War tensions. One of the most startling applications of detente came in early 1972 when President Nixon-who had risen in politics as a strong anti-Communist-visited Communist China. 31
main idea
Summarizing
$ What was the
Philosophy of
realpolitik?
An Age of Li
NIXON VISITS CHINA
Since the takeover of mainland China by the Communists in 1949, the United States had not formally recognized the Chinese Communist government. In late 1971, Nixon reversed that policy by announ- <4 President Nixon tours the Great Wail as part of his visit to China in 1972.

i
The hurdles that Richard Nixon overcame to win the presidency in 1968 included his loss in the 1960 presidential race and a 1962 defeat in the race for governor of California.
Nixon faced many obstacles from the start. As a boy, he rose every day at 4 a.m. to help in his father’s grocery store. Nixon also worked as a janitor, a bean picker, and a barker at an amusement park.
The Nixon family suffered great tragedy when one of Nixon’s brothers died from meningitis and another from tuberculosis.
None of these traumatic experiences, however, dulled the future president’s ambition. Nixon finished third in his law class at Duke University, and after serving in World War II, he launched his political career.
After winning a seat in Congress in 1946, Nixon announced, “I had to win. That’s the thing you don’t understand. The important thing is to win.”
cing to the nation that he would visit China "to seek the normalization of relations between the two countries."
By going to China, Nixon was trying, in part, to take advantage of the decade-long rift between China and the Soviet Union. China had long criticized the Soviet Union as being too "soft" in its policies against the West. The two Communist superpowers officially broke ties in 1960. Nixon had thought about exploiting the fractured relationship for several years. "We want to have the Chinese with us when we sit down and negotiate with the Russians," he told a reporter in 1968. Upon his arrival at the Beijing Airport in February, 1972, Nixon recalls his meeting with Chinese premier Zhou En-lai.
A
Personal Voice richard m. nixon “ I knew that Zhou had been deeply insulted by Foster Dulles’s refusal to shake hands with him at the Geneva Conference In 1954. When I reached the bottom step, therefore, I made a point of extending my hand as I walked toward him. When our hands met, one era ended and another began. ” —The Memoirs of Richard Nixon
Besides its enormous symbolic value, Nixon's visit also was a huge success with the American public. Observers noted that it opened up diplomatic and economic relations
with the Chinese and resulted in important agreements between China and the United States. The two nations agreed that neither would try to dominate the Pacific and that both would cooperate in settling disputes peacefully. They also agreed to participate in scientific and cultural exchanges as well as to eventually reunite Taiwan with the mainland, ,H>
NIXON TRAVELS TO MOSCOW
In May 1972, three months after visiting Beijing, President Nixon headed to Moscow—the first U.S. president ever to visit the
j MAIN IDEA j
Analyzing
Effects
ty How did
Nixon’s trip change
the United States’
relationship with
China?
800 Chapter 24
The Soviet Union regularly displayed its military strength in parades. Shown here is an ICBM in a 1965 parade through Moscow’s Red Square.
I
Soviet Union. Like his visit to China, Nixon's trip to the Soviet Union received wide acclaim. After a series of meetings called the Strategic Arms Limitation Talks (SALT), Nixon and Soviet premier Leonid Brezhnev signed the SALT I Treaty. This five-year agreement limited the number of intercontinental ballistic missiles (ICBMs) and submarine-launched missiles to 1972 levels.
The foreign policy triumphs with China and the Soviet Union and the administration's announcement that peace "is at hand" in Vietnam helped reelect Nixon as president in 1972.
But peace in Vietnam proved elusive. The Nixon administration grappled with the war for nearly six more months before withdrawing troops and ending America's involvement in Vietnam. By that time, another issue was about to dominate the Nixon administration—one that would eventually lead to the downfall of the president.


ASSESSMENT
I
J
£
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance
M.
Nixon •Family Assistance Plan •OPEC (Organization of •New Federalism	•Southern strategy	Petroleum Exporting
•revenue sharing	•stagflation	Countries)
•	realpolitik
•	detente •SALT I Treaty
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a two-column chart similar to the one shown, list the policies of Richard Nixon that promoted change and those that slowed it down.
Promoted Change	Slowed Change
Policies:	Policies:
	
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING ISSUES
How did the OPEC oil embargo reflect the dynamic relationship between U.S. trade policies and its free enterprise system?
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
How do Nixon’s efforts to improve relations with China demonstrate his leadership?
5.	SUMMARIZING
How did Southern Democrats seek to maintain the status quo of segregation?
EVALUATING DECISIONS
In your opinion, did Nixon’s policy of detente help solve the country’s major foreign policy problems? Support your answer with evidence from the text. Think About:
•	the definition and origin of detente
•	the effect of detente on U.S. dealings with Communist countries
s
i
An Age of Limits
the effect of detente on the
American public
In what ways do you think Nixon was
most conservative? In what ways
was he least conservative? Explain.
TEKS19C
Watergate: Nixon's Downfall
MAIN IDEA
President Richard Nixon’s involvement in the Watergate scandal forced him to resign from office.
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
The Watergate scandal raised questions of public trust that still affect how the public and media skeptically view politicians.
Terms & Names
R.
Haldeman •John Ehrlichman •John Mitchell •Committee to
Reelect the President •John Sirica •Saturday Night Massacre
One. American's Story
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the Watergate scandal.
On July 25, 1974, Representative Barbara Jordan of Texas, a member of the House Judiciary Committee, along with the other committee members, considered whether to recommend that President Nixon be impeached for "high crimes and misdemeanors." Addressing the room, Jordan cited the Constitution in urging her fellow committee members to investigate whether impeachment was appropriate.
A
Personal Voice Barbara Jordan “ We the people’—it is a very eloquent beginning. But when the Constitution of the United States was completed .. . I was not included in that4We the people’.... But through the process of amendment, interpretation, and court decision,
I have finally been included in 4 We the people’. . .. Today . . . [my] faith in the Constitution is whole. It is complete. It is total. I am not going to sit here and be an idle spectator in the diminution, the subversion, the destruction of the Constitution. . . . Has the President committed offenses . . . which the Constitution will not tolerate? ”
U.S.
Representative Barbara Jordan, 1974. —quoted in Notable Black American Women
The committee eventually voted to recommend the impeachment of Richard Nixon for his role in the Watergate scandal. However, before Congress could take further action against him, the president resigned. Nixon's resignation, the first by a U.S. president, was the climax of a scandal that led to the imprisonment of 25 government officials and caused the most serious constitutional crisis in the United States since the impeachment of Andrew Johnson in 1868.
President Nixon and His White House
The Watergate scandal centered on the Nixon administration's attempt to coZer
up a burglary of the Democratic National Committee (DNC) headquarters at the
Watergate office and apartment complex in Washington, D.C. However the
802 Chapter 24
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
$ What is meant by “imperial presidency"?
Watergate story began long before the actual burglary. Many historians believe that Watergate truly began with the personalities of Richard Nixon and those of his advisers, as well as with the changing role of the presidency.
AN IMPERIAL PRESIDENCY
When Richard Nixon took office, the executive branch—as a result of the Great Depression, World War II, and the Cold War-had become the most powerful branch of government. In his book The Imperial Presidency, the historian Arthur Schlesinger, Jr., argued that by the time Richard Nixon became president, the executive branch had taken on an air of imperial, or supreme, authority. President Nixon settled into this imperial role with ease. Nixon believed, as he told a reporter in 1980, that "a president must not be one of the crowd... . People . . . don't want him to be down there saying, 'Look, I'm the same as you.'" Nixon expanded the power of the presidency with little thought to constitutional checks, as when he impounded funds for federal programs that he opposed, or when he ordered troops to invade Cambodia without congressional approval. A}
THE PRESIDENT’S MEN
As he distanced himself from Congress, Nixon confided in a small and fiercely loyal group of advisers. They included H. R. Haldeman, White House chief of staff; John Ehrlichman, chief domestic adviser; and John Mitchell, Nixon's former attorney general. These men had played key roles in Nixon's 1968 election victory and now helped the president direct White House policy. These men also shared President Nixon's desire for secrecy and the consolidation of power. Critics charged that these men, through their personalities and their attitude toward the presidency, developed a sense that they were somehow above the law. This sense would, in turn, prompt President Nixon and his advisers to cover up their role in Watergate, and fuel the coming scandal.
The Inner Circle
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
§ Why would the Nixon campaign team take such a risky action as breaking into the opposition’s headquarters?
The Drive Toward Reelection
Throughout his political career, Richard Nixon lived with the overwhelming fear of losing elections. By the end of the 1972 reelection campaign, Nixon’s campaign team sought advantages by any means possible, including an attempt to steal information from the DNC headquarters.
A BUNGLED BURGLARY
At 2:30 a.m., June 17, 1972, a guard at the Watergate complex in Washington, D.C., caught five men breaking into the campaign headquarters of the DNC. The burglars planned to photograph documents outlining Democratic Party strategy and to place wiretaps, or "bugs," on the office telephones. The press soon discovered that the group's leader, James McCord, was a former CIA agent He was also a security coordinator for a group known as the Committee to Reelect the President (CRP). John Mitchell, who had resigned as attorney general to run Nixon's reelection campaign, was the CRP's director. HISTORY
VIDEO
John Dean on Nixon's Secrets
An Age of Limits
Just three days after the burglary, H. R. Haldeman noted in his diary Nixon's near obsession with how to respond to the break-in.
A
Personal Voice h. r. haldeman “The President] was concerned about what our counterattack is. . . . He raised it again several times during the day, and it obviously Is bothering him. ... He called at home tonight, saying that he wanted to change the plan for his press conference and have it on Thursday instead of tomorrow, so that It won’t look like he’s reacting to the Democratic break-in thing. ”
—The Haldeman Diaries
HISTORICAL SPOTLIGHT I
fw? 
WOODWARD AND BERNSTEIN
Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein of the Washington Post seemed an unlikely team. Woodward, 29 (at right in the photo above), had graduated from Yale, while the 28-year-old Bernstein was a college dropout.
As the two men dug deeper into the Watergate break-in, a mysterious inside source helped them to uncover the scandal. For more than 30 years the reporters refused to identify their source. Then in June 2005, W. Mark Felt, the No. 2 man at the FBI at the time of Watergate, stepped forward and identified himself as the inside source of the reporters’ information.
While people lauded the two reporters for their dogged determination, some Nixon officials remain bitter toward them.
Woodward defended the reporters’ work, saying, “We tried to do our job and, in fact, if you look at it, our coverage was pretty conservative."
The cover-up quickly began. Workers shredded all incriminating documents in Haldeman's office. The White House, with President Nixon's consent, asked the CIA to urge the FBI to stop its investigations into the burglary on the grounds of national security. In addition, the CRP passed out nearly $450,000 to the Watergate burglars to buy their silence after they were indicted in September of 1972.
Throughout the 1972 campaign, the Watergate burglary generated little interest among the American public and media. Only the Washington Post and two of its reporters, Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein, kept on the story. In a series of articles, the reporters uncovered information that linked numerous members of the administration to the burglary. The White House denied each new Post allegation. Upon learning of an upcoming story that tied him to the burglars, John Mitchell told Bernstein, "That's the most sickening thing I ever heard."
The firm White House response to the charges, and its promises of imminent peace in Vietnam, proved effective in the short term. In November, Nixon was reelected by a landslide over liberal Democrat George S. McGovern. But Nixon's popular support was soon to unravel.
The Cover-Up Unravels
In January 1973, the trial of the Watergate burglars began. The trial's presiding judge, John Sirica, made clear his belief that the men had not acted alone. On March 20, a few days before the burglars were scheduled to be sentenced, James McCord sent a letter to Sirica, in which he indicated that he had lied under oath. He also hinted that powerful members of the Nixon administration had been involved in the break-in.
THE SENATE INVESTIGATES WATERGATE
McCord's revelation of possible White House involvement in the burglary aroused public interest in Watergate. President Nixon moved quickly to stem the growing concern. On April 30, 1973, Nixon dismissed White House counsel John Dean and announced the resignations of Haldeman, Ehrlichman, and Attorney General Richard Kleindienst, who had recently replaced John Mitchell following Mitchell's resignation. The president then went on television and denied any attempt at a cover-up. He announced that he was jj MAIN IDEA
Chronological
Order
What steps did the White House take to cover up its involvement in the Watergate break-in?
804 Chapter 24
appointing a new attorney general, Elliot Richardson, and was authorizing him to appoint a special prosecutor to investigate Watergate. "There can be no whitewash at the White House," Nixon said.
The president s reassurances, however, came too late. In May 1973, the Senate began its own investigation of Watergate. A special committee, chaired by Senator Samuel James Ervin of North Carolina, began to call administration officials to give testimony. Throughout the summer millions of Americans sat by their televisions as the "president's men" testified one after another.
“Divine right went out with the American Revolution and doesn't belong to White House aides. ”
SENATOR SAM ERVIN
MAIN IDEA
Drawing
Conclusions
D)
What was significant about the revelation that Nixon taped his conversations? STARTLING TESTIMONY
John Dean delivered the first bomb. In late June, during more than 30 hours of testimony, Dean provided a startling answer to Senator Howard Baker's repeated question, "What did the president know and when did he know it?" The former White House counsel declared that President Nixon had been deeply involved in the cover-up. Dean referred to one meeting in which he and the president, along with several advisers, discussed strategies for continuing the deceit. The White House strongly denied Dean's charges. The hearings had suddenly reached an impasse as the committee attempted to sort out who was telling the truth. The answer came in July from an unlikely source: presidential aide Alexander Butterfield. Butterfield stunned the committee when he revealed that Nixon had taped virtually all of his presidential conversations. Butterfield later claimed that the taping system was installed "to help Nixon write his memoirs." However, for the Senate committee, the tapes were the key to revealing what Nixon knew and when he knew it.
THE SATURDAY NIGHT MASSACRE
A year-long battle for the "Nixon tapes" followed. Archibald Cox, the special prosecutor whom Elliot Richardson had appointed to investigate the case, took the president to court in October 1973 to obtain the tapes. Nixon refused and ordered Attorney General Richardson to fire Cox. In what became known as the Saturday Night Massacre, Richardson refused the order and resigned. The deputy attorney general also refused the order, and he was fired. Solicitor General Robert Bork finally fired Cox. However, Cox's replacement, Leon Jaworski, proved equally determined to get the tapes. Several months after the "massacre," the House Judiciary Committee began examining the possibility of an impeachment hearing. E;
The entire White House appeared to be under siege. Just days before the Saturday
Night Massacre, Vice President Spiro Agnew had resigned after it was revealed that
he had accepted bribes from engineering firms while governor of Maryland. Agnew
pleaded nolo contendere (no contest) to the charge. Acting under the Twenty-fifth
▲
The Watergate hearings were chaired by Senator Sam Ervin, shown (top left) with Sam Dash, chief counsel to the Senate Watergate Committee. John Dean’s testimony (above) stunned the nation.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
What events
led to the
Saturday Night
Massacre?
An Age of Limits
Amendment, Nixon nominated the House minority leader, Gerald R. Ford, as his new vice-president. Congress quickly confirmed the nomination.
The Fall of a President
In March 1974, a grand jury indicted seven presidential aides on charges of conspiracy, obstruction of justice, and perjury. The investigation was closing in on the president of the United States.
▲
The original Nixon White House tape recorder and tape from the 1970s.
NIXON RELEASES THE TAPES
In the spring of 1974, President Nixon told a television audience that he was releasing 1,254 pages of edited transcripts of White House conversations about Watergate. Nixon's offering failed to satisfy investigators, who demanded the unedited tapes. Nixon refused, and the case went before the Supreme Court. On July 24, 1974, the high court ruled unanimously that the president must surrender the tapes. The Court rejected Nixon's argument that doing so would violate national security. Evidence involving possible criminal activity could not be withheld, even by a president. President Nixon maintained that he had done nothing wrong. At a press conference in November 1973, he proclaimed defiantly, "I am not a crook."
Background
Although historians sued for access to thousands of hours of tapes, it was not until some 21 years later, in 1996, that an agreement was made for over 3,700 hours of tape to be made public.
THE PRESIDENT RESIGNS
Even without holding the original tapes, the House Judiciary Committee determined that there was enough evidence to impeach Richard Nixon. On July 27, the committee approved three articles of impeachment, charging the president with obstruction of justice, abuse of power, and contempt of Congress for refusing to obey a congressional subpoena to release the tapes. Analyzing
Political Cartoons
>
THE WHITE HOUSE TAPES
During the Watergate hearings a bombshell exploded when it was revealed that President Nixon secretly tape-recorded all conversations in the Oval Office. Although Nixon hoped the tapes would one day help historians document the triumphs of his presidency, they were used to confirm his guilt.
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons
1.	What does this cartoon imply about privacy during President Nixon's term in office?
2.	What building has been transformed into a giant tape recorder?
AUTH copyright © Philadelphia Inquirer. Reprinted with permission of Universal
Press Syndicate. All rights reserved.
H HI
806 Chapter 24
Dear Mr. Seen

On August 5, Nixon released the tapes. They contained many gaps, and one tape revealed a disturbing 18V2-minute gap. According to the White House, Rose Mary Woods, President Nixon's secretary, accidentally erased part of a conversation between H. R. Haldeman and Nixon. More importantly, a tape dated June 23,
1972—six days after the Watergate break-in— that contained a conversation between Nixon and Haldeman, disclosed the evidence investigators needed. Not only had the president known about the role of members of his administration in the burglary, he had agreed to the plan to obstruct the FBI's investigation.
The evidence now seemed overwhelming.
On August 8, 1974, before the full House vote on the articles of impeachment began, President
Nixon announced his resignation from office. Defiant as always, Nixon admitted no guilt. He merely said that some of his judgments "were wrong." The next day, Nixon and his wife, Pat, returned home to California. A short time later, Gerald Ford was sworn in as the 38th president of the United States.
THE EFFECTS OF WATERGATE
The effects of Watergate have endured long after Nixon's resignation. Eventually, 25 members of the Nixon Administration were convicted and served prison terms for crimes connected to Watergate. Along with the divisive war in Vietnam, Watergate produced a deep disillusionment with the "imperial" presidency. In the years following Vietnam and Watergate, the American public and the media developed a general cynicism about public officials that still exists today. Watergate remains the scandal and investigative story against which all others are measured. I hereby rcsigr United States.
the Office of Pr

The Honorable Henry A. Kis The Secretary of State Washington, D.C. 20520
$
&
With wife Pat looking on, Richard Nixon bids farewell to his staff on his final day as president. Nixon’s resignation letter is shown above.
, 2J ASSESSMENT
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance, •impeachment	*John Ehrlichman	•Committee to Reelect the
•Watergate	*John Mitchell	President
R.
Haldeman •John Sirica
•Saturday Night Massacre
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Use a time line like the one below to trace the events of the Watergate scandal.
June 1972
August
1974
event~| 1 event
event J | event |
Which event made Nixon's downfall certain?
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	HYPOTHESIZING
If Nixon had admitted to and apologized for the Watergate break-in, how might subsequent events have been different? Explain.
Think About:
•	the extent of the cover-up
•	the impact of the cover-up
•	Nixon’s public image
ANALYZING EVENTS
How did the Watergate scandal create a constitutional crisis?
5.	EVALUATING
Do you think that Nixon would have been forced to resign if the tapes had not existed? Explain your answer.
An Age of Limits
DAILY LIFE
(1968-1980) Television Reflects American Life
From May until November 1973, the Senate Watergate hearings were the biggest daytime TV viewing event of the year. Meanwhile, television programming began to more closely reflect the realities of American life. Shows more often addressed relevant issues, more African-American characters appeared, and working women as well as homemakers were portrayed. In addition, the newly established Public Broadcasting System began showing many issue-oriented programs and expanded educational programming for children.
DIVERSITY
Chico and the Man was the first series set in a Mexican-American barrio, East Los Angeles. The program centered on the relationship between Ed Brown, a cranky garage owner, and Chico Rodriguez, an optimistic young mechanic Brown reluctantly hired.
7
SOCIAL VALUES
All in the Family was the most popular series of the 1970s. It told the story of a working-class family, headed by the bigoted Archie Bunker and his long-suffering wife, Edith. Through the barbs Bunker traded witl his son-in-law and his African-American neighbor, George Jefferson, the show dealt openly with the divisions in Americai society.

DA TA FILE
INDEPENDENT
WOMEN
The Mary Tyler Moore Show depicted Mary Richards, a single woman living in Minneapolis and working as an assistant manager in a local TV news department. Mary symbolized the young career woman of the 1970s.
TV EVENTS OF THE 1970s
•	A congressional ban on TV cigarette commercials took effect in 1971.
•	ABC negotiated an $8-million-a-year contract to televise Monday Night Football, first broadcast in September 1970.
•	In 1972, President Nixon, accompanied by TV cameras and reporters from the major networks, made a groundbreaking visit to China.
•	Saturday Night Live—a show that would launch the careers of Dan Aykroyd, Jane Curtin, Eddie Murphy, and many other comic actors—premiered in October 1975.
•	WTCG-TV (later WTBS) in Atlanta, owned by Ted Turner, became the basis of the first true satellite-delivered “superstation" in 1976.
•	In November 1979, ABC began broadcasting late-night updates on the hostage crisis in Iran. These reports evolved into the program Nightiine with Ted Koppel.
CULTURAL IDENTITY
The miniseries Roots, based on a book by Alex Haley, told the saga of several generations of an African-American family. The eight-part story began with Kunta Kinte, who was captured outside his West African village and taken to America as a slave. It ended with his great-grandson’s setting off for a new life as a free man. The groundbreaking series, broadcast in January 1977, was one of the most-watched television events in history.
Average Weekly Hours of TV Viewing
20?
15
1970
1975
1980
I
Children 2-11 years old I Teens 12-17 years old I Adults 18 and over 1985
1990
1995 1998
Source; Nielsen Media Research

ft


CONNECT TO HISTORY
1.	Analyzing Causes In what ways did television change to reflect American society in the 1970s? What factors might have influenced these changes?
CONNECT TO TODAY
2.	Creating a Graph Use the Internet or an almanac to find data on the number of televisions owned in the United States and the number of hours of TV watched every day. Make a graph that displays the data.
X hmhsocialstudies.com
RESEARCH WEB LINKS
An Age of Ling
The Ford and Carter Years
MAIN IDEA
The Ford and Carter administrations attempted to remedy the nation’s worst economic crisis in decades.
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Maintaining a stable national economy has remained a top priority for every president since Ford and Carter.
Terms & Names
R.
Ford •Jimmy Carter • National Energy Act •human rights •Camp David Accords
•Ayatollah Ruhollah Khomeini
OneAmerican'sStory

TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the major events of the Ford and Carter administrations.
James D. Denney couldn't believe what he was hearing.
Barely a month after Richard Nixon had resigned amid the Watergate scandal, President Gerald R. Ford had granted Nixon a full pardon. "[Sjomeone must write, 'The End/" Ford had declared in a televised statement. “I have concluded that only I can do that." Denney wrote a letter to the editors of Time magazine, in which he voiced his anger at Ford's decision.
A
Personal Voice james d. denney “Justice may certainly be tempered by mercy, but there can be no such thing as mercy until justice has been accomplished by the courts. Since it circumvented justice, Mr. Ford’s act was merely indulgent favoritism, a bland and unworthy substitute for mercy. ” —Time, September 23, 1974
James Denney's feelings were typical of the anger and the disillusionment with the presidency that many Americans felt in the aftermath of the Watergate scandal. During the 1970s, Presidents Gerald Ford and Jimmy Carter sought to restore America's faith in its leaders. At the same time, both men had to focus much of their attention on battling the nation's worsening economic situation.
▲
Two women protest President Ford’s pardon of Richard Nixon.
Ford Travels a Rough Road
Upon taking office, Gerald R. Ford urged Americans to put the Watergate scan-
dal behind them. "Our long national nightmare is over," he declared. The
nation's nightmarish economy persisted, however, and Ford's policies offered
little relief.
810 Chapter 24
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
Why was Ford’s call for voluntary actions to help the economy unsuccessful?
FORD, NOT A LINCOLN”
Gerald Ford seemed to many to be a likable and honest man. Upon becoming vice president after Spiro Agnew's resignation, Ford candidly admitted his limitations. "I'm a Ford, not a Lincoln," he remarked. On September 8, 1974, President Ford pardoned Richard Nixon in an attempt to move the country beyond Watergate. The move cost Ford a good deal of public support. FORD TRIES TO “WHIP” INFLATION
By the time Ford took office, America's economy had gone from bad to worse. Both inflation and unemployment continued to rise. After the massive OPEC oil-price increases in 1973, gasoline and heating oil costs had soared, pushing inflation from 6 percent to over 10 percent by the end of 1974. Ford responded with a program of massive citizen action, called "Whip Inflation Now" or WIN. The president called on Americans to cut back on their use of oil and gas and to take other energy-saving measures. In the absence of incentives, though, the plan fell flat. Ford then tried to curb inflation through a "tight money" policy. He cut government spending and encouraged the Federal Reserve Board to restrict credit through higher interest rates. These actions triggered the worst economic recession in 40 years. As Ford implemented his economic programs, he continually battled a Democratic Congress intent on pushing its own economic agenda. During his two years as president, Ford vetoed more than 50 pieces of legislation.
Ford’s Foreign Policy
Ford fared slightly better in the international arena. He relied heavily on Henry Kissinger, who continued to hold the key position of secretary of state.
CARRYING OUT NIXON'S FOREIGN POLICIES
Following Kissinger's advice, Ford pushed ahead with Nixon's policy of negotiation with China and the Soviet Union. In November 1974, he met with Soviet premier Leonid Brezhnev. Less than a year later, he traveled to Helsinki, Finland, where 35 nations, including the Soviet Union, signed the Helsinki Accords—a series of agreements that promised greater cooperation between the nations of Eastern and Western Europe. The Helsinki Accords would be Ford's greatest presidential accomplishment. DIFFICULT
decisions
PARDONING PRESIDENT NIXON
President Ford’s pardon of Richard Nixon outraged many Americans. But President Ford argued that the pardon of Richard Nixon was in the country’s best interest. In the event of a Watergate trial, Ford argued, “ugly passions would again be aroused. . . . And the credibility of our free institutions . . . would again be challenged at home and abroad.” Ford called the pardon decision “the most difficult of my life, by far."
In 2001, after more than 25 years, Ford received the John F. Kennedy Profiles in Courage Award for his courageous decision in the face of public opposition.
1.	How might the country have been affected if a former United States president had gone on trial for possible criminal wrongdoing?
2.	If you had been in President Ford’s position, would you have pardoned Richard Nixon? Why or why not?
ONGOING TURMOIL IN SOUTHEAST ASIA
Like presidents before him, Ford encountered trouble in Southeast Asia. The 1973 cease-fire in Vietnam had broken down. Heavy fighting resumed and Ford asked Congress for over $722 million to help South Vietnam. Congress refused. Without American financial help, South Vietnam surrendered to the North in 1975. In the same year, the Communist government of Cambodia seized the U.S. merchant ship Mayagiiez in the Gulf of Siam. President Ford responded with a massive show of military force to rescue 39 crew members aboard the ship. The operation cost the lives of 41 U.S. troops. Critics argued that the mission had cost more lives than it had saved. i
J
I
JIMMY CARTER 1924-
James Earl Carter, Jr., was born into relative prosperity. His father, Earl Carter, was a disciplinarian who tried to instill a sense of hard work and responsibility in his son.
To earn money for himself, Carter undertook a variety of jobs selling peanuts, running a hamburger and hot dog stand, collecting newspapers and selling them to fish markets, and selling scrap iron.
Before entering politics, Carter joined the navy, where he excelled in electronics and naval tactics. In 1952, he joined a select group of officers who helped develop the world’s first nuclear submarines. The group’s commander was Captain Hyman G. Rickover. Carter later wrote that Rickover “had a profound effect on my life—perhaps more than anyone except my own parents. ... He expected the maximum from us, but he always contributed more.”
This 1976 ► campaign toy exaggerates Jimmy Carter’s well-known smile and parodies his occupation as a peanut farmer.
Carter Enters the White House
Gerald Ford won the Republican nomination for president in 1976 after fending off a powerful conservative challenge from former California governor Ronald Reagan. Because the Republicans seemed divided over Ford's leadership, the Democrats confidently eyed the White House. "We could run an aardvark this year and win," predicted one Democratic leader. The Democratic nominee was indeed a surprise: a nationally unknown peanut farmer and former governor of Georgia, Jimmy Carter.
MR. CARTER GOES TO WASHINGTON
During the post-Watergate era, cynicism toward the Washington establishment ran high. The soft-spoken, personable man from Plains, Georgia, promised to restore integrity to the nation's highest office, "I will never tell a lie to the American people." Throughout the presidential campaign, Carter and Ford squared off over the key issues of inflation, energy, and unemployment. On Election Day, Jimmy Carter won by a narrow margin, claiming 40.8 million popular votes to Ford's 39.1 million.
From the very beginning, the new first family brought a down-to-earth style to Washington. After settling into office, Carter stayed in touch with the people by holding Roosevelt-like "fireside chats" on radio and television.
Carter failed to reach out to Congress in a similar way, refusing to play the "insider" game of deal making. Relying mainly on a team of advisers from Georgia, Carter even alienated congressional Democrats. Both parties on Capitol Hill often joined to sink the president's budget proposals, as well as his major policy reforms of tax and welfare programs.
Carter’s Domestic Agenda
Like Gerald Ford, President Carter focused much of his attention on battling the country's energy and economic crises but was unable to bring the United States out of its economic slump.
CONFRONTING THE ENERGY CRISIS
Carter considered the energy crisis the most important issue facing the nation. A large part of the problem, the president believed, was America’s reliance on imported oil. On April 18, 1977, during a fireside chat, Carter urged his fellow Americans to cut their consumption of oil and gas. A
Personal Voice jimmy carter “ The energy crisis ... Is a problem . . . likely to get progressively worse through the rest of this century. ... Our decision about energy will test the character of the American people. . . . This difficult effort will be the ‘moral equivalent of war,’ except that we will be uniting our efforts to build and not to destroy. ”
quoted in Keeping Faith
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
,gj What factors played a significant role in Carter’s election?
812 Chapter 24
Vocabulary
lobby: a special-
interest group that
tries to influence
the legislature
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
Cj How did the National Energy Act help ease America’s energy crisis?
In addition, Carter presented Congress with more than 100 proposals on energy conservation and development. Representatives from oil- and gas-producing states fiercely resisted some of the proposals. Automobile manufacturers also lobbied against gas-rationing provisions. "It was impossible for me to imagine the bloody legislative battles we would have to win," Carter later wrote.
Out of the battle came the National Energy Act. The act placed a tax on gas-guzzling cars, removed price controls on oil and natural gas produced in the United States, and extended tax credits for the development of alternative energy. With the help of the act, as well as voluntary conservation measures, U.S. dependence on foreign oil had eased slightly by 1979. .cy
THE ECONOMIC CRISIS WORSENS
Unfortunately, these energy-saving measures could do little to combat a sudden new economic crisis. In the summer of 1979, renewed violence in the Middle East produced a second major fuel shortage in the United States. To make matters worse, OPEC announced another major price hike. In 1979 inflation soared from 7.6 percent to 11.3 percent. Faced with increasing pressure to act, Carter attempted an array of measures, none of which worked. Carter's scattershot approach convinced many people that he had no economic policy at all. Carter fueled this feeling of uncertainty by delivering his now-famous "malaise" speech, in which he complained of a "crisis of spirit" that had struck "at the very heart and soul of our national will." Carter's address made many Americans feel that their president had given up.
By 1980, inflation had climbed to nearly 14 percent, the highest rate since 1947. The standard of living in the United States slipped from first place to fifth place in the world. Carter's popularity slipped along with it. This economic downswing—and Carter's inability to solve it during an election year—was one key factor in sending Ronald Reagan to the White House.
THE 1980s TEXAS OIL BOOM
The economic crisis that gripped the country in the late 1970s was, in large part, caused by the increased cost of oil. Members of the OPEC cartel raised the price of oil by agreeing to restrict oil production. The resulting decrease in the supply of oil in the market caused the price to go up.
Most Americans were hurt by the high energy prices. However, in areas that produced oil, such as Texas, the rise in prices led to a booming economy in the early 1980’s. For example, real-estate values—for land on which to drill for oil, as well as for office space in cities like Houston and Dallas—increased markedly.
Unemployment and Inflation, 1970-1980
■I Unemployment Rate H Inflation Rate
Source: Statistical Abstract of the United States, 1980,1995
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Graphs 1.	What trends did the economy experience during the Carter years?
2.	Which year of the Carter administration saw the greatest stagflation
(inflation plus unemployment)?
An Age of Limits
Nonfarm Employment by Sector, 1950-2000
1950
	Services	
	59% Goods	ft
	OH	
Sources: Statistical Abstract of the United States, 2000; U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics; Historical Statistics of the United States
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Graphs 1.	How much greater was the percentage of employment in service industries in 1980 than in 1950?
2.	What additional change is shown by 2000? Has this trend continued into the 2000s?
▲
Andrew Young stands outside the United Nations in New York City, in 1997.
A CHANGING ECONOMY
Many of the economic problems Jimmy Carter struggled with resulted from long-term trends in the economy. Since the 1950s, the rise of automation and foreign competition had reduced the number of manufacturing jobs. At the same time, the service sector of the economy expanded rapidly. This sector includes industries such as communications, transportation, and retail trade. The rise of the service sector and the decline of manufacturing jobs meant big changes for some American workers. Workers left out of manufacturing jobs faced an increasingly complex job market. Many of the higher-paying service jobs required more education or specialized skills than did manufacturing jobs. The lower-skilled service jobs usually did not pay well.
Growing overseas competition during the 1970s caused further change in America's economy. The booming economies of West Germany and countries on the Pacific Rim (such as Japan, Taiwan, and Korea) cut into many U.S. markets. Many of the nation's primary industries—iron and steel, rubber, clothing, automobiles—had to cut back production, lay off workers, and even close plants. Especially hard-hit were the automotive industries of the Northeast. There, high energy costs, foreign competition, and computerized production led companies to eliminate tens of thousands of jobs.
CARTER AND CIVIL RIGHTS
Although Carter felt frustrated by the country's economic woes, he took special pride in his civil rights record. His administration included more African Americans and women than any before it. In 1977, the president appointed civil rights leader Andrew Young as U.S. ambassador to the United Nations. Young was the first African American to hold that post. To the judicial branch alone, Carter appointed 28 African Americans, 29 women (including 6 African Americans), and 14 Latinos. However, President Carter fell short of what many civil rights groups had expected in terms of legislation. Critics claimed that Carter—preoccupied with battles over energy and the economy-
failed to give civil rights his full attention. Meanwhile, the courts began to turn against affirmative action. In 1978, in the case of Regents of the University of California v. Bakke, the Supreme Court decided that the affirmative action policies of the university's medical school were unconstitutional. The decision made it more difficult for organizations to establish effective affirmative action programs. (See Regents of the University of California v. Bakke, page 818.)
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
What factors played a role in America’s economic stagnation?
814 Chapter 24
A
Human Rights Foreign Policy i
MAIN IDEA
Identifying
Problems
$ What problems did critics have with Carter’s foreign-policy philosophy?
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
$ What led to the collapse of detente with the Soviet Union?
Jimmy Carter rejected the philosophy of realpolitik—the pragmatic policy of negotiating with powerful nations despite their behavior—and strived for a foreign policy committed to human rights.
ADVANCING HUMAN RIGHTS
Jimmy Carter, like Woodrow Wilson, sought to use moral principles as a guide for U.S. foreign policy. He believed that the United States needed to commit itself to promoting human rights—such as the freedoms and liberties listed in the Declaration of Independence and the Bill of Rights—throughout the world. Putting his principles into practice, President Carter cut off military aid to Argentina and Brazil, countries that had good relations with the United States but had imprisoned or tortured thousands of their own citizens. Carter followed up this action by establishing a Bureau of Human Rights in the State Department.
Carter's philosophy was not without its critics. Supporters of the containment policy felt that the president's policy undercut allies such as Nicaragua, a dictatorial but anti-Communist country. Others argued that by supporting dictators in South Korea and the Philippines, Carter was acting inconsistently. In 1977, Carter's policies drew further criticism when his administration announced that it planned to give up ownership of the Panama Canal. Jjgj
YIELDING THE PANAMA CANAL
Since 1914, when the United States obtained full ownership over the Panama Canal, Panamanians had resented having their nation split in half by a foreign power. In 1977, the two nations agreed to two treaties, one of which turned over control of the Panama Canal to Panama on December 31, 1999.
In 1978, the U.S. Senate, which had to ratify each treaty, approved the agreements by a vote of 68 to 32—one more vote than the required two-thirds. Public opinion was also divided.
In the end, the treaties did improve relationships between the United States and Latin America.
THE COLLAPSE OF DETENTE
When Jimmy Carter took office, detente—the relaxation of tensions between the world's superpowers—had reached a high point. Beginning with President Nixon and continuing with President Ford, U.S. officials had worked to ease relations with the Communist superpowers of China and the Soviet Union. However, Carter's firm insistence on human rights led to a breakdown in relations with the Soviet Union. President Carter's dismay over the Soviet Union's treatment of dissidents, or opponents of the government's policies, delayed a second round of SALT negotiations. President Carter and Soviet premier Leonid Brezhnev finally met in June of 1979 in Vienna,
Austria, where they signed an agreement known as SALT II.
Although the agreement did not reduce armaments, it did provide for limits on the number of strategic weapons and nuclear-missile launchers that each side could produce.
The SALT II agreement, however, met sharp opposition in the Senate. Critics argued that it would put the United States at a military disadvantage. Then, in December 1979, the Soviets invaded the neighboring country of Afghanistan. Angered over the invasion, President Carter refused to fight for the SALT II agreement, and the treaty died.
VJ ORLD S
JAg£ SOVIET-AFGHANISTAN WAR
Afghanistan, an Islamic country along the southern border of the Soviet Union, had been run by a Communist, pro-Soviet government for a number of years. However, a strong Muslim rebel group known as the mujahideen was intent on overthrowing the Afghan government. Fearing a rebel victory in Afghanistan, the Soviet Union sent troops to Afghanistan in late 1979.
While the Soviets had superior weaponry, the rebels fought the Soviets to a stalemate by using guerrilla tactics and intimate knowledge of the country’s mountainous terrain.
After suffering thousands of casualties, the last Soviet troops pulled out of Afghanistan in February 1989. Fighting between rival factions continued for years. By 2000, the Taliban, a radical Muslim faction, controlled 90 percent of Afghanistan.
Art Age of Limits
Middle East, 1978-1982
. AFGHANISTAN <
d Jif
4 rabian Sea
z
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1. Location What OPEC countries are shown on the map? 2- Human-Environment Interaction How does Israel’s
location contribute to its conflicts?
GOLAN HEIGHTS-
Mediten'aneait
[	| Israel
ss Israeli controlled |	|	Palestinian areas
P I
Israeli conquests returned ----- to Egypt, 1979-1982
OPEC
Member President Carter, President Anwar el-Sadat, and Prime Minister Menachem Begin reach a peace agreement in 1978.
▼
Triumph and Crisis in the Middle East
Through long gasoline lines and high energy costs, Americans became all too aware of the troubles in the Middle East. In that area of ethnic, religious, and economic conflict, Jimmy Carter achieved one of his greatest diplomatic triumphs— and suffered his most tragic defeat.
THE CAMP DAVID ACCORDS
Through negotiation and arm-twisting, Carter helped forge peace between long-time enemies Israel and Egypt. In 1977, Egyptian president Anwar el-Sadat and Israeli prime minister Menachem Begin met in Jerusalem to discuss an overall peace between the two nations. In the summer of 1978, Carter seized on the peace initiative. When the peace talks stalled, he invited Sadat and Begin to Camp David, the presidential retreat in Maryland. After 12 days of intense negotiations, the three leaders reached an agreement that became known as the Camp David Accords. Under this first signed peace agreement with an Arab country, Israel agreed to withdraw from the Sinai Peninsula, which it had captured from Egypt during the Six-Day War in 1967. (See inset map above.) Egypt, in turn, formally recognized Israel's right to exist.
Summarizing
What was the significance of the Camp David Accords?
Joking at the hard work ahead, Carter wrote playfully in his diary, "I resolved
to do everything possible to get out of the negotiating business’” Little did the
president know that his next Middle East negotiation would be his most painful.
THE IRAN HOSTAGE CRISIS
By 1979, the shah of Iran, an ally of the United States, was in deep trouble. Many Iranians resented his regime's widespread corruption and dictatorial tactics. In January 1979, revolution broke out. The Muslim religious leader Ayatollah Ruhollah Khomeini (Tyo-tc/le rob-ho"le ko-ma"ne) led the rebels in overthrowing the shah and establishing a religious state based on strict obedience to the Qur'an, the sacred book of Islam. Carter had supported the shah until the very end. In October 1979, the president allowed the shah to enter the United States for cancer treatment, though he had already fled Iran in January 1979.
The act infuriated the revolution-aries of Iran. On November 4, 1979, armed students seized the U.S. embassy in Tehran and took 52 Americans hostage. The militants demanded that the United States send the shah back to Iran in return for the release of the hostages.
Carter refused, and a painful yearlong standoff followed, in which the United States continued quiet but intense efforts to free the hostages.
The captives were finally released on January 20, 1981, shortly after the new president, Ronald Reagan, was sworn in. Despite the hostages' release after 444 days in captivity,
the crisis in Iran seemed to underscore the limits that Americans faced during the 1970s. Americans also realized that there were limits to the nation's environmental resources. This realization prompted both citizens and the government to actively address environmental concerns.
I
▲
U.S. hostages were blindfolded and paraded through the streets of Tehran.
s
I
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance. •Gerald R. Ford	• National Energy Act	• Camp David Accords
•Jimmy Carter	’human rights	’Ayatollah Ruhollah Khomeini
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a time line of the major events of the Ford and Carter administrations, using a form such as the one below.
event one event three
event two	event four
Which two events do you think were the most important? Why?
CRITICAL THINKING
EVALUATING DECISIONS
Do you think that Ford made a good decision in pardoning Nixon? Explain why or why not.
4.	COMPARING
How were the actions taken by Presidents Ford and Carter to address the country’s economic downturn similar? How did they differ?
ANALYZING ISSUES
Describe U.S. involvement in the Middle East. Think About:
•	the Camp David Accords
•	the Iran Hostage Crisis
An Age of Limits
REGENTS OF THE UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA
v. BAKKE (1978) ORIGINS OF THE CASE
In 1973, Allan Bakke applied to the University of California at Davis medical school. The school had a quota-based affirmative-action plan that reserved 16 out of 100 spots for racial minorities. Bakke, a white male, was not admitted to the school despite his competitive test scores and grades. Bakke sued for admission, arguing that he had been discriminated against on the basis of race. The California Supreme Court agreed with Bakke, but the school appealed the case. THE RULING
The Court ruled that racial quotas were unconstitutional, but that schools could still consider race as a factor in admissions. LEGAL REASONING
The Court was closely divided on whether affirmative-action plans were constitutional. Two different sets of justices formed 5-to-4 majorities on two different issues in Bakke.
Five justices agreed the quota was unfair to Bakke. They based their argument on the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment. Justice Lewis Powell, writing for the majority, explained their reasoning.
66 The guarantee of equal protection cannot mean one thing when applied to one individual and something else when applied to a person of another color. If both are not accorded the same protection, then it is not equal. ”
LEGAL SOURCES
LEGISLATION
U.S. CONSTITUTION, FOURTEENTH AMENDMENT
(1868) "No state shall . . . deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws.”
Allan Bakke receives his degree in medicine from the medical school at U.C. Davis on June 4,1982.
The four justices that joined Powell in this part of the decision said race should never play a part in admissions decisions. Powell and
the other four justices disagreed. These five justices formed a separate majority, arguing that "the attainment of a diverse student body ... is a constitutionally permissible goal for an institution of higher education." In other words, schools could have affirmative-action plans that consider race as one factor in admission decisions in order to achieve a diverse student body.
818 Chapter 24
RELATED CASES
UNITED STEELWORKERS OF AMERICA
v. WEBER (1979) The Court said a business could have a short-term program for training minority workers as a way of fixing the results of past discrimination.
ADARAND CONSTRUCTORS
v. PENA (1995) The Court struck a federal law to set aside 10 percent of highway construction funds for minority-owned businesses. The Court also said that affirmative-action programs must be focused to achieve a compelling government interest.
HEi
ppREJ
gftSM
»?»??* ‘
rf-WIttts
A
On October 8,1977, protestors march in suppport of affirmative action at a park in Oakland, California. WHY IT MATTERED
Many people have faced discrimination in America. The struggle of African Americans for civil rights in the 1950s and 1960s succeeded in overturning Jim Crow segregation. Even so, social inequality persisted for African Americans, as well as women and other minority groups. In 1965, President Lyndon Johnson explained why more proactive measures needed to be taken to end inequality.
“ You do not take a person who for years has been hobbled by chains and . . . bring him up to the starting line of a race and then say, 'you are free to compete with all the others’ and still justly believe that you have been completely fair. ”
As a result, Johnson urged companies to begin to take "affirmative action" to hire and promote African Americans, helping them to overcome generations of inequality. Critics quickly opposed affirmative action plans as unfair to white people and merely a replacement of one form of racial discrimination with another.
University admissions policies became a focus of the debate over affirmative action. The Court's ruling in Bakke allowed race to be used as one factor in admissions decisions. Schools could consider a prospective student's race, but they could not use quotas or use race as the only factor for admission.
HISTORICAL IMPACT
Since Bakke, the Court has ruled on affirmative action several times, usually limiting affirmative-action plans. For example, in Adarand Constructors v. Pena (1995), the Court struck a federal law to set aside "not less than 10 percent" of highway construction funds for businesses owned by "socially and economically disadvantaged individuals." The Court said that affirmative-action programs must be narrowly focused to achieve a "compelling government interest."
On cases regarding school affirmative-action plans, the courts have not created clear guidelines. The Supreme Court refused to hear an appeal of a 1996 lower court ruling that outlawed any consideration of race for admission to the University of Texas law school. Yet in the 2003 decision in Grutter v. Bollinger, the Court protected a University of Michigan law school admissions policy that required the admissions committee to consider the diversity of its student body. The Court reaffirmed the Bakke view that "student body diversity is a compelling state interest."
Since the Grutter decision, several states have passed laws or constitutional amendments requiring race-blind admissions—effectively barring affirmative action. These laws were passed by ballot initiative, reflecting a popular view that sees affirmative action as "reverse discrimination."
jthinking critically
CONNECT TO HISTORY
1. Evaluating Research articles about Bakke in the library or on the Internet. Read the articles and write a paragraph for each one explaining the writer’s point of view on the case. Conclude by telling which article gives the best discussion of the case. Cite examples to support your choice.
CONNECT TO TODAY
V^ttury 2. Visit the links for Historic Decisions of the Supreme Court to research and read about Proposition 209, California’s 1996 law banning affirmative action at state universities. Prepare arguments for an in-class debate about whether the law will have a positive or negative long-term effect.
XCENTUI
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
INTERNET ACTIVITY
S3*
Environmental
Activism
MAIN IDEA
During the 1970s, Americans strengthened their efforts to address the nation’s environmental problems.
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
The nation today continues to struggle to balance environmental concerns with industrial growth.
Terms & Names
»Rachel Carson »Earth Day »environmentalist
• Environmental
Protection Agency (EPA) •Three Mile Island
OneAmerican'sStbry

TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on how concern for the environment grew in the United States.
▲
Lois Gibbs
In 1972, Lois Gibbs and her family moved to Niagara Falls, New York. Underneath this quiet town, however, was a disaster in the making. In the 1890s, the Love Canal had been built to provide hydroelectric power for the Niagara Falls area. Chemical companies were dumping hazardous waste into the canal. In 1953, bulldozers filled in the canal. Shortly thereafter, a school and rows of homes were built nearby.
In 1977, when Lois Gibbs's son fell sick, she decided to investigate. She eventually uncovered the existence of the toxic waste and mobilized the community to demand government action.
In 1980, President Carter authorized funds for many Niagara Falls families to move to safety. Years later, Lois Gibbs wrote a book detailing her efforts.
A
Personal Voice lois gibbs “ I want to tell you our story—my story—because I believe that ordinary citizens—using the tools of dignity, self-respect, common sense, and perseverance—can influence solutions to important problems in our society. ... In solving any difficult problem, you have to be prepared to fight long and hard, sometimes at great personal cost; but it can be done. It must be done if we are to survive ... at all. ”
—Love Canal: My Story
Lois Gibbs's concerns about environmental hazards were shared by many Americans in the 1970s. Through the energy crisis, Americans learned that their natural resources were limited; they could no longer take the environment for granted. Americans—from grassroots organizations to the government—began to focus on conservation of the environment and new forms of energy.
The Roots of Environmentalism
The widespread realization that pollution and overconsumption were damaging the environment began in the 1960s. One book in particular had awakened
820 Chapter 24
America s concerns about the environment and helped lay the groundwork for the activism of the early seventies.
RACHEL CARSON AND SILENT SPRING
In 1962, Rachel Carson, a marine biologist, published a book entitled Silent Spring. In it, she warned against the growing use of pesticides chemicals used to kill insects and rodents. Carson argued that pesticides poisoned the very food they were intended to protect and as a result killed many birds and fish. Carson cautioned that America faced a "silent spring," in which birds killed off by pesticides would no longer fill the air with song. She added that of all the weapons used in "man's war against nature," pesticides were some of the most harmful.
A
Personal Voice rachel carson “ These sprays, dusts, and aerosols . . . have the power to kill every insect, the 'good’ and the 'bad/ to still the song of birds and the leaping of fish in the streams, to coat the leaves with a deadly film, and to linger on in soil—all this though the intended target may be only a few weeds or insects. Can anyone believe it is possible to lay down such a barrage of poisons on the surface of the earth without making it unfit for all life? ” —Silent Spring
Within six months of its publication, Silent Spring sold nearly half a million copies. Many chemical companies called the book inaccurate and threatened legal action.
However, for a majority of Americans, Carson's book was an early warning about the danger that human activity posed to the environment. Shortly after the book's publication,
President Kennedy established an advisory committee to investigate the situation.
With Rachel Carson's prodding, the nation slowly began to focus more on environmental issues. Although Carson would not live to see the U.S. government outlaw DDT in 1972, her work helped many Americans realize that their everyday behavior, as well as the nation's industrial growth, had a damaging effect on the environment.

KtV PLAYER
RACHEL CARSON 1907-1964
The marine biologist Rachel Carson was born far from the sea, in the small town of Springdale, Pennsylvania.
Carson was a sickly child who often had to remain at home, where her mother tutored her. Throughout her youth and into her college years, Carson was a studious, but quiet and aloof, person.
Carson entered college intent on becoming a writer. During her sophomore year, she took a biology class to fulfill her science requirement and quickly fell in love with the study of nature. By the next year Carson switched her major from English to zoology— the study of animals.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
4/ What effects did Rachel Carson’s book have on the nation as a whole?
Environmental Concerns in the 1970s
During the 1970s, the administrations of Richard Nixon and Jimmy Carter confronted such environmental issues as conservation, pollution, and the growth of nuclear energy.
THE FIRST EARTH DAY
The United States ushered in the 1970s—a decade in which it would actively address its environmental issues—fittingly enough with the first Earth Day celebration. On that day, April 22, 1970, nearly every community in the nation and more than 10,000 schools and 2,000 colleges hosted some type of environmental-awareness activity and spotlighted such problems as pol-
lution, the growth of toxic waste, and the earth's dwindling resources. The Earth
Day celebration continues today. Each year on April 22, millions of people around
the world gather to heighten public awareness of environmental problems.
THE GOVERNMENT TAKES ACTION
Although President Nixon was not considered an environmentalist, or someone who takes an active role in the protection of the environment, he recognized the nation's growing concern about the environment. In an effort to "make our peace with nature," President Nixon set out on a course that led to the passage of several landmark measures. In 1970, he consolidated 15 existing federal pollution programs into the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA). The new agency was given the power to set and enforce pollution standards, to conduct environmental research, and to assist state and local governments in pollution control. Today, the EPA remains the federal government's main instrument for dealing with environmental issues. In 1970 Nixon signed a new Clean Air Act that added several amendments to the Clean Air Act of 1963. The new act gave the government the authority to set air standards. Following the 1970 Clean Air Act, Congress also passed the Endangered Species Act, in addition to laws that limited pesticide use and curbed strip mining—the practice of mining for ore and coal by digging gaping holes in the land. Some 35 environmental laws took effect during the decade, addressing every aspect of conservation and clean-up, from protecting endangered animals to regulating auto emissions.
Vocabulary toxic: capable of causing injury or death, especially by chemical means; poisonous
MAIN IDEA
The Trans-Alaska Pipeline, stretching across hundreds of miles of tundra, was completed in 1977.
BALANCING PROGRESS AND CONSERVATION IN ALASKA
During the 1970s, the federal government took steps to ensure the continued well-being of Alaska, the largest state in the nation and one of its most ecologically sensitive. The discovery of oil there in 1968, and the subsequent construction of a massive pipeline to transport it, created many new jobs and greatly increased state revenues. However, the influx of new development also raised concerns about Alaska's wildlife, as well as the rights of its native peoples. In 1971, Nixon signed the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act, which turned over millions of acres of land to the state's native tribes for conservation and tribal use. In 1978, President Carter enhanced this conservation effort by setting aside an additional 56 million acres in Alaska as national monuments. In 1980, Congress added another 104 million acres as protected areas.
THE DEBATE OVER NUCLEAR ENERGY
As the 1970s came to a close, Americans became acutely aware of the dangers that nuclear power plants posed to both humans and the environment. During the 1970s, as America realized the drawbacks to its heavy dependence on foreign oil for energy, nuclear power seemed to many to be an attractive alternative. Opponents of nuclear energy warned the public against the industry's growth. They contended that nuclear plants, and the wastes they produced, were potentially dangerous to humans and their environment.
THREE MILE ISLAND
In the early hours of March 28, 1979, the concerns of nuclear energy opponents were validated. That morning, one of the nuclear reactors at a plant on Three Mile Island near Harrisburg, Pennsylvania, malfunctioned. The reactor overheated after its cooling system failed, and fear quickly arose that radiation might escape and spread over the region. Two days later, Summarizing
What were the environmental actions taken during the Nixon administration?
822 Chapter 24
Science
Technology j-
THE ACCIDENT AT THREE MILE ISLAND
A series of human and mechanical errors that caused the partial meltdown of the reactor core brought the Three Mile Island nuclear power plant to the brink of disaster. The accident at Three Mile Island caused widespread concern about nuclear power throughout the American public.
Electricity
Cooling Tower
REACTOR MELTDOWN
Q
The radioactive reactor core generates heat as its atoms split during a controlled chain reaction. Bi An inoperative valve releases thousands of gallons of coolant from the reactor core.
0 Half of the 36,816 exposed fuel rods melt in temperatures above five thousand degrees. 0 The melted material burns through the lining of the reactor chamber and spills to the
floor of the containment structure.
More than 30 years after the accident, clean-up at Three Mile Island continues. The final ‘clean-up bill’ could soar to more than $3 billion. The TMI-2 reactor was dangerously contaminated and could not be entered for two years. All the materials in the containment structure, along with anything used in the clean-up, had to be decontaminated. Because the reactor will never be completely free of radioactivity, it will one day be entombed in cement.
An Age of Limits
I
low-level radiation actually did escape from the crippled reactor. Officials evacu-
ated some residents, while others fled on their own. One homemaker who lived
near the plant recalled her desperate attempt to find safety.
A
Personal Voice “On Friday, a very frightening thing occurred in our area. A state policeman went door-to-door telling residents to stay indoors, close all windows, and turn all air conditioners off. I was alone, as were many other homemakers, and my thoughts were focused on how long I would remain a prisoner in my own home. . . . Suddenly, I was scared, real scared. I decided to get out of there, while I could. I ran to the car not knowing if I should breathe the air or not, and I threw the suitcases In the trunk and was on my way within one hour. If anything dreadful happened, I thought that I’d at least be with my girls. Although it was very hot in the car, I didn’t trust myself to turn the air conditioner on. It felt good as my tense muscles relaxed the farther I drove. ”
Background
In 2010,
President Obama established a commission to develop a longterm plan for the management of used nuclear fuel. This plan, he said, would include not only ideas on disposal, but also ways to reprocess and recycle this waste.
—an anonymous homemaker quoted in Accident at Three Mile Island: The Human Dimensions
I
In all, more than 100,000 residents were evacuated from the surrounding area. On April 9, the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, the federal agency that monitors the nuclear power industry, announced that the immediate danger was over.
The events at Three Mile Island rekindled the debate over nuclear power. Supporters of nuclear power pointed out that no one had been killed or seriously injured. Opponents countered by saying that chance alone had averted a tragedy.
i
!
History Through
HOLLYWOOD AND NUCLEAR FEARS
At the end of the 1970s and in the early 1980s, Hollywood responded to Americans’ concerns over nuclear power by making pointed social-awareness films exposing dangers in the nuclear industry. These films alerted the public to the importance of regulations in the relatively new field of atomic energy.
In 1979, The China Syndrome, starring Jane Fonda and Jack Lemmon, became the movie everyone was talking about. Only 12 days after the film’s release, a serious accident similar to the one portrayed in the movie occurred at the Three Mile Island nuclear power plant. ►
◄ In 1974, on her way to meet with a reporter from the New York Times, Karen Silkwood, a worker at a nuclear power facility, was hit and died in a car crash. In the film dramatization, Silkwood (1983), Meryl Streep played Karen, and Kurt Russell and Cher, her co-workers.
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Visual Sources 1.	Why do you think movies based on real events are popular with the general public?
2.	How do you think these films influenced present-day nuclear energy policy?
824 Chapter 24
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
$ How did the Three Mile Island incident affect the use of nuclear power in America?
They demanded that the government call a halt to the construction of new power plants and gradually shut down existing nuclear facilities.
While the government did not do away with nuclear power, federal officials did recognize nuclear energy's potential danger to both humans and the environment. As a result of the accident at Three Mile Island, the Nuclear Regulatory Commission strengthened its safety standards and improved its inspection procedures.
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT
PRIVATE CONSERVATION GROUPS
w
A
Continuing Movement Although the environmental movement of the 1970s gained popular support, opponents of the movement also made their voices heard. In Tennessee, for example, where a federal dam project was halted because it threatened a species of fish, local developers took out ads asking residents to "tell the government that the size of your wallet is more important than some two-inch-long minnow." When confronted with environmental concerns, one unemployed steelworker spoke for others when he remarked, "Why worry about the long run, when you're out of work right now."
The environmental movement that blossomed in the 1970s became in the 1980s and 1990s a struggle to balance environmental concerns with jobs and progress. In the years since the first Earth Day, however, environmental issues have gained increasing attention and support.
ASSESSMENT
As concerns about pollution and the depletion of nonrenewable resources grew, so did membership in private, nonprofit organizations dedicated to the preservation of wilderness and endangered species. Many of these groups lobbied government for protective legislation. Some filed lawsuits to block projects such as road or dam construction or logging that would threaten habitats. The Environmental Defense Fund (today Environmental Defense) brought lawsuits that led to the bans on DDT and on leaded gasoline.
Radical groups also emerged. Members of Greenpeace risked their lives at sea to escort whales and protect them from commercial hunters.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•Rachel Carson •Earth Day
environmentalist	• Three Mile Island
Environmental Protection Agency (EPA)
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Re-create the web below on your paper and fill in events that illustrate the main idea in the center.
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING CAUSES
How much should the United States rely on nuclear power as a source of energy? Explain. Think About:
•	the safety of nuclear power
•	the alternatives to nuclear power
•	U.S. energy demands
ANALYZING VISUAL SOURCES
What message does this 1969 poster give about the role of governmental entities, such as the EPA, in managing the environment?
An Age of Limits^
TERMS & NAMES
For each term or name below, write a sentence explaining its significance to the Nixon, Ford,
ASSESSMENT
or Carter administrations.
1.	Richard M. Nixon
2.	stagflation
3.	OPEC (Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries)
SALT I
Treaty 5.	Watergate
MAIN IDEAS
6.	Saturday Night Massacre
7.	Camp David Accords
8.	Ayatollah Ruhollah Khomeini
9.	Rachel Carson
10. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA)
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
The Nixon Administration (pages 794-801)
1.	in what ways did President Nixon attempt to reform the federal government?
2.	How did Nixon try to combat stagflation?
Watergate: Nixon's Downfall (pages 802-807)
3.	In what ways did the participants in Watergate attempt to cover up the scandal?
4.	How did the Watergate scandal affect U.S. citizens’ trust in the federal government and its leaders?
The Ford and Carter Years (pages 810-817)
5.	What were Gerald Ford’s greatest successes as president?
6.	How did President Carter attempt to solve the energy crisis?
Environmental Activism (pages 820-825)
7.	What factors increased Americans’ concerns about environmental issues during the 1960s and 1970s?
8.	What was the impact of the Three Mile Island incident?
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one shown, identify one major development for each issue listed that occurred between 1968 and 1980. Indicate whether you think the impact of the development was positive (+) or negative (-). Issue	Development	Impact
Economic conditions		
Democratic government		
Efficient energy use		
Environmental protection		
ANALYZING EVENTS
Between 1972 and 1974, Americans were absorbed by the fall of President Nixon in the Watergate scandal. What might Americans have learned about the role of the executive office? Explain. INTERPRETING GRAPHS
Study the graph on page 813. Describe the changes in unemployment as compared to inflation from 1970 to 1980. VISUAL SUMMARY
An Age of Limits if
THE NIXON ADMINISTRATION
THE FORD ADMINISTRATION V THE CARTER ADMINISTRATION
Revenue sharing Law-and-order politics Integration delays Inflation, recession, and unemployment Opening to China Detente with the Soviet Union Watergate scandal Nixon resignation
Unelected president Nixon pardon
Whip Inflation Now program Economic recession Mayagiiez incident Helsinki Accords
Energy crisis Worsening inflation Panama Canal Treaties Camp David Accords Nuclear power Iran hostage crisis
826 Chapter 24
<
TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
>
Use the two graphs below and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 1.
Source: Annual Energy Review, 1999
1.	The OPEC oil embargo hit the United States so hard in 1973 because —
A domestic oil consumption decreased as production decreased.
B domestic oil consumption remained steady as production decreased.
C domestic oil consumption increased while production decreased slightly.
D domestic oil consumption increased, although consumption increased faster.
2.	How did Watergate affect the presidents who followed after Richard Nixon?
F
It caused them to be less trusted and less powerful. G
It made them reluctant to oppose Congress. H
It made them more popular with the media. J
It caused them to rely less on the counsel of cabinet members.
3.	Which of the following is a contribution made by Rachel Carson to the American environmental movement?
A
Carson researched “cleaner” sources of energy. B Carson lobbied for the passage of the National Energy Act.
C
Carson lobbied for making April 22, 1970, the first Earth Day. D
Carson published a book on the hazards of pesticide use. 71 hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests • Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
’’’J'WriteSmart
COLLABORATIVE LEA
Recall the issues that you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. Now that you’ve learned how your country’s highest office holder, President Nixon, lost the nation’s trust after the Watergate scandal, would you change your response? Discuss your suggestions with a small group. Then create a list, ranking the misuses from least to most severe. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your list.
XggfTURY
In a small group, discuss possible
environmental problems in each group
member’s neighborhood, listing them on a sheet of paper. Compare lists with other groups to determine the most common problems. List possible solutions for each problem.

Jpcus ON WRITING^
myWriteSmart

Based on what you have read in this chapter, write a paragraph that describes the American publics reaction to President Ford’s pardon of Richard Nixon. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your paragraph.
An Age of Limits 8!
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Creating Graphs and Charts
DEFINING THE SKILL
Charts and graphs are visual representations of information. (See Chapter 19 End-of-Chapter Skill Activity.) Three types of graphs are bar graphs, line graphs, and pie graphs. Use a bar graph to display information about quantities and to compare related quantities. Use a line graph to show a change in a single quantity over time. Use a pie graph to show relative proportions among parts of a single thing. Charts can be used to organize, condense, and summarize written information or lists. Often people use computer software to help create charts and graphs.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: CREATE A GRAPH
Choose the information that you wish to represent visually. After reading the following paragraph, a student created the bar graph below to compare American commuting choices between 1960 and 1990. The bar graph below shows how the information in the passage might be represented. American Commuting Choices, 1960-1990
In 1960,64% of the population traveled to work by car, truck, or van; 12% took public transportation; 7% worked at home; and 17% got to work by other means. In 1990,87% traveled to work by car, truck, or van; 5% took public transportation; 3% worked at home; and 5% went to work by other means.

100
1 30
150
25
© 10 0
				
				
				
				
-	►			
				
				
		r A		
	|%0			MCi
© 2/^
© I—Zl HTwcb/L	Wi
■I "TocA- -pJaljx ■I	kcrm^
CZ3
HTumUcL Cfthtfb nvwMv 
© Decide how best to represent information. Decide what kind of graph or chart will best represent your information. In this case, a student has created a bar graph because he is comparing information.
Q
Use a titie that sums up the information; include a time span. 0 Use clear labels. Label vertical and horizontal axes. Note dates and percentages. For this bar graph the vertical axis shows increasing quantities in the form of percentages. The horizontal axis indicates what is being compared. In this case, dates form the horizontal axis.
o If needed, add a legend to indicate the meaning of any colors or symbols. For some simple graphs a legend is not necessary. In this case, a legend helps a reader identify the data being compared.	'	&
827 SKI
STRATEGY. CREATE A CHART
The same statistical information that can be displayed visually in a graph can also often be presented in a chart. The chart below shows how the information in the same passage could be represented in this format. 2 American Commuting Choices, 1960 and 1990		
© Transportation	1960	1990
Used a car, truck, or van	64%	87%
Used public transportation	12%	5%
Worked at home	7%	3%
Traveled by other means	17%	5%
O
Decide how best to represent information. Decide how many rows and columns you need to represent your information. 0 Use a title that sums up the information; include a time span.
© Use clear labels. For a chart, label the rows and columns. Choose labels that express the content of each. Use rows to show different options used. In this case, percentages form the rows and dates form the columns.
APPLYING THE SKILL
Turn to Chapter 24, Section 4, page 813, and read the passage "The Economic Crisis Worsens" and examine the graph "Unemployment and Inflation, 1970-1980." This line graph traces changes in unemployment and inflation rates over the course of the decade. Use library or Internet resources to research the price of crude oil for the same time period. Create a chart that includes the unemployment rate, inflation rate, and crude oil prices. Then create a line graph tracking the crude oil data from 1970 to 1980.
1.	Decide how best to represent information.
Create both a graph and a chart.
2.	Use a title that sums up the information; include a time span.
What title best explains your graph and chart? Remember to add a time span.
3.	Use clear labels.
For your graph, how will you label the vertical and horizontal axes based on the information you want to present? What labels will you add to your table for each row and column?
4.	If needed, add a legend to Indicate the meaning of any colors or symbols.
Does your graph need a legend? Why or why not?
i!981j Sandra Day^ O’Connor becomes the first woman appointed to the Supreme Court.
SECTION 2: Conservative Policies Under Reagan and Bush
Main idea Presidents Reagan and Bush pursued a conservative agenda that included tax cuts, budget cuts, and increased defense spending.
SECTION 3: Social Concerns in the 1980s
Main Idea Beneath the surge of prosperity that marked the conservative era of the 1980s lay serious social problems.
SECTION 4: Foreign Policy After the Cold War
Main Idea The end of the Cold War, marked by the breakup of the Soviet Union in 1991, led to a redirection of many U.S. goals and policies.

119801 Ronald Reagan is elected president.
USA
WORLD
1980
1982
|l980j Zimbabwe claims independence.
1982 Great Britain and Argentina go to war over the Falkland Islands.
11984] South African Bishop Desmond Tutu receives the Nobel Peace Prize.
1984
828 Chapter 25
*
		
1986	1988	1990
1986 The Soviet Union suffers a disastrous accident at the Chernobyl nuclear power plant.
S'
[1989] The Chinese government kills student protesters in Tiananmen Square.
[1989] Germans dismantle the Berlin Wall.
A
Conservative Movement Emerges MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
Conservatism reached a high point with the election in 1980 of President Ronald Reagan and Vice-President George Bush.
In the early 21st century, conservative views strongly influenced both major political parties.
•	entitlement	• conservative
program	coalition
•	New Right	• Moral Majority
•affirmative action • Ronald Reagan
•	reverse discrimination

TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on conservative issues.
Peggy Noonan grew up with a strong sense of social and political justice. As a child, she idolized the liberal Kennedys; as a teenager, she devoured articles on social and political issues. After college, Noonan went to work for CBS.
Over the years, Noonan's political views became increasingly conservative. She eventually won a job as a speechwriter for Ronald Reagan, whose commitment to his conservative values moved her deeply. Noonan recalled that her response to Reagan was not unusual.
A
Personal Voice peggy noonan 44 The young people who came to Washington for the Reagan revolution came to make things better. . . . They looked at where freedom was and . . . where freedom wasn’t and what that did, and they wanted to help the guerrilla fighters who were trying to overthrow the Communist regimes that had been imposed on them. .. . The thing the young conservatives were always talking about,.. . was freedom, freedom:
we’ll free up more of your money we’ll free up more of the world, freedom freedom freedom—
It was the drumbeat that held a disparate group together, the rhythm that kept a fractious, not-made-in-heaven alliance in one piece. ”
Peggy Noonan
I
Saw at the Revolution: A Political Life in the Reagan Era Like millions of other Reagan supporters, Noonan agreed with the slogan that was the heart of Reagan's political creed: "Government is not the solution to our problem. Government is the problem."
The Conservative Movement Builds
Ever since Senator Barry Goldwater of Arizona had run for president in 1964, conservatives had argued that state governments, businesses, and individuals needed more freedom from the heavy hand of Washington, D.C. By 1980, government
830 Chapter 25
I
spending on entitlement programs—programs that provide guaranteed benefits to particular groups was nearly $300 billion annually. The costs together with stories of fraudulently-obtained benefits caused resentment among many taxpayers.
In addition, some people had become frustrated with the government's civil rights policies. Congress had passed the Civil Rights Act of 1964 in an effort to eliminate racial discrimination. Over the years, however, judicial decisions and government regulations had broadened the reach of the act. A growing number of Americans viewed with skepticism what had begun as a movement toward equal opportunity. Although many people had rejected separate schools for blacks and whites as unfair and unequal, few wanted to bus their children long distances to achieve a fixed ratio of black and white students.
▲
Several high school students in New York hold a prayer meeting in 1973.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
What was the agenda of the New Right?
THE NEW RIGHT
As the 1970s progressed, right-wing grass-roots groups across the country emerged to support and promote single issues that reflected their key interests. These people became known as the New Right. The New Right focused its energy on controversial social issues, such as opposing abortion, blocking the Equal Rights Amendment, and evading court-ordered busing. It also called for a return to school prayer, which had been outlawed by the Supreme Court in 1962. Many in the New Right criticized the policy of affirmative action. Affirmative action required employers and educational institutions to give special consideration to women, African Americans, and other minority groups, even though these people were not necessarily better qualified. Many conser-
vatives saw affirmative action as a form of reverse discrimination, favoring one group over another on the basis of race or gender. To members of the New Right, liberal positions on affirmative action and other issues represented an assault on traditional values.
THE CONSERVATIVE COALITION
Beginning in the mid-1960s, the conservative movement in the United States grew in strength. Eventually conservative groups formed the conservative coalition—an alliance of business leaders, middle-class voters, disaffected Democrats, and fundamentalist Christian groups. Conservative intellectuals argued the cause of the conservative coalition in newspapers such as The Wall Street Journal and magazines such as the National Review, founded in 1955 by conservative William F. Buckley, Jr. Conservative think tanks, such as the American Enterprise Institute and The Heritage Foundation, were founded to develop conservative policies and principles that would appeal to the majority of voters.
THE MORAL MAJORITY
Religion, especially evangelical Christianity, played a key role in the growing strength of the conservative coalition. The 1970s had brought a huge religious revival, especially among fundamentalist sects. Each week, millions of Americans watched evangelist preachers on television or listened to them on the radio. Two of the most influential televangelists were Jerry Falwell and Pat Robertson. Falwell formed an organization called the Moral Majority. The Moral Majority consisted mostly of evangelical and fundamentalist Christians who interpreted Goals of the Conservative Movement
•	Shrink the size of the federal government and reduce spending
•	Promote family values and patriotic ideals
•	Stimulate business by reducing government regulations and lowering taxes
•	Strengthen the national defense

The Conservative Tidi
the Bible literally and believed in absolute standards of right and wrong. They
condemned liberal attitudes and behaviors and argued for a restoration of tradi-
tional moral values. They worked toward their political goals by using direct-mail
campaigns and by raising money to support candidates. Jerry Falwell became the
spokesperson for the Moral Majority.
A
Personal Voice reverend jerry falwell 46 Our nation’s internal problems are the direct result of her spiritual condition. . . . Right living must be reestablished as an American way of life. . . . Now is the time to begin calling America back to God, back to the Bible, back to morality. ”
As individual conservative groups formed networks, they created a movement dedicated to bringing back what they saw as traditional 11 family values." They hoped their ideas would help to reduce the nation's high divorce rate, lower the number of out-of-wedlock births, encourage individual responsibility, and generally revive bygone prosperity and patriotic times.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
What were the main concerns of the Moral Majority?
RONALD REAGAN 1911-2004
Ronald Wilson Reagan was born in 1911 in Tampico, Illinois. He grew up in Dixon, Illinois, graduated from nearby Eureka College, and then worked as a sports announcer in Iowa. In 1937, Reagan moved to Hollywood and became a movie actor, eventually making more than 50 films. As president of the Screen Actors Guild, he worked actively to remove alleged Communist influences from the movie industry.
Reagan had the ability to express his ideas in simple and clear language that the average voter could understand. When he proposed a 10 percent cut in government spending on social programs, he stated, “We can lecture our children about extravagance until we run out of voice and breath. Or we can cure their extravagance by simply reducing their allowance.”
Conservatives Win
Political Power
In 1976, Ronald Reagan lost the Republican nomination to the incumbent, Gerald Ford, in a very closely contested race. Four years later in a series of hard-fought primaries, Reagan won the 1980 nomination and chose George H. W. Bush as his running mate. Reagan and Bush ran against the incumbent president and vice-president, Jimmy Carter and Walter Mondale, who were nominated again by the Democrats despite their low standing in the polls.
REAGAN’S QUALIFICATIONS
Originally a New Deal Democrat, Ronald Reagan had become a conservative Republican during the 1950s. He claimed that he had not left the Democratic Party but rather that the party had left him. As a spokesman for General Electric, he toured the country making speeches in favor of free enterprise and against big government. In 1964, he campaigned hard for Barry Goldwater, the Republican candidate for president. His speech supporting Goldwater in October 1964 made Reagan a serious candidate for public office. In 1966, Reagan was elected governor of California, and in 1970, he was reelected. THE 1980 PRESIDENTIAL ELECTION In 1980, Reagan ran on a number of key issues. Supreme Court decisions on abortion, pornography, the teaching of evolution, and prayer in public schools all concerned conservative voters, and they rallied to Reagan. The prolonged Iranian hostage crisis and the weak economy under Carter, particularly the high rate of inflation, also helped Reagan.
Thanks in part to his acting career and his long experience in the public eye, Reagan was an extremely effective candidate. In contrast to Carter, who often seemed stiff and nervous, Reagan was relaxed, charming, and affable. He loved making quips: "A recession is when your neighbor loses his job. A depression is when you lose yours. And recovery is
832 Chapter 25
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
What factors led to Reagan’s victory in 1980?
when Jimmy Carter loses his." Reagan's long-standing skill at simplifying issues and presenting clear-cut answers led his supporters to call him the Great Communicator. Also, his commitment to military and economic strength appealed to many Americans.
Only 52.6 percent of American voters went to the polls in 1980. Reagan won the election by a narrow majority; he got 44 million votes, or 51 percent of the total. His support, however, was spread throughout the country, so that he carried 44 states and won 489 electoral votes. Republicans also gained control of the Senate for the first time since 1954. As Reagan assumed the presidency, many people were buoyed by his genial smile and his assertion that it was "morning again in America." C>
Now, conservatives had elected one of their own—a true believer in less government, lower taxes, and traditional values. Once elected, Reagan worked to translate the conservative agenda into public policy.
Presidential Election of 1980			
Party	Candidate	Electoral Votes	Popular Votes
® Republican	Ronald Reagan	489	43,904,153
Democratic	Jimmy Carter	49	35,483,883
Independent	John Anderson		5,720,060
11 Alaska [J Hawaii
3] District of Columbia
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Location Which states and/or district voted for Jimmy Carter in 1980?
2.	Region Which region of the country—North, South, East, or West—voted exclusively for Ronald Reagan?
iA
W \ ASSESSMENT
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name below, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•entitlement program	• affirmative action	•conservative coalition	• Ronald Reagan
•New Right	•reverse discrimination	• Moral Majority
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Use a cluster diagram to record the
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING MOTIVES
How did the leaders of the conservative movement of the 1980s want to change government?
Think About:
•	the difference between the conservative view of government and the liberal view
•	the groups that made up the conservative coalition
•	conservatives’ attitudes toward existing government programs
ANALYZING EFFECTS
What role did the Moral Majority play in the conservative movement of the 1970s and early 1980s?
EVALUATING LEADERSHIP
What personal qualities in Ronald Reagan helped him to win election as president in 1980?
Choose one issue and explain in a
paragraph the conservative position
on that issue.
The Conservative Tide
Conservative Policies Under Reagan and Bush
MAIN IDEA
WHY IIT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
Presidents Reagan and Bush pursued a conservative agenda that included tax cuts, budget cuts, and increased defense spending.
The conservative views of Reagan and Bush created policies and priorities that affect government spending and budgeting today.
• Reaganomics •supply-side economics •Strategic Defense Initiative •Sandra Day O’Connor
'deregulation »Environmental Protection Agency (EPA)
* Geraldine Ferraro 'George Bush
OneAmerican'sStdry
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the effects of Reagan’s economic policies.
President Ronald Reagan
Throughout the 1980 presidential campaign and in the early days of his administration, President Reagan emphasized the perilous state of the economy during the Carter administration. In a speech to the nation on February 5,
1981—his first televised speech from the White House—
Reagan announced his new economic program. He called for a reduction in income tax rates for individuals and a big reduction in government spending.
A
Personal Voice ronald reagan “ I’m speaking to you tonight to give you a report on the state of our nation’s economy. I regret to say that we’re in the worst economic mess since the Great Depression. . . . It’s time to recognize that we’ve come to a turning point. We’re threatened with an economic calamity of tremendous proportions, and the old business-as-usual treatment can’t save us. Together, we must chart a different course. ”
—televised speech to the nation, February 5,1981
President Reagan would deal with these problems by consistently stressing a sweeping package of new economic policies. These economic policies, dubbed “Reaganomics," consisted of three parts: (1) budget cuts, (2) tax cuts, and (3) increased defense spending.
“Reaganomics” Takes Over
As soon as Reagan took office, he worked to reduce the size and influence of the federal government, which, he thought, would encourage private investment. Because people were anxious about the economy in 1980, their concern opened the door for new approaches to taxes and the federal budget.
834 Chapter 25
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
What are the main ideas of supply-side economics?
DGET CUTS
Reagan's strategy for downsizing the federal government included eep cuts in government spending on social programs. Yet his cuts did not affect a segments of the population equally. Entitlement programs that benefited the middle class, such as Social Security, Medicare, and veterans' pensions, remained intact. On the other hand, Congress slashed by 10 percent the budget for programs that benefited other groups: urban mass transit, food stamps, welfare benefits, job training, Medicaid, school lunches, and student loans.
TAX CUTS
"Reaganomics" rested heavily upon supply-side economics. This theory held that if people paid fewer taxes, they would save more money. Banks could then loan that money to businesses, which could invest the money in resources to improve productivity. The supply of goods then would increase, driving down prices. At Reagan's urging, Congress lowered income taxes by about 25 percent over a three-year period. Reagan based his ideas for supply-side economics on the work of economists such as George Gilder and Arthur Laffer, Aj A
Personal Voice Arthur laffer “The most debilitating act a government can perpetrate on its citizens is to adopt policies that destroy the economy’s production base, for it is the production base that generates any prosperity to be found in the society. U.S. tax policies over the last decade have had the effect of damaging this base by removing many of the Incentives to economic advancement. It is necessary to restore those incentives if we are to cure our economic palsy. ”
—The Economics of the Tax Revolt: A Reader
INCREASED DEFENSE SPENDING
At the same time, Reagan authorized increases in military spending that more than offset cuts in social programs. Between 1981 and 1984, the Defense Department budget almost doubled. Indeed, the president revived two controversial weapons systems—the MX missile and the B-l bomber. In 1983, Reagan asked the country's scientists to develop a defense system that would keep Americans safe from enemy missiles. Officially called the Strategic Defense Initiative, or SDI, the system quickly became known as Star Wars, after the title of a popular movie. The Defense Department estimated that the system would cost trillions of dollars.
RECESSION AND RECOVERY
While Reagan was charting a new course for the American economy, the economy itself was sinking into recession. Lasting from July 1981 until November 1982, it was the most severe recession since the Great Depression. However, early in 1983, an economic upturn began as consumers went on a spending spree. Their confidence in the economy was bolstered by tax cuts, a decline in interest rates, and lower inflation. The stock market surged, unemployment declined, and the gross national product went up by almost 10 percent. The stock market boom lasted until 1987, when the market crashed, losing 508 points in one day. This fall was due in large part to automated and computerized buying and selling systems. However, the market recovered and then continued its upward climb. THE NATIONAL DEBT CLIMBS
Beneath the surface of recovery lay problems that continued to plague the economy.
Tax cuts had helped the rich, while social welfare cuts had
hurt the poor. Despite large reductions in parts of the
BACKGROUND
THE “TRICKLE-DOWN” THEORY
Ronald Reagan’s budget director, David Stockman, used supply-side economics to draft the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981. His tax package cut income taxes and business taxes by an average of 25 percent; the largest tax cuts went to those with the highest incomes. Administration officials defended the plan by claiming that as prosperity returned, the profits at the top would trickle down to the middle class and even the poor.
Despite Reagan’s “trickle-down” theory, the wealthy gained the most from these tax cuts. In the 1980s, the rich got richer as poverty deepened for many others.
The Conservative Tide
Analyzing
Political Cartoons
)
INFLATION STAGECOACH”
During Reagan’s first term, federal spending far outstripped federal revenue and created a huge budget deficit. In this cartoon, Reagan (with budget director David Stockman sitting beside him on the inflation stagecoach) sees something that “shouldn’t be there.”
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons
1.	What is the meaning of the wheel flying off the stagecoach?
2.	Whom do the passengers inside the stagecoach represent?
MAIN IDEA
Anita Hill and Clarence Thomas testify before the Senate Judiciary Committee in October 1991.
▼
budget, federal spending still outstripped federal revenue. Budget deficits were growing. Even though Reagan backed away from supply-side economics in 1982 and imposed new taxes, they were not enough to balance the budget. By the end of his first term, the national debt had almost doubled. B>
Judicial Power Shifts to the Right
One of the most important ways in which Reagan accomplished his conservative goals was through his appointments to the Supreme Court. Reagan nominated Sandra Day O'Connor, Antonin Scalia, and Anthony M. Kennedy to fill seats left by retiring judges. O'Connor was the first woman to be appointed to the Court. He also nominated Justice William Rehnquist, the most conservative justice on the court at the time, to the position of chief justice.
President Bush later made the Court even more conservative when David H. Souter replaced retiring justice William Brennan. Bush also nominated Clarence Thomas to take the place of Thurgood Marshall. However, controversy exploded when law professor Anita Hill testified that Thomas had sexually harassed her when she worked for him in the 1980s. During several days of televised Senate hearings, committee members questioned Thomas, Hill, and witnesses for each side. Thomas eventually won approval by a final vote of 52 to 48.
The Reagan and Bush appointments to the Supreme Court ended the liberal control over the Court that had begun under Franklin Roosevelt. These appointments became increasingly significant as the Court revisited constitutional issues related to such topics as discrimination, abortion, and affirmative action. In 1989, the Court, in a series of rulings, restricted a woman's right to an abortion. The Court also imposed new restrictions on civil rights laws that had been designed to protect the rights of women and minorities. During the 1990-1991 session, the Court narrowed the rights of arrested persons.
Analyzing
Effects
What were some of the effects of “Reaganomics'"
836 Chapter 25
Deregulating the Economy
Reagan achieved one of his most important objectives—reducing the size and power of the federal government—in part by cutting federal entitlement programs but also through deregulation, the cutting back of federal regulation of industry. As part of his campaign for smaller government, he removed price controls on oil and eliminated federal health and safety inspections for nursing homes. He deregulated the airline industry (allowing airlines to abandon unprofitable air routes) and the savings and loan industry. One of the positive results of this deregulation was that it increased competition and often resulted in lower prices for consumers.
In a further effort at deregulation, President Reagan cut the budget of the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA), which had been established in 1970 to fight pollution and conserve natural resources.
He ignored pleas from Canada to reduce acid rain and appointed opponents of the regulations to enforce them.
For example, James Watt, Reagan's secretary of the interior, sold millions of acres of public land to private developers— often at bargain prices. He opened the continental shelf to oil and gas drilling, which many people thought posed environmental risks. Watt also encouraged timber cutting in national forests and eased restrictions on coal mining.
a
HISTORY
VIDEO
President Reagan Shot
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT
Conservative Victories
in 1984 and 1988
It was clear by 1984 that Reagan had forged a large coalition of conservative voters who highly approved of his policies. These voters included the following:
•	businesspeople—who wanted to deregulate the economy
•	Southerners—who welcomed the limits on federal power
•	Westerners—who resented federal controls on mining and grazing
•	Reagan Democrats—who agreed with Reagan on limiting federal government and thought that the Democratic Party had drifted too far to the left
THE 1984 PRESIDENTIAL ELECTION In 1984, Reagan and Bush won the Republican nominations for reelection without challenge. Walter Mondale, who had been vice-president under President Carter, won the Democratic Party's nomination and chose Representative Geraldine Ferraro of New York as his running mate. Ferraro became the first woman on a major party's presidential ticket.
In 1984 the economy was strong. Reagan and Bush won by a landslide, carrying every state but Mondale's home state of Minnesota and the District of Columbia.
AN ASSASSINATION ATTEMPT
On March 30,1981, President Reagan and other members of his staff were shot by a mentally unbalanced man named John Hinckley, Jr. While being wheeled into surgery to have a bullet removed, the president said to his wife, “Honey, I forgot to duck” (a line first used by boxer Jack Dempsey in the 1920s, after losing his heavyweight title). In the operating room, Reagan said to the team of surgeons, “I hope you fellas are Republicans.” Reagan recovered speedily and his popularity grew.
▲
President Reagan is pushed into a presidential limousine
after being shot by a deranged man.
The Conservative Tide 8
F
<4 George Bush announces his presidential candidacy at a rally in 1987.
THE 1988 PRESIDENTIAL ELECTION
In 1988, a majority of Americans were economically comfortable, and they attributed their comfort to Reagan and Bush. When Michael Dukakis, the Democratic governor of Massachusetts, ran for the presidency in 1988 against George Bush, Reagan's vice-president, most voters saw little reason for change.
George Bush simply built on President Reagan's legacy by promising, "Read my lips: no new taxes" in his acceptance speech at the Republican Convention. He
stressed his commitment to the conservative ideas of the Moral Majority. Though Bush asserted that he wanted a "kinder, gentler nation," his campaign sponsored a number of negative "attack ads" aimed at his opponents. He told audiences that Dukakis was an ultraliberal whose views were
outside the mainstream of American values. In particular, Bush suggested that Dukakis was soft on crime and unpatriotic.
Some commentators believed that the negative ads contributed to the lowest voter turnout in 64 years. Only half of the eligible voters went to the polls in 1988. Fifty-three percent voted for George Bush, who won 426 electoral votes. Bush's electoral victory was viewed, as Reagan's had been, as a mandate for conservative social and political policies.
“ Read my lips: no new taxes. GEORGE BUSH
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
What factors contributed to Reagan’s victory in 1984 and Bush’s victory in 1988?
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name below, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•Reaganomics	•Sandra Day O’Connor	•Environmental Protection • George Bush
•supply-side economics •deregulation	Agency (EPA)
•Strategic Defense Initiative	•Geraldine Ferraro
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Use a diagram like the one below to explore the effects of “Reaganomics.”
Explain in a paragraph whether you think “Reaganomics” was good or bad for the economy.
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING MOTIVES
Why did President Reagan and President Bush think it was important to appoint conservative justices to the Supreme Court?
4.	EVALUATING
In your opinion, was Reagan’s first term a success? Think About:
•	how his tax cuts impacted the rich and the poor
•	the economy
•	the federal budget
ANALYZING PRIMARY SOURCES
Read the following excerpt from Ronald Reagan’s speech at the 1992 Republican Convention.
“We mustn’t forget... the very different America that existed just 12 years ago; an America with 21 percent interest rates and . . . double-digit inflation; an America where mortgage payments doubled, paychecks plunged, and motorists sat in gas lines; an America whose leaders told us . . . that what we really needed was another good dose of government control and higher taxes. ”
What picture did Reagan paint of the
Carter administration?
838 Chapter 25
TEKS10F, 13A, 260,31 B
Social Concerns
in the 1980s
NIDEA	f WHY IT MATTERS NOW I * Terms&liames
Beneath the surge of prosperity that marked the conservative era of the 1980s lay serious social problems.
Issues involving health care,	•AIDS (acquired	•L Douglas Wilder
education, civil rights, and equal	immune	•Jesse Jackson
rights for women continue to	deficiency	• Lauro Cavazos
challenge American society.	syndrome)	•Antonia Coello
	•pay equity	Novello

yp hmhsocialstudies.com
■ IflKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on social problems and government responses during the Reagan and Bush years.
Trevor Ferrell lived an ordinary life in Gladwyne, an affluent suburb 12 miles from downtown Philadelphia. Trevor had brothers and sisters, his own room, a favorite pillow, a fondness for video games, and a bike. In short, he seemed like a typical 11-year-old boy until he watched a television news report about homeless people.
Trevor was astonished. "Do people really live like that?" he asked his parents. "I thought they lived like that in India, but not here, I mean in America." Trevor convinced his parents to drive downtown that night, where he gave a pillow and a blanket to the first homeless man he saw. Soon he and his family were collecting food and clothes to give to the homeless.
A
Personal Voice trevor ferrell “They have to live on the streets, and right after you see one of them, you see somebody in a limousine pull up to a huge, empty mansion. It’s such a difference. Some people can get anything they want, and these other people couldn’t get a penny if they needed one. ”
Trevor Ferrell offers clothes to a homeless person in Philadelphia, 1983.
—quoted in Trevor’s Place
As Trevor saw, the restored American economy of the 1980s did not mean renewed prosperity for everyone. As Presidents Reagan and Bush pursued conservative domestic policies, people disagreed about the impact of these policies.
Health, Education, and Cities in Crisis
In the 1980s, both in the cities and in rural and suburban areas, local governments strove to deal with crises in health, education, and safety. Americans directed their attention to issues such as AIDS, drug abuse, abortion, and education.
The Conservative Tide
The AIDS quilt was displayed on the National Mall in Washington, D.C., in 1987. Each panel honors a person who died of AIDS.

AIDS WORLDWIDE
In the year 2008, it was estimated that 2.7 million people worldwide became infected with HIV/AIDS. Impoverished countries that lie in sub-Saharan Africa remain hardest hit by the deadly pandemic, accounting for an estimated 1.9 million, or 70 percent, of new cases during the year. At the end of 2008, the number of adults and children living with HIV/AIDS worldwide was estimated at 33.4 million people, of whom the proportions of males and females were almost equal.
increasing numbers grew, so did concern
HEALTH ISSUES
One of the most troubling issues that concerned Americans in the 1980s was AIDS (acquired immune deficiency syndrome). Possibly beginning as early as the 1960s, AIDS spread rapidly throughout the world. Caused by a virus that destroys the immune system, AIDS weakens the body so that it is prone to infections and normally rare cancers. AIDS is transmitted through bodily fluids, and most of the early victims of the disease were either homosexual men or intravenous drug users who shared needles. However, many people also contracted AIDS through contaminated blood transfusions, and children acquired it by being born to infected mothers. As the 1980s progressed, of heterosexuals began contracting AIDS. As the epidemic over prevention and cure.
ABORTION
Many Americans were concerned about abortion in the 1980s. Abortion had been legal in the United States since 1973, when the Supreme Court ruled in Roe v. Wade that first-trimester abortions were protected by a woman's right to privacy. Opponents of legalized abortion quickly organized under the pro-life banner. They argued that human life begins at conception and that no woman has the right to terminate a human life by her individual decision. Proponents of legalized abortion described themselves as pro-choice. They argued that reproductive choices were personal health-care matters and noted that many women had died from abortions performed by unskilled people in unsterile settings before the procedure was legalized. In July 1989, the Supreme Court ruled in Webster v. Reproductive Health Care Services that states had the right to impose new restrictions on abortion. As a result, abortion restrictions varied from state to state.
Contrasting
jy What are the two viewpoints on legalized abortion?
840 Chapter 25
IN THE WAR ON DRUGS
DRUG ABUSE
Battles over abortion rights sometimes competed “Just suy U()!" for public attention with concerns about rising drug abuse. A few nancy reagan, slogan
people argued that drugs should be legalized to reduce the power
of gangs who made a living selling illegal drugs. Others called for treatment facilities to treat addictions. The Reagan administration launched a war on drugs and supported moves to prosecute users as well as dealers. First Lady Nancy Reagan toured the country with an antidrug campaign that admonished students to "Just say no!" to drugs.
MAIN IDEA
Identifying
Problems
B/
What problems in education emerged during the 1980s? EDUCATION
Education became another issue that stirred people's concerns. In 1983, a federal commission issued a report on education titled A Nation at Risk. The report revealed that American students lagged behind students in most other industrialized nations. In addition, the report stated that 23 million Americans were unable to follow an instruction manual or fill out a job application form. The commission's findings touched off a debate about the quality of education. The commission recommended more homework, longer school days, and an extended school year. It also promoted increased pay and merit raises for teachers, as well as a greater emphasis on basic subjects such as English, math, science, social studies, and computer science.
In April 1991, President Bush announced an education initiative, "America 2000." He argued that choice was the salvation of American schools and recommended allowing parents to use public funds to send their children to schools of their choice—public, private, or religious. First Lady Barbara Bush toured the country to promote reading and writing skills.
THE URBAN CRISIS
The crisis in education was closely connected to the crisis in the cities. Many undereducated students lived in cities such as Baltimore, Chicago, Detroit, Philadelphia, and Washington, D.C. During the 1970s, the United States had become increasingly suburbanized as more and more white families responded to the lure of new homes, big lawns, shopping malls, and well-equipped schools outside the cities. Businesses moved, too, taking jobs and tax revenue with them. Poor people and racial minorities were often left in cities burdened by high unemployment rates, crumbling infrastructures, inadequate funds for sanitation and health services, deteriorating schools, and growing social problems. By 1992, thousands of people were homeless, including many families with children. Cities were increasingly divided into wealthy neighborhoods and poverty-stricken areas.
One poverty-stricken area, south-central Los Angeles (which had erupted in violence in 1965 and 1968) erupted again in 1992. Four white police officers had been videotaped beating an African-American man named Rodney King who had been fleeing from the officers in a speeding car. An all-white jury found the officers not guilty on charges of brutality. This verdict resulted in riots that lasted five days and caused the deaths of 53 people.
DIFFICULT
SENDING MONEY INTO SPACE
Under the Reagan administration, the government shifted the emphasis of the space program from scientific to military and commercial applications.
Beginning in 1981, NASA directed a series of space shuttle flights. The agency hoped to establish a space station and have the shuttle ferry workers and materials to it.
The explosion of the space shuttle Challenger in 1986 in which the crew was killed (crew shown above) caused a reexamination of ventures into space. Many people thought the money spent on space should be spent on social needs.
1.	Should the federal government spend money on space exploration when so many American citizens require basic assistance?
2.	If you were a legislator being asked to vote in favor of funding space exploration today, how would you vote? Why?
The Equal Rights Struggle
Within this environment of dwindling resources and social struggle, women
worked to achieve economic and social gains.
Geraldine Ferraro speaks at the 1984 Democratic Convention.
POLITICAL LOSSES AND GAINS
During the early 1980s, women's rights activists worked to obtain ratification of the Equal Rights Amendment (ERA). Although Congress had passed the amendment in 1972, it had not yet been ratified, or approved, by three-fourths of the states. Supporters of the amendment had until June 30, 1982, to gain ratification from 38 states. They obtained only 35 of the 38 ratifications they needed, and the ERA did not become law. With the failure of the Equal Rights Amendment, women's organizations began to concentrate on electing women to public office. More women candidates began to run for office, and in 1984 the Democrats chose Geraldine Ferraro as their vice-presidential candidate. She had spoken of the necessity for women to continue working for equal opportunities in American society. A
Personal Voice geraldine ferraro “It is not just those of us who have reached the top who are fighting this daily battle. It is a fight in which all of us—rich and poor, career and home oriented, young and old—participate, simply because we are women. ” —quoted in Vital Speeches of the Day
Women’s and Men’s Average Yearly Earnings in Selected Careers, 1982
Career	Women	Men
Accountant	$19,916	$25,272
Advertising Manager	19,396	32,292
Computer Operator	13,728	17,992
Cook	8,476	9,880
Engineer	26,052	31,460
Financial Manager	19,136	30,004
High School Teacher	18,980	21,424
Insurance Salesperson	15,236	22,152
Lawyer	30,264	34,008
Personnel Specialist	17,836	26,832
Physician	21,944	26,884
Police/ Detective	15,548	20,072
Real Estate Salesperson	16,432	24,076
Registered Nurse	20,592	20,696
Retail Sales Worker	8,736	13,728
Social Worker	15,600	20,436
University Professor	20,748	26,832
Source: Bureau of Labor Statistics, Current Population Survey 1983-1989.
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Charts 1.	Name one career that paid men and women almost equally.
2.	What conclusion can you draw from this chart?
In the November 1992 election, the number of women in the House of Representatives increased from 23 to 47, and the number of women senators tripled—from two to six. President Reagan also had earlier named two women to his cabinet: In 1983, Elizabeth Dole became secretary of transportation, and Margaret Heckler became secretary of health and human services. Nevertheless, women remained underrepresented in political affairs.
INEQUALITY
Several factors contributed to what some called the "feminization of poverty." By 1992, 57.8 percent of the nation's women were part of the work force, and a growing percentage of women worked as professionals and managers. However, in that year women earned only about 75 cents for every dollar men earned. Female college graduates earned only slightly more than male high-school graduates. Also, about 31 percent of female heads of households lived in poverty, and among African-American women, the poverty rate was even higher. New trends in divorce settlements aggravated the situation. Because of no-fault divorce, fewer women won alimony payments, and the courts rarely enforced the meager child support payments they awarded. To close the income gap that left so many women poor, women's organizations and unions proposed a system of pay equity. Jobs would
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
£/ What steps did women take to help them move forward after the ERA failed to pass?
842 Chapter 25
1
Hi')
I MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
D;
What gains did women make during the 1980s and early 1990s? j MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
E^
What political gains did African Americans make during the 1980s? be rated on the basis of the amount of education they required, the amount of physical strength needed to perform them, and the number of people that an employee supervised. Instead of relying on traditional pay scales, employers would establish pay rates that reflected each job's requirements. By 1989, 20 states had begun adjusting government jobs to offer pay equity for jobs of comparable worth.
Women also fought for improvements in the workplace. Since many working women headed single-parent households or had children under the age of six, they pressed for family benefits. Government and corporate benefit packages began to include maternity leaves, flexible hours and workweeks, job sharing, and work-at-home arrangements. Some of these changes were launched by individual firms, while others required government intervention. Yet the Reagan administration sharply cut the budget for daycare and other similar programs. D;
The Fight for Rights Continues
Cuts in government programs and the backlash against civil rights initiatives, such as affirmative action, affected other groups as well.
AFRICAN AMERICANS
African Americans made striking political gains during the 1980s, even though their economic progress suffered. By the mid-1980s, African-American mayors governed many cities, including Los Angeles, Detroit, Chicago, Atlanta, New Orleans, Philadelphia, and Washington, D.C. Hundreds of communities in both the North and the South had elected African Americans to serve as sheriffs, school board members, state legislators, and members of Congress. In 1990, L. Douglas Wilder of Virginia became the nation's first African-American governor. The Reverend Jesse Jackson ran for the Democratic presidential nomination in 1984 and 1988.
Middle-class African Americans often held professional and managerial positions.
But the poor faced an uncertain future of diminishing opportunities. In 1989, the newly conservative Supreme Court handed down a series of decisions that continued to change the nation's course on civil rights. In the case of Richmond v. J. A. Croson Company, for example, the Court further limited the scope of affirmative action, policies that were designed to correct the effects of discrimination in the employment or education of minority groups or women. Other decisions by the Court outlawed contracts
set aside for minority businesses. Sylvester Monroe, an African-American correspondent for Newsweek magazine, commented on the way in which some African Americans saw the backlash against affirmative action, jy A Personal Voice Sylvester monroe
“There’s a finite pie and everybody wants his piece. Everybody is afraid of losing his piece of the pie. That’s what the fight against affirmative action is all about. People feel threatened. As for blacks, they’re passe. They’re not In any more. Nobody wants to talk about race.
—quoted in The Great Divide
I
H
s
▲
Jesse Jackson campaigns for the Democratic presidential nomination in 1984.
The Conservative l it
▲
Dr. Antonia Coello Novello served as surgeon general under President George Bush.
Vocabulary demographer: a
person who studies the characteristics of human population, such as growth, density, and distribution
GAINS FOR LATINOS
Latinos became the fastest growing minority during the 1980s. By 1990, they constituted almost nine percent of the population, and demographers estimated that Latinos would soon outnumber African Americans as the nation's largest minority group. About two out of three Latinos were Mexican Americans, who lived mostly in the Southwest. A Puerto Rican community thrived in the Northeast, and a Cuban population was concentrated in Florida. Like African Americans, Latinos gained political power during the 1980s. Toney Anaya became governor of New Mexico, while Robert Martinez became governor of Florida. In August 1988, President Reagan appointed Lauro Cavazos as secretary of education. In 1990, President Bush named Dr. Antonia Coello Novello to the post of surgeon general.
Many Latinos supported bilingual education. They feared that abandoning Spanish would weaken their distinctive culture. In the words of Daniel Villanueva, a television executive, "We want to be here, but without losing our language and our culture. They are a richness, a treasure that we don't care to lose.'' The Bilingual Education Act of 1968 and the 1975 amendent to the Voting Rights Act enabled Spanish speakers to attend school and vote in their own language, but by the mid-1980s opposition to bilingualism was rising. Critics argued that it slowed the rate at which Spanish-speaking people entered mainstream American life. They also feared that the nation would become split between English speakers and Spanish speakers.
AFFIRMATIVE ACTION
Affirmative action refers to the effort to provide education and employment opportunities for historically disadvantaged groups, such as women and racial and ethnic minorities. The federal government first instituted affirmative action policies under the Civil Rights Act of 1964.
Presidents Reagan and Bush actively opposed affirmative action and racial quotas.Today the future of affirmative action is uncertain.
In 2001, President Bush expressed support for equal opportunity, but his first attorney general, John Ashcroft, was denounced by civil rights groups, in part because of his anti-affirmative action record. In 2003 the Supreme Court protected the University of Michigan’s race-conscious admissions policy. But in 2007, initiative campaigns to prohibit affirmative action were active in several states.
NATIVE AMERICANS SPEAK OUT
Native Americans also became more self-conscious of their dignity and more demanding of their rights. In the 1970s, they organized schools to teach young Native Americans about their past. They also began to fight for the return of ancestral lands wrongfully taken from them. During the 1980s, the Reagan administration slashed aid to Native Americans for health, education, and other services. Driven to find new sources of revenue, Native Americans campaigned for gambling casinos on their land as a way to bring in money. After the Supreme Court ruled in favor of Native Americans, many tribes opened Las Vegas-style casinos, which provided additional funding for the tribes that operated them. Nonetheless, the long-term problems faced by Native Americans have not been solved by gambling casinos, although the new wealth has helped to some extent.
AN EXPANDING ASIAN-AMERICAN POPULATION
Asian Americans were the second fastest growing minority in the United States during the 1980s. By 1982, the U.S. population included about 8.3 million Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders. Asian Americans constituted 3.25 percent of the population. Some have cited Asian Americans as an example of how minorities can succeed in the U.S. Yet while Asian Americans have low crime rates, low school dropout rates, and low divorce rates, Asian-American unemployment and poverty have been higher than the national figures.
MAIN IDEA
Identifying
Problems
JF/
What problems did Native Americans face in the 1980s? 844 Chapter 25
THE GAY RIGHTS MOVEMENT ADVANCES
During the 1970s and 1980s, gay men and lesbians began to fight openly for civil rights. While the gay rights movement suffered a setback during the early 1980s in the face of conservative opposition and the AIDS crisis, by the late 1980s and early 1990s a new surge of gay activism was under way in the country Direct action groups sprang up throughout the country, calling for an end to anti-gay discrimination. Although several speakers at the 1992 Republican National Convention condemned gay activism, these speakers were unable to slow the pace of change. By the year 1993, seven states and 110 communities had outlawed such discrimination. ◄ A gay rights march in Washington, D.C., October 1987
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name below, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•AIDS (acquired immune	*pay equity	'Jesse Jackson	•Antonia Coello Novello
deficiency syndrome)	*L. Douglas Wilder	• Lauro Cavazos
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Use a chart like the one below to list some of the social problems of the Reagan and Bush years and how the government responded to them.
CRITICAL THINKING
PREDICTING EFFECTS
How might improvements in the educational system help solve other social problems? Think About:
•	the impact education might have on health-related problems
•	the impact that education might have on urban problems
•	the impact that education might have on unemployment
4.	SUMMARIZING
Identify the political and economic
contributions of women to American
society in the 1980s.
5.	COMPARING
Compare the political gains and losses experienced by various groups during the Reagan and Bush administrations.
FORMING GENERALIZATIONS
Why might a widening gap between the richest and poorest citizens of a country be a cause for concern about that country’s future?
Choose one issue and write other
responses the government might
have made.
The Conservative Tide
GEOGRAPHY SPOTLIGHT
From Rust Belt to Sun Belt
Migration within the United States led to changing demographic patterns. Many Americans left the North Central and Northeast regions, which came to be called the Rust Belt because many of their aging factories had been closed. These people moved to the South and Southwest, which became known as the Sun Belt, due to their warm climate. In the postwar decades, the Sun Belt experienced an increase in job opportunities that attracted many new residents. People also appreciated that these areas typically had a lower cost of living. And, with the widespread availability of air conditioning, living in these states became more practical.
As people move from state to state, and from region to region, they gradually transform the balance of political and economic power in the nation. Each census in recent times has recorded how certain states have gained population and others have lost population. If the gains or losses are large enough, a state's representation in the U.S. House of Representatives will increase or decrease commensurately. The movement from the Rust Belt to the Sun Belt has caused a shift in political power within the United States.
REGIONAL EXCHANGES
Between 1970 and 1975, the population center of the United States, which had generally moved westward for 17 decades, suddenly moved southward as well. The arrows show the net number of Americans who migrated and their patterns of migration in the early 1970s. The West gained 311,000 from the Northeast plus 472,000 from the North Central region, for a total of 783,000 people. However, it also lost 75,000 people to the South. During the 1980s and 1990s the southward and westward shift continued.
(below) Housing development near Danville, California, 1990
846 Chapter 25
Americans on the Move, 1990-2000
Between 1990 and 2000, our country’s population grew by a record 32.7 million people to 281.4 million. For the first time in the 20th century, all 50 states gained people between census years. But because of internal migration (see graph below) and other factors, 10 states lost and 8 states gained seats in the 2000 Congressional apportionment.
I... I
Population increase > 1 million E~~~23
Population increase < 100,000 Net gain/loss from domestic 5'6'1 2 * * 5 migration +1 Gain in apportioned Representatives -1 Loss in apportioned Representatives
MO.
101,020
ILL.
-560,003
-1
TENN„
356,907
ALA.
112,163
MONTANA
47,875
NEBRASKA
-3,693
CALIFORNIA
Despite a net loss through migration to other states of 2 million people in the 1990s, international immigrants and in-state births gave California the greatest net increase in population among the 50 states. NEVADA
There has been such a large influx of people since 1945 that building houses for newcomers has become a major industry in Nevada. MINN.
86,847
IOWA
-15,542
MASS.
244,494
R.l.-63,250 4^ CONN.
N.J. -226,370-1 -378,495
DEL. 35,058 MD. -55,060
WASHINGTON, D.C.
While all 50 states gained in population during the decade, the population of Washington, D.C., decreased by nearly 6 percent.
TEXAS
During the 1990s, Texas eclipsed New York to become the nation’s second-most populous state behind California. Sixty percent of the Texas increase has been driven by Hispanic growth. FLORIDA
During the 1990s, Florida’s population increased 23.5 percent, making it the nation’s fourth-largest. With so many new residents, Florida gained two additional House seats, bringing its congressional delegation to 25. Gain
Source: U.S. Census Bureau
THINKING CRITICALLY
1.	Analyzing Distributions Which states lost the most people between 1990 and 2000? Which states gained the most people?
2.	Creating a Graph Choose one of the most populous states and then pose a historical question about population in that state. Create a graph or graphs that
show various aspects of population for the state you have chosen. Be sure that the graph(s) help to answer
the question you posed. Then display the graph(s) and
the question in the classroom.
hmhsocialstudies.com
I RESEARCH WEB LINKS
The Conservative Tidi
TEKS2D, 10B, 1OD, 11A
Foreign Policy After the Cold War
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
•Tiananmen
Square
•Sandinistas • Contras •Operation Desert Storm
The end of the Cold War, marked by the breakup of the Soviet Union in 1991, led to a redirection of many U.S. goals and policies.
After the Cold War, the United	• Mikhail
States provided and continues to Gorbachev provide substantial economic	•glasnost
support to the new capitalistic	•perestroika
and democratic nations.	e|NF Treaty
«5T hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on U.S. foreign policy.
Colin Powell did not start out in life with any special privileges. He was born in Harlem and raised in the Bronx, where he enjoyed street games and tolerated school. Then, while attending the City College of New York, he joined the Reserve Officer Training Corps (ROTC). He got straight A's in ROTC, and so he decided to make the army his career.
Powell served first in Vietnam and then in Korea and West Germany. He rose in rank to become a general; then President Reagan made him national security adviser. In this post, Powell noted that the Soviet Union was a factor in all the administration's foreign policy decisions.
A
Personal Voice colin powell “Our choosing sides in conflicts around the world was almost always decided on the basis of East-West competition. The new Soviet leader, Mikhail Gorbachev, however, was turning the old Cold War formulas on their head. . . . Ronald General Colin Powell
Reagan ... had the vision and flexibility, lacking in many knee-jerk Cold Warriors [participants in the Cold War between the U.S. and the USSR], to recognize that Gorbachev was a new man in a new age offering new opportunities for peace. ”
—My American Journey
Though U.S. foreign policy in the early 1980s was marked by intense hostility toward the Soviet Union, drastic economic problems in the Soviet Union destroyed its ability to continue the Cold War standoff.
The Cold War Ends
In March of 1985, Mikhail Gorbachev became the general secretary of the Communist Party in the Soviet Union. His rise to power marked the beginning of a new era in the Soviet Union.
848 Chapter 25
MAIN IDEA
Evaluating
Leadership
Which
evidence in the text supports the viewpoint that Gorbachev was a skilled politician and diplomat?
GORBACHEV INITIATES REFORM
Gorbachev had inherited a host of problems in the Soviet Union. Many of them revolved around the Soviet economy, which was under a great amount of stress. Urging “peace through strength," Reagan added pressure by increasing U.S. defense spending. Between 1981 and 1985, the Pentagon budget grew from about $150 billion to some $270 billion. When the Soviets attempted to keep up, their economy was pushed to the brink of collapse. A skilled diplomat and political leader, Gorbachev advocated a policy known as glasnost (Russian for "openness"). He allowed open criticism of the Soviet government and took steps toward freedom of the press. In 1985, he outlined his plans for perestroika, a restructuring of Soviet society. He called for less government control of the economy, the introduction of some private enterprise, and steps toward establishing a democratic government.
Gorbachev recognized that better relations with the United States would allow the Soviets to reduce their military spending and reform their economy. He initiated a series of arms-control meetings that led to the INF Treaty (Intermediate-Range Nuclear Forces Treaty) signed on December 8, 1987. The treaty eliminated two classes of weapons systems in Europe and allowed each nation to make inspections of the other's military installations. A>
THE SOVIET UNION DECLINES
Gorbachev's introduction of democratic ideals led to a dramatic increase in nationalism on the part of the Soviet Union's non-Russian republics. In December 1991, 14 non-Russian republics declared their independence from the Soviet Union. Muscled aside by Russian reformers who thought he was working too slowly toward democracy, Gorbachev resigned as Soviet president. After 74 years, the Soviet Union dissolved. The Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS), a loose federation, replaced the Soviet Union. In February 1992, President George Bush and Russian president Boris Yeltsin issued a statement declaring an end to the Cold War


DEMOCRATIC ELECTIONS IN RUSSIA
After the Soviet Union dissolved in 1991, Boris Yeltsin continued as president of Russia. Yeltsin ended price controls and increased private business ownership. The Russian parliament opposed Yeltsin’s policies, even though a majority of voters supported them.
In December 1993, Russian voters installed a new parliament and approved a new constitution, parts of which resembled the U.S. Constitution. In 1996, Yeltsin won reelection as president of Russia. He was succeeded in 2000 by Vladimir Putin.

I

£
that had plagued the two nations and divided the world since 1945. In January 1993, Yeltsin and Bush signed the START II pact, designed to cut both nations' nuclear arsenals by two-thirds.
THE COLLAPSE OF COMMUNIST REGIMES
Before his resignation, Gorbachev had encouraged the people of East Germany and Eastern Europe to go their own ways. In 1988, when the Soviet Union was still intact, he reduced the number of Soviet troops in Eastern Europe and allowed non-Communist parties to organize in satellite nations, such as East Germany and Poland. He encouraged the satellite nations to move toward democracy. During a speech given at the Berlin Wall in 1987, President Reagan challenged Gorbachev to back up his reforms with decisive action.

A
Personal Voice ronald reagan “General Secretary Gorbachev, if you seek peace, if you seek prosperity for the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe, if you seek liberalization: Come here to this gate! Mr. Gorbachev, open this gate! Mr. Gorbachev, tear down this wall!
—speech, June 12, 1987
The Conservative Tide
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Events
What signs signaled that the Cold War had come to an end?
A demonstrator pounds away on the Berlin Wall as East German border guards look on from above at the Brandenberg Gate, on November 11, 1989.
In October 1989, East Germans startled the world by repudiating their Communist government. On November 9, 1989, East Germany opened the Berlin Wall, allowing free passage between the two parts of the city for the first time in 28 years. East German border guards stood by and watched as Berliners pounded away with hammers and other tools at the despised wall. In early 1990, East Germany held its first free elections, and on October 3 of that year, the two German nations were united.
Other European nations also adopted democratic reforms. Czechoslovakia withdrew from the Soviet bloc. The Baltic states of Latvia, Estonia, and Lithuania declared their independence from the Soviet Union. Hungary, Bulgaria, and Romania made successful transitions from communism.
Yugoslavia, however, collapsed. Four of its six republics seceded. Ethnic rivalries deteriorated into a
brutal war among Muslims, Orthodox Serbs, and Roman Catholic Croats, who were dividing Yugoslavia, each claiming parts of it. Serbia backed Serb minorities that were stirring up civil unrest in Croatia and Bosnia.
COMMUNISM CONTINUES IN CHINA
Even before perestroika unfolded in the Soviet Union, economic reform had begun in China. Early in the 1980s, the Chinese Communist government loosened its grip on business and eliminated some price controls. Students in China began to demand freedom of speech and a greater voice in government. In April 1989, university students in China held marches that quickly grew into large demonstrations in Beijing's Tiananmen (tyan"an"men") Square and on the streets of other cities. In Tiananmen Square, Chinese students constructed a version of the Statue of Liberty to symbolize their struggle for democracy.
China's premier, Li Peng, eventually ordered the military to crush the protesters. China's armed forces stormed into Tiananmen Square, slaughtering unarmed students. The world's democratic countries watched these events in horror on television. The collapse of the pro-democracy movement left the future in China uncertain. As one student leader said, "The government has won the battle here today. But they have lost the people's hearts."
a
HISTORY
VIDEO
Tiananmen
Square
A
Chinese protester defies the tanks in Tiananmen Square in 1989. ► 
UNITED
STATES
Central America and the Caribbean, 1981-1992
El Salvador 1981-1992
U.S. expands economic and military aid; sends advisers, including Green Berets, to help government combat leftist guerrillas.
Nicaragua 1982-1990 Opposed to military buildup of Sandinista government and its aid to leftist rebels in El Salvador, U.S. trains and aids Nicaraguan Contra rebels.
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Location Which Central American and Caribbean countries experienced an actual U.S. invasion of their territory during the 1980s?
2.	Region Besides direct attack, what other techniques did the United States employ to influence countries in the Caribbean and Central American regions?

Central American and Caribbean Policy
Cold War considerations during the Reagan and Bush administrations continued to influence affairs in Central America and the Caribbean. In these places, the United States still opposed left-leaning and socialist governments in favor of governments friendly to the United States.
NICARAGUA
The United States had had a presence in Nicaragua ever since 1912, when President Taft sent U.S. Marines to protect American investments there. The marines left in 1933, but only after helping the dictator Anastasio Somoza come to power. The Somoza family ruled Nicaragua for 42 years. To keep control of its business empire, the family rigged elections and assassinated political rivals. Many people believed that only a revolution would end the Somoza dictatorship.
Between 1977 and 1979, Nicaragua was engulfed in a civil war between Somoza's national guard and the Sandinistas, rebels who took their name from a rebel leader named Sandino who had been killed in 1934. When Sandinista rebels toppled the dictatorship of Somoza's son in 1979, President Carter recognized the new regime and sent it $83 million in economic aid. The Soviet Union and Cuba sent aid as well.
In 1981, however, President Reagan charged that Nicaragua was a Soviet outpost that was exporting revolution to other Central American countries. Reagan cut all aid to the Sandinista government and threw his support to guerrilla forces known as the Contras because they were against the Sandinistas. By 1983, the Contra army had grown to nearly 10,000 men, and American officials from the CIA had stationed themselves to direct operations—without congressional approval. In response, Congress passed the Boland Amendment, banning military
The Conservative Tide
“Arms payoff for hostage release,” a 1986 Herblock Cartoon, copyright by the Herb Block Foundation
aid to the Contras for two years. However, Reagan's administration still found ways to negotiate aid to the Contras.
On February 25, 1990, Nicaraguan president Daniel Ortega held free elections, and Violeta de Chamorro, a Contra supporter, was elected the nation's new president. Chamorro's coalition was united only in opposition to the Sandinistas; it was too weak and divided to solve Nicaragua's ongoing problems.
GRENADA
On the tiny Caribbean island of Grenada, the United States used direct military force to accomplish its aims. After noting that the island was developing ties to Communist Cuba, President Reagan sent approximately 2,000 troops to the island in 1983. There they overthrew the pro-Cuban government, which was replaced by one friendlier to the United States. Eighteen American soldiers died in the attack, but Reagan declared that the invasion had been necessary to defend U.S. security. PANAMA
Six years later, in 1989, President Bush sent more than 20,000 soldiers and marines into Panama to overthrow and arrest General Manuel Antonio Noriega on charges of drug trafficking. Noriega had been receiving money since 1960 from the CIA, but he was also involved in the international drug trade. After he was indicted by a Miami grand jury, Noriega was taken by force by the American military and flown to Miami to stand trial. In April 1992, Noriega was convicted and sentenced to 40 years in prison. Many Latin American governments deplored the "Yankee imperialism" of the action. However, many Americans—and Panamanians—were pleased by the removal of a military dictator who supported drug smuggling. Middle East Trouble Spots
Results favorable to U.S. interests were more difficult to obtain in the Middle East. Negotiating conflicts between ever-shifting governments drew the United States into scandal and its first major war since Vietnam.
THE IRAN-CONTRA SCANDAL
In 1983, terrorist groups loyal to Iran took a number of Americans hostage in Lebanon. Reagan denounced Iran and urged U.S. allies not to sell arms to Iran for its war against Iraq. In 1985, he declared that "America will never make concessions to terrorists." Therefore, Americans were shocked to learn in 1986 that President Reagan had approved the sale of arms to Iran. In exchange for those sales, Iran promised to win the release of seven American hostages held in Lebanon by pro-Iranian terrorists. What's more, members of Reagan's staff sent part of
◄ President Reagan's message to television audiences about selling arms to Iran differed greatly from what was going on behind the scenes.
MAIN IDEA
Comparing
Between 1980 and 1992, how did U.S. policies regarding Central America differ from those regarding Europe?
852 Chapter 25
the profits from those illegal arms sales to the Contras in Nicaragua—in direct violation of the Boland Amendment. President Reagan held a press conference to explain what had happened.
A
Personal Voice ronald reagan I am deeply troubled that the implementation of a policy aimed at resolving a truly tragic situation in the Middle East has resulted in such controversy. As I’ve stated previously, I believe our policy goals toward Iran were well founded. ”
—presidential press conference, November 25,1986
In the summer of 1987, special committees of both houses of Congress conducted a dramatic inquiry into the Iran-Contra affair during a month of joint televised hearings. Among those testifying was Lieutenant Colonel Oliver North, a member of the National Security Council staff who played a key role in providing aid to the Contras. North appeared in military uniform adorned with service ribbons and badges. In defending his actions, North talked about patriotism and love of country. He asserted that he thought he was carrying out the president's wishes and that the end of helping the Contras justified almost any means.
After a congressional investigation, Special Prosecutor Lawrence E. Walsh, early in 1988, indicted various members of the Reagan administration who were involved in the scandal. Oliver North was found guilty of aiding the cover-up. He was fined and sentenced to perform community service. (His conviction was later overturned because he testified under a grant of limited immunity.). On Christmas Eve of 1992, President Bush pardoned a number of Reagan officials.
THE PERSIAN GULF WAR
Regardless of the scandal surrounding the Iran-Contra affair, conflict with Iraq (which was Iran's long-standing enemy) and its leader, Saddam Hussein, soon eclipsed U.S. problems with Iran. During the 1980s, Iran and Iraq had fought a prolonged war, and Hussein found himself with enormous war debts to pay. Several times, Hussein had claimed that the oil-rich nation of Kuwait was really part of Iraq. On August 2, 1990, Iraqi troops invaded Kuwait. The Iraqi invaders looted Kuwait; then they headed toward Saudi Arabia and COUNTERPOINT
“The United States must occasionally intervene militarily in regional conflicts.”
Proponents of U.S. military intervention abroad agreed with General Norman Schwarzkopf that “as the only remaining superpower, we have an awesome responsibility ... to the rest of the world.”
“The United States must take the lead in promoting democracy,” urged Morton H. Halperin, former director of the ACLU (American Civil Liberties Union). “To say ‘Let the UN do it’ is a cop-out,” stated adviser Robert G. Neumann.
Political scientist Jane Sharp expressed a similar sentiment. She asked,
“Can any nation that has taken no action [in Bosnia] to stop the Serbian practice of ethnic cleansing continue to call itself civilized?”
THINKING CRITICALLY
............;.. CONNECT TO TODAY
Comparing and Contrasting What do you think are the strongest arguments for and against military intervention in regional conflicts?
CONNECT TO HISTORY
Hypothesizing With at least one partner, research the events leading up to U.S. involvement in one of these countries: Lebanon, Grenada, Panama, or Kuwait. Then negotiate to resolve the conflict. “The United States should not intervene militarily in regional conflicts.”
A foreign-policy analyst at the Cato Institute, Barbara Conry, stated that “intervention in regional wars is a distraction and a drain on resources.” What’s more, she argued, “it does not work." Recalling the presence of American troops in Lebanon, Conry argued that intervention not only jeopardized American soldiers, it often obstructed what it sought to achieve.
“The internal freedom of a political community can be achieved only by members of that community,” agreed Professor Stephen R. Shalom. He added that “using [military action] encourages quick fix solutions that ignore the underlying sources of conflict.”
The Conservative Tide 853
geography skillbuilder
1- Region What did UN coalition forces probably hope to achieve by moving forces into southern Iraq?
2.	Movement How did the movements of coalition ground forces show that the intention of the coalition in the Gulf War was ultimately defensive, not offensive?

MAIN IDEA
Drawing
Conclusions
What issue led to the conflict in the Middle East?
its oil fields. If Iraq conquered Saudi Arabia as well as Kuwait, it would control one-half of the world's known oil reserves, which would severely threaten U.S. oil supplies.
For several months, President Bush and Secretary of State James Baker organized an international coalition against Iraqi aggression. With the support of Congress and the UN, President Bush launched Operation Desert Storm to liberate Kuwait from Iraqi control. On January 16, 1991, the United States and its allies staged a massive air assault against Iraq. On February 23, they launched a successful ground offensive from Saudi Arabia. On February 28,
1991, President Bush announced a cease-fire. Operation Desert Storm was over. Kuwait was liberated.
Millions of Americans turned out for the victory parades that greeted returning soldiers. After the debacle in Vietnam, they were thrilled the war was over, with fewer than 400 casualties among UN coalition forces. (However, there were subsequent reports that Gulf veterans were suffering from disabilities caused by chemicals used in the war.) By contrast, Iraq had suffered an estimated 100,000 military and civilian deaths. During the embargo that followed, many Iraqi children died from outbreaks of cholera, typhoid, enteritis, and other diseases.
BUSH’S DOMESTIC POLICIES
Despite his great achievement in the Persian Gulf War, President Bush was not as successful on the domestic front. He was hurt by rising deficits and a recession that began in 1990 and lasted through most of 1992. Bush was forced to raise taxes despite his campaign pledge. His approval rating had dropped to 49 percent by 1992. The weak economy and the tax hike doomed Bush's reelection campaign, and 12 years of Republican leadership came to an end. KEY
PLAYEfl H. NORMAN SCHWARZKOPF 1934-
In 1988, Norman Schwarzkopf, shown above, became commander in chief of forces in Asia and Africa. During the Persian Gulf War, more than 540,000 men and women served under the command of “Stormin’ Norman.” Schwarzkopf said of Saddam Hussein that he was “neither a strategist, nor is he schooled in the operational art, nor is he a tactician, nor is he a general, nor is he a soldier. Other than that, he is a great military man."
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its meaning. •Mikhail Gorbachev	•perestroika	•Tiananmen Square
INF
Treaty • Sandinistas • Contras
•Operation Desert Storm
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Use a chart like the one below to describe U.S. involvement in world affairs.
______U.S. Foreign Policy
Europe
Central America and Caribbean
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING CAUSES
What factors caused the end of the Cold War? Think About:
•	events in the Soviet Union
•	events in Germany and Eastern Europe
•	how U.S. leaders responded to those events, including Reagan’s “peace through strength policy"
Middle East
FORMING GENERALIZATIONS
What factors do you think determined whether or not the United States intervened militarily in other nations?
5.	HYPOTHESIZING
Is it possible for an authoritarian government to make economic reforms without also making political reforms? Support your answer with details from the text.
Now write a paragraph in which you describe a trouble spot in one of these regions.
The Conservative Tide
ASSESSMENT
TERMS & NAMES
For each term or name below, write a sentence explaining its significance.
1.	entitlement program
2.	affirmative action
3.	Moral Majority
4.	Ronald Reagan
5.	supply-side economics
6.	Geraldine Ferraro
7.	AIDS
8.	Mikhail Gorbachev
9.	Contras
10. Operation Desert Storm
MAIN IDEAS
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
A
Conservative Movement Emerges (pages 830-833)
1.	What caused the conservative resurgence of the early 1980s?
2.	What factors led to Ronald Reagan’s victory in 1980?
Conservative Policies Under Reagan and Bush (pages 834-838)
3.	What principles formed the basis of “Reaganomics”?
4.	What is deregulation, and how did it affect certain industries in the 1980s?
Social Concerns in the 1980s (pages 839-845)
5.	What progress and obstacles did different minority groups experience in the 1980s?
6.	What were some gains that women achieved in the 1980s?
Foreign Policy After the Cold War
(pages 848-855)
7.	What caused the downfall of the Soviet Union and the founding of the Commonwealth of Independent States?
8.	Describe how the United States became involved in the Persian Gulf War.
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
Choose two events from each of the sections of the chapter and place them in chronological order on a timeline like the one below. EVALUATING
Review the goals of the conservative movement and the actions of the government under Reagan and Bush. Evaluate how well the goals had been achieved by the end of Bush’s term. ANALYZING CAUSES AND EFFECTS
What were the causes and effects of changing demographic patterns resulting from migration from the Rust Belt to the Sun Belt? EXPLAINING TURNING POINTS
What is the significance of the year 1991 as a turning point in American history? Explain. VISUAL SUMMARY
The Conservative Tide 856 Chapter 25
<
TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
Use the passage and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 1.
“That system [of republican government] has never failed us, but, for a time, we failed the system. We asked things of government that government was not equipped to give. We yielded authority to the national government that properly belonged to states or to local governments or to the people themselves. We allowed taxes and inflation to rob us of our earnings and savings and watched the great industrial machine that had made us the most productive people on Earth slow down and the number of unemployed increase.”
—Ronald Reagan, Second Inaugural Address, 1985
1.	The passage suggests that President Ronald Reagan supported which point of view?
A
There should be an end to all social welfare programs. B
The role of the federal government should be reduced. C
The role of the federal government should be increased. D
The federal government should raise taxes. 2.	Which of the following events signaled the end of the Cold War?
F
Operation Desert Storm G Iran-Contra Scandal H collapse of the Soviet Union J protests at Tiananmen Square Use the graph and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 3.
Gross Federal Debt
Source: U.S. Dept. of the Treasury
3.	The graph shows that during the Reagan and Bush years, the gross federal debt —
A stayed the same.
B greatly increased.
C greatly decreased.
D did not exist.
4.	Which of the following was not a goal of the conservative movement of the 1980s?
F strengthen the national defense G reduce government regulations H promote family values and patriotic ideals
J
El
increase taxes
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests • Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
"^WriteSmart Think about the issues you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. Imagine that you are working as a speechwriter for Ronald Reagan in 1980.
Use myWriteSmart to write a speech that explains why Americans should vote for Reagan. Include some of the key terms that you encountered in the chapter. Present your speech to the class.
MULTIMEDIA ACTIVITY
\gE£TUKT
Visit the Chapter Assessment links to find out more about Saddam Hussein’s rise to power in Iraq. Write and record a short podcast describing the tactics that Hussein used to become dictator and how his policies affected the people of Iraq.
hmhsocialstudies.com
ON WRITING

Imagine that you are a journalist in the 1980s. Choose the social concern of the period that you believe to be the most significant domestic issue facing the United States. Use my\NriteSmart in your eBook to write a newspaper editorial in which you persuade others that your issue is the most important and outline your approach for solving it. Use descriptive examples and vivid language to convince your audience to support your perspective.
The Conservative Tide
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Drawing Inferences
DEFINING THE SKILL
Inferences are ideas and meanings not stated in a text. Drawing inferences from a passage you are reading means reading between the lines to extend the information provided. Drawing inferences from a piece of historical writing means drawing conclusions based on facts, examples, opinions, and the author's use of language. To draw inferences, use clues in the text and your own personal experience, historical knowledge, and common sense.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: DEVELOP INFERENCES FROM THE FACTS
The following passage is from a speech by President Ronald Reagan promoting his economic program. As you read, draw inferences about his opinions and views. Look for facts and ideas and apply what you already know about the time period and Reaganomics. On the Program for Economic Recovery
0 All of us are aware of the punishing inflation which has for the first time in 60 years held to double-digit figures for 2 years in a row. Interest rates have reached absurd levels of more than 20 percent and over 15 percent for those who would borrow to buy a home... Almost 8 million Americans are out of work....
0 I am proposing a comprehensive four-point program ... aimed at reducing the growth in government spending and taxing, reforming and eliminating regulations which are unnecessary and unproductive or counterproductive, and encouraging a consistent monetary policy aimed at maintaining the value of the currency.
Now, I know that 0 exaggerated and inaccurate stories about these cuts have disturbed many people .. .Those who, through no fault of their own, must depend on the rest of us—the poverty stricken, the disabled, the elderly, all those with true need—can rest assured that the social safety net of programs they depend on are exempt from any cuts.
—President Ronald Reagan, "Address Before a Joint Session of the Congress on the Program for Economic Recovery," February 18,1981
O
Examine the facts and consider what you already know. From the facts in the text and historical knowledge, you know that country was in economic crisis in 1981. © Look for clues about the writer’s opinion. Note opinionated language. To describe current government spending and regulations Reagan uses words such as unnecessary, unproductive, and counterproductive. And from words such as exaggerated and inaccurate, you can infer that Reagan disagrees with criticism of his plan.
0 Draw an inference. From Reagan's language and the goals of his program, you can infer that he sees government spending and taxation as a major cause of the economic crisis and that he blames the Democrats for the poor economy.
857 SKI
STRATEGY: MAKE A CHART
The chart below lists some inferences that can be drawn from President Reagan's speech. Record clues in the text as well as what you know about the topic on the basis of your own experience, knowledge, and common sense. Clues in the Text: Facts, Examples, Language •	Inflation in double digits •	Interest rates over 20% •	3 million unemployed •	Inflation is “punishing” •	Interest rates “absurd”	Personal Experience, Historical Knowledge, Common Sense • Reagan defeated Democratic incumbent Jimmy Carter in the 1930 election.	Q inference Reagan blames the Democrats for the current economic problems.
APPLYING THE SKILL
Turn to Chapter 25, Section 4, p. 848 and read the passage headed "One American's Story." Create a chart like the one above to draw inferences based on clues in the text, your own personal experience, historical knowledge, and common sense.
1.	Examine the facts and consider what you already know.
What facts does the text provide about Mikhail Gorbachev's leadership?
2.	Look for clues about the writer’s opinion.
Does Colin Powell use opinionated language in speaking about Soviet leaders in the past? What can you infer from these words?
3.	Draw an inference.
From reading Colin Powell’s quote, what can you infer that he sees as the best course of action for U.S. relations with the Soviet Union? How does he feel about President Reagan and his policies?
1|
I
Essential Question
/Notebook
What are the most important issues that affect the United States and the world today?

Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills (TEKS)
IOC, 10E, 11 A, 11D, 1 IE, 12A, 14C, 17D, 17E,
18A, 18B, 19C, 19D, 20B, 24B, 27A, 27C, 28A, 28B,
28C, 30C, 31A, 31B
SECTION 1: The 1990s and the New Millennium
Main Idea The nation became divided as the Democrats gained control of the White House in the 1990s, and the Republicans came to power at the beginning of the new millennium.
SECTION 2: The New Global Economy
Main Idea Because of technological advances and new trade laws, the U.S. economy underwent a boom during the late 20th century.
SECTION 3: Technology and Modern Life
Main Idea Advances in technology have increased not only the pace but also the comfort of many Americans' daily lives.
SECTION 4:The Changing Face of America
Main Idea At the end of the 20th century, the U.S. population grew more diverse both in ethnic background and in age.







Participants at the Walk For Hunger, held annually in Massachusetts, help to support local and emergency food programs.

USAj
world!
[1992] Twenty-seventh Amendment prohibits midterm congressional pay raises.
119921 William Jefferson Clinton is elected president.
1992
: i 1994 j Republicans : gain control of : both houses of : Congress.
1994
:[l995{
: “Million Man : March” held : in Washington, ;d.c.
0990
President Clinton is reelected.
1996
19931 Russia and
: United States sign : START-ll treaty reducing : warheads and ICBMs.
: L 19?4j In South Africa’s : first all-race election,
: Nelson Mandela is : elected president.
19951 Israeli prime minister Yitzhak Rabin is assassinated.
V I
1
858 Chapter 26
A K
%

1998
: 1997 Scottish
'■ scientist - clones “Dolly” : the sheep.
i1998]		: [2001] On September 11,
President	'<3	
Clinton is		: terrorists attack New York’s
impeached.		: World Trade Center and the • Pentagon with hijacked jets.
120081 Barack Obama is elected 44th president.
: j1998J Northern Ireland, : the Irish Republic, and : the United Kingdom sign : peace agreements.
2000
12000 j George W.
Bush is elected 43rd president.
Present
•[20011 Serbian president : Slobodan Milosevic is • brought before the UN :war crimes tribunal.
U.S. forces invade Iraq.
The United States in Today's Worl
TEKS 2D, 10E, 11 A, 11D, 11E, 17E, 19C, 20B, 24B
The 1990s and the New Millennium
MAIN IDEA
n
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
The nation became divided as the Democrats gained control of the White House in the 1990s, and the Republicans came to power at the beginning of the new millennium.
Democrats and Republicans need to find a way to work together and unite a divided nation.
William Jefferson
Clinton
H.
Ross Perot Hillary Rodham
Clinton
NAFTA
•Newt Gingrich •Contract with America •Al Gore •George W. Bush • Barack Obama
One American's
^ptaSgnote?
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on major actions taken by President Clinton during his two terms in office.
On January 20, 1993, William Jefferson Clinton was inaugurated as the 42nd president of the United States. Clinton entered the presidency at a time when America was at a turning point. A severe economic recession had made many Americans uneasy about the future. They looked to Clinton to lead a
government that would be more responsive to the people.
Bill Clinton delivers his inaugural address.
A
Personal Voice william jefferson clinton “We must do what America does best*, offer more opportunity to all and demand more responsibility from all. It is time to break the bad habit of expecting something for nothing from our Government or from each other. Let us ail take more responsibility not only for ourselves and our families but for our communities and our country. To renew America, we must revitalize our democracy. ”
—First Inaugural Address, January 20, 1993
Clinton's speech recalled the one given by another president as he took office. In 1961, John F. Kennedy called on each American to "ask not what your country can do for you—ask what you can do for your country." Clinton had admired Kennedy since he was a teenager, and he drew inspiration from this historic message in his own inaugural address in an effort to galvanize the nation to confront the challenges it faced.
Clinton Wins the Presidency
Governor William Jefferson Clinton of Arkansas became the fhTmlmberof the baby-boom generation to win the presidency. He captured the White House at the age of 46, by vowing to strengthen the nation's weak economy and to lead the Democratic Party in a more moderate direction.
880 Chapter 26
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
A)
What factors accounted for Bush’s decline in popularity? THE ELECTION OF 1992
After the U.S. victory in the Persian Gulf War in 1991, Republican president George Bush s popularity had climbed to an 89 percent approval rating. Shortly after the war ended, however, the nation found itself in the grips of a recession. In early 1992, Bush's approval rating nose-dived to 40 percent. In his run for reelection, President Bush could not convince the public that he had a clear strategy for ending the recession and creating jobs. Throughout the presidential race, Bill Clinton campaigned as the candidate who would lead the nation out of its economic crisis. So did a third-party candidate—Texas billion-aire H. Ross Perot. Perot targeted the soaring federal budget deficit as the nation's number one problem. A budget deficit occurs when the federal government borrows money to meet all its spending commitments. "It's time," Perot declared in his usual blunt style, "to take out the trash and clean up the barn."
Election Day results, however, demonstrated that Clinton's center-of-the-road strategy had the widest appeal. Though Clinton won, he captured only 43 percent of the popular vote. Bush received 38 percent, while Perot managed an impressive 19 percent.
A “NEW” DEMOCRAT
Bill Clinton won the presidency in part by promising to move away from traditional Democratic policies. He also emphasized the need to move people off welfare and called for growth in private business as a means to economic progress. In office, Clinton worked to move the Democratic Party toward the political center by embracing both liberal and conservative programs. According to an ally, Clinton hoped "to modernize liberalism so it could sell again." By doing so, he sought to create a "new" and more inclusive Democratic Party.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
Si What factors led to the defeat of Clinton’s health care plan?
WILLIAM JEFFERSON CLINTON, 1946-
Born in Hope, Arkansas, at the beginning of the baby boom, Bill Clinton had wanted to be president most of his life. As a college student in the 1960s, he had opposed the Vietnam War and pulled strings to avoid being drafted.
After studying in England as a Rhodes scholar and graduating from Yale Law School, Clinton returned to Arkansas. He taught at the University of Arkansas School of Law and dived into politics, becoming governor in 1979 at the age of 32.
Moderate Reform
and Economic Boom
President Clinton demonstrated his willingness to pursue both liberal and conservative policies on health care, the budget deficit, crime, and welfare.
HEALTH CARE REFORM
Clinton had pledged to create a plan to guarantee affordable health care for all Americans, especially for the millions of Americans who lacked medical insurance. Once in office, Clinton appointed First Lady Hillary Rodham Clinton, a skilled lawyer and child-welfare advocate, to head the team creating the plan. The president presented the health care reform bill to Congress in September 1993. Congress debated the plan for a year. Intense lobbying and Republican attacks on the plan for promoting "big government” sealed its doom. In the end, Congress never even voted on the bill. «S>
▲
Hillary Rodham Clinton explains the hearth care reform plan to a Senate subcommittee.
The United States in Today's World,
Injured victims after the April 1995 bombing of the Alfred P. Murrah Federal Building in Oklahoma City, Oklahoma.
▼
BALANCED BUDGET AND AN ECONOMIC BOOM
President Clinton was more successful in his efforts to reduce the federal budget deficit. Clinton and the Republican-controlled Congress agreed in 1997 on legislation to balance the federal budget by the year 2002. The bill cut spending by billions of dollars, lowered taxes to win Republican support, and included programs aimed at helping children and improving health care. A year later, Clinton announced that—for the first time in nearly 30 years— the federal budget had a surplus. That is, the government took in more than it spent. Surpluses were used, in part, to pay down the nation's debt, which had soared to around $5.5 trillion.
Perhaps the most effective tool in generating a surplus was the booming economy. About the time Clinton took office, the economy rebounded. Unemployment fell and the stock market soared to new heights. As a result, the government's tax revenues rose, and fewer people received public aid. These factors helped slash the federal debt.
REFORMING WELFARE
Clinton and the congressional Republicans cooperated to reform the welfare system. In 1996, a bill was proposed to place limits on how long people could receive benefits. It also put an end to a 61-year federal guarantee of welfare, and instead gave states "block grants"—set amounts of federal money they could spend on welfare or for other social concerns. Although liberal Democrats feared the effects of eliminating the federal safety net for the poor, the president backed the bill. Over the next few years, states moved millions of people from welfare to jobs. Because of the strong economy, the transition was more successful than some had been predicting.
Crime and Terrorism
The improved economy—along with enlargement of police forces—combined to lower crime rates in the 1990s. However, fears were raised among Americans by acts of violence and terrorism around the country.
A shocking crime occurred April 1999 when two students at Columbine High School, in Colorado, killed 12 students and a teacher and wounded 23 others, and then shot themselves. Americans were appalled at copycat crimes that began to occur. Some called for tougher gun control, while others argued that exposure to violent imagery should be curtailed. Violence had pervaded television news throughout the decade.
In 1993, terrorists had exploded bombs in the World Trade Center in New York City. This was closely followed by a 1995 blast that destroyed a nine-story federal office building in Oklahoma City, killing 168 children, women, and men. Timothy McVeigh, an American veteran of the Gulf War, was found guilty in the Oklahoma bombing. He was executed in 2001, the first use of the federal death penalty in 38 years. Although American embassies and military targets abroad were subject to sporadic and deadly terrorist attacks during the decade, the U.S. was in no way prepared for a devastating attack that took place on its own soil on the morning of September 11, 2001. m
main idea
Summarizing
What acts of
terrorism targeted
Americans in the
decade preceding
2001?
862 Chapter 26
Vocabulary globalization: to
make worldwide in scope or application
In a coordinated effort, two hijacked commercial jets struck the twin towers of the World Trade Center in New York City, one crashing just minutes after the other. The jets exploded on impact and subsequently leveled the tallest buildings of New York's skyline, the symbolic center of American finance. About an hour later, a third plane tore into the Pentagon building, the U.S. military headquarters outside Washington,
D.C.
Air travel ceased almost immediately; across the nation planes in the air were ordered to land. During the evacuation of the White House and the New York financial district, a fourth hijacked plane crashed near Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania.
About 3,000 people were killed in the attacks. These included all the passengers on all four planes, workers and visitors in the World Trade Center and the Pentagon, and hundreds of rescue workers. (See Section 1, "The War on Terrorism," in Chapter 27 on page 894.)
New Foreign Policy Challenges
Conflicts and confused alliances grew in the wake of the Cold War. The question of U.S. intervention overseas, and the globalization of the economy presented the United States with a host of new challenges.
RELATIONS WITH FORMER COLD WAR FOES
Maintaining strong relations with Russia and China became major goals for the Clinton administration. Throughout the 1990s, the U.S. and Russia cooperated on economic and arms-control issues. Still, Russia criticized U.S. intervention in Yugoslavia, where a bloody civil war raged. Meanwhile, U.S. officials protested Russian attacks on rebels in the Russian region of Chechnya. U.S. relations with China were strained as well. Clinton had stressed that he would lean on China to grant its citizens more democratic rights. As president, however, he put greater emphasis on increasing trade with China. Despite concerns that Chinese spies had stolen U.S. defense secrets, Clinton supported a bill—passed in 2000—granting China permanent trade rights.
TROOPS ABROAD
With the Cold War over, the United States turned more of its attention to regional conflicts. President Clinton proved willing to use troops to end conflicts overseas. In 1991, military leaders in Haiti forced the elected president from office. Thousands of refugees fled the military leaders' harsh rule. In 1994, President Clinton dispatched American troops to Haiti, and the military rulers were forced to step down. Other interventions occurred in the Balkans. In 1991, Yugoslavia broke apart into five nations. In Bosnia, one of the new states, some Serb militias under Slobodan Milosevic began "ethnic cleansing," killing or expelling from their homes people of certain ethnic groups. In 1995, the United States helped negotiate a peace agreement in Bosnia. Clinton sent U.S. troops to join NATO troops to help ensure the deal. About three years later, Serb forces attacked ethnic Albanians in the Serb province of Kosovo. The U.S. and its NATO allies launched air strikes against Serbian targets in 1999, forcing the Serbs to back down. American troops followed up by participating in an international peace-keeping force.
The United States in Today's World 81
MAIN IDEA
jfjjF f In both Bosnia and Kosovo, the administration promised
&	early withdrawal. However, the U.S. troops stayed longer
than had been intended, drawing criticism of Clinton's
policies.
TRADE AND THE GLOBAL ECONOMY
Seeing flourishing trade as essential to U.S. prosperity and to world economic and political stability, President Clinton championed the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA), This legislation would bring Mexico into the free-trade zone that the United States and Canada already had formed. The political battle over NAFTA demonstrated the dynamic relationship between the U.S. free enterprise system and its international trade policies. Opponents believed NAFTA would cost American jobs. They argued that because Mexican factories paid lower wages, they could make and sell goods at a lower cost. Without tariffs to make Mexican goods more expensive than American goods, many feared American factories would go out of business. Clinton and the other supporters of NAFTA believed the agreement
would increase trade, which would help the U.S. economy. Clinton fought for and won passage of NAFTA in 1993, when the treaty was ratified by all three countries' legislatures. Once the treaty took effect on January 1, 1994, trade with Mexico increased.
Critics of free trade have remained vocal. In late 1999, protestors gathered in Seattle at a meeting of the World Trade Organization (WTO), an organization that promotes free trade and economic development. Demonstrations at Summit of the Americas meetings in Quebec City, Canada, in 2001, Miami in 2003, and Mar del Plata, Argentina, in 2005 ended violently. Such protests helped to halt plans to launch the Free Trade Area of the Americas (FTAA)—an enlarged version of NAFTA covering the 34 countries in the Western Hemisphere.
Partisan Politics and Impeachment
Analyzing
Causes
Why did the United States send troops to Yugoslavia and Kosovo?
While Clinton and Congress worked together on deficit reduction and NAFTA, relations in Washington became increasingly partisan. In the midst of political wrangling, a scandal rocked the White House, and Bill Clinton became the second president in U.S. history to be impeached.
REPUBLICANS TAKE CONTROL OF CONGRESS
In 1994, after the failure of President Clinton's health care plan, recurring questions regarding his leadership began to surface. The new president had failed to deliver on several campaign promises. This discontent helped contribute to a major Republican victory in the 1994 midterm elections. Many Republican candidates, led by Representative Newt Gingrich of Georgia, campaigned with a document they called the Contract with America—ten items Republicans promised to enact if they won control of Congress. They included congressional term limits, a balanced-budget amendment, tax cuts, tougher crime laws, and welfare reform. Many of the ideas that comprised the Contract with America originated with the Heritage Foundation. Founded in 1973, the Heritage Foundation was one of the key organizations in the conservative resurgence of the 1980s and 1990s. Its mission is to develop and advocate conservative public policy within the United States. In the November 1994 election, the Republicans gained 54 seats in the House
and 8 in the Senate, handing the Democrats a humiliating defeat. Republicans
took control of both houses of Congress for the first time since 1954. Newt
Gingrich was chosen as the new Speaker of the House.
Vocabulary partisan: devoted to or biased in support of a party, group, or cause
Summarizing
What were
some of the
provisions of the
Contract of
America?
864 Chapter 26
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
$ What factors contributed most to Clinton’s reelection?
President Clinton and the Republican-controlled Congress clashed. Clinton opposed Republican budgets that slowed spending on entitlements such as Social Security and Medicaid. Clinton and Congress refused to compromise, and no budget was passed. As a result, the federal government shut down for almost a week in November 1995, and again for several weeks in the next two months.
THE 1996 REELECTION The budget standoff helped Clinton, as did the strong economy and passage of the welfare reform law of 1996, which suggested an improved working relationship with Congress. As a result, voters reelected Clinton in November 1996. With 49 percent of the popular vote, he outpolled the Republican nominee, U.S. Senator Bob Dole, and the Reform Party candidate, H. Ross Perot. Still, the Republicans maintained control of the House and Senate. President Clinton and Republican leaders pledged to work more cooperatively, jg)
!
I
CLINTON IMPEACHED
President Clinton was accused of improperly using money from a land deal with the Whitewater Development Company to fund his 1984 gubernatorial reelection campaign. In addition, Clinton allegedly had lied under oath about having an improper relationship with a young White House intern. In 1998, Clinton admitted to the relationship but denied lying about it under oath or attempting to obstruct the investigation. In December 1998, the House of Representatives approved two articles of impeachment, charging the president with perjury and obstruction of justice. Clinton became only the second president—and the first in 130 years—to face a trial in the Senate. At the trial a month later, the Senate fell short of the 67 votes—a two-thirds majority—required to convict him. Clinton remained in office and apologized for his actions. The impeachment proceedings divided the nation. While some believed that Clinton had violated the voters' trust and should be removed from office, others argued the trial was politically motivated.
These Americans protested the impeachment. Many Democrats claimed that prosecuting President Clinton was “pure partisanship”
▼
The Race for the White House
In the 2000 presidential race, the Democrats chose Vice President Al Gore to succeed Bill Clinton. The Republicans nominated George W. Bush, governor of Texas and the son of the former president. Ralph Nader, a long-time consumer advocate, ran as a third-party candidate for the Green Party, which championed environmental causes and promoted an overall liberal agenda. On the eve of the election, polls showed that the race would be tight.
ELECTION NIGHT CONFUSION
As election night unfolded, Al Gore appeared to take the lead. The television networks projected that he would win Florida, Pennsylvania, and Michigan—states rich in electoral votes that would ultimately decide the winner of the race. Then, in a stunning turn of events, the TV networks recanted their original projection about Gore's victory in Florida and proclaimed the state "too close to call." As midnight passed, it became clear that whoever won Florida would gain the 270 electoral votes needed to win the election. About 2 A m the networks predicted Bush the winner of Florida—and thus the presidency. However as the final votes in Florida rolled in, Bush's lead shrank considerably and the state again became too close to call. By the next day, Al Gore had won the popular vote by more than 500,000 votes out of 105 million cast across the nation.
The United States in Today's World
Some Democrats blamed Nader's third-party candidacy for the election out-
come. Some people argue that he split the liberal vote, earning votes that would
have otherwise gone to Gore. This result narrowed the margin between Gore and
Bush. However, Nader supporters argue that he represented an important alterna-
tive for voters.
DISPUTE RAGES IN FLORIDA
In the weeks following the election, lawyers and spokespersons went to Florida to try to secure victory. George Bush's razor-thin victory in Florida triggered an automatic recount, which gave Bush a win by just over ►
More than a month after the votes were cast, Al Gore concedes the 2000 presidential election.
500 votes—but the battle for the presidency did not end there. The Gore campaign requested manual recounts in four mostly Democratic counties. Bush representatives opposed the manual recounts. James A. Baker III, former secretary of state and leader of the Bush team in Florida, argued that such recounts would raise the possibility of political mischief.
THE BATTLE MOVES TO THE COURTS
As the manual recounting began on November 12, the Republicans sued to stop the recounts; a month-long court fight followed. The battle ultimately reached the Supreme Court. On December 12, the court voted 5 to 4 to stop the recounts, thus awarding the Florida electoral votes and the presidency to
Bush. The justices argued that manual recounts lacked
uniform standards and, therefore, violated equal protection for voters. e
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
How did the election of 2000 highlight both the weaknesses and the strengths of America’s election process?
KtV l’LAV/;y;
The Bush Administration
After the protests and legal actions subsided, George W. Bush was inaugurated as the 43rd president of the United States on January 20, 2001. Bush inherited several challenges, including a weakening national economy and an energy problem in California.
During his first months as president, Bush began to advance his political agenda. He declared plans to reform the federal role in education and to privatize Social Security. Bush also proposed a $1.35 trillion tax cut, which became law in June 2001.
ANTITERRORIST MEASURES
The political landscape changed dramatically after the September 11 terrorist attacks. The Bush administration, now with the overwhelming support of Congress and the American people, shifted its energy and attention to combating terrorism. In October 2001, Bush signed an antiterrorism bill into law. The law allowed the government to detain foreigners suspected of terrorism for seven days without charging them with a crime. By the following month, Bush had created the Department of Homeland Security, a government body set up to coordinate national efforts to combat terrorism. In addition, the federal government increased its involvement in aviation security.
The Bush Administration also began waging a war against terrorism. In October 2001, coalition forces led by
GEORGE W. BUSH, 1946-
George W. Bush was born into a family steeped in politics. His father, George H. W. Bush, was the 41st president of the United States (1989-1993). However, George W. Bush did not immediately follow in his father’s political footsteps. In 1975, he started an oil company in Midland, Texas. For a time, he also was part owner of the Texas Rangers baseball team.
Eventually, Bush was elected governor of Texas in 1994. Six years later, he became the 43rd president of the United States. He won reelection in 2004.
i
866 Chapter 26
MAIN IDEA
Evaluating
Leadership
$ How do you think the American people responded to Bush’s antiterrorist measures?
the United States began bombing Afghanistan. The Afghan government was harboring Osama bin Laden and his al-Qaeda terrorist network believed responsible for the September 11 attacks. In 2002, the coalition successfully broke up the al-Qaeda network in Afghanistan. Osama bin Laden, however, remained at large. Nonetheless, the Bush administration gained widespread public approval for the decisive steps taken.
Bush also scored a major success when direct elections were held for the first time in Afghanistan in October 2004.
The Afghan people elected interim president Hamid Karzai as their first democratically elected president. Although Afghanistan still faced many problems, the elections were considered a positive move toward resolving them.
WAR AGAINST IRAQ
In 2003, Bush expanded the war on terrorism to Iraq. Following the Persian Gulf War, Iraq had agreed to UN demands to stop the production of biological, chemical, and nuclear weapons. However, throughout the 1990s, the leader of Iraq, Saddam Hussein, cooperated only partly with UN arms inspectors and eventually barred them from entering his country. After the September 11 attacks, Bush alleged that Hussein was supporting terrorists and might supply them with weapons of mass destruction (WMD). Bush called for renewed arms inspections in Iraq. The inspectors determined that Iraq had not resumed its WMD programs; but Hussein had again not cooperated fully with the inspection process. The United States and Great Britain then ended diplomacy with Iraq and invaded in March 2003. Within a month, Iraq's forces were defeated. U.S. forces then began an intensive search for WMD in Iraq. No traces of WMD were found. U.S. forces captured the former dictator in December 2003, and Hussein was later tried and executed by the Iraqi government.
▲
Hamid Karzai is victorious in Afghanistan's first direct presidential election.
DOMESTIC AGENDA
Meanwhile, on the home front, President Bush concentrated on education and the economy. He signed into law an education reform plan entitled No Child Left Behind. This plan called for more accountability by states for students' success, mandatory achievement testing, and more school options available for parents. The economy posed a greater challenge, as corporate scandals, such as those related to the companies Enron and WorldCom, rocked the nation. The scandals had a negative impact on the U.S. economy. Congress responded by passing the Sarbanes-Oxley Act. This act established a regulatory board to oversee the accounting industry and its involvement with corporations.
In 2003, Congress passed and Bush signed into law a $350 billion tax cut, which Bush claimed would help the sagging economy and create jobs. Democrats in Congress opposed the tax cut, saying it would mostly benefit the rich. The Democrats were overruled, however, because the Republican Party had regained control of the Senate in the 2002 midterm elections.
BUSH REELECTED IN 2004
Although the Bush administration received much Initial support for the war on terrorism, many Americans came to question the decision to invade Iraq. They were dismayed by the failure to find WMD there. In 2004, President Bush was reelected, despite deep divisions among the American people. During Bush's second term, discontent about the war grew. At the same time, controversies arose over warrantless spying on American citizens and allegations that the administration allowed torture of terrorist suspects. The Bush administration was also criticized over its response to Hurricane Katrina. In the 2006 mid-term elections, Democrats regained control of both the House and the Senate.
The United States in Today's World 8)
The Obama Administration

HISTORY
VIDEO
Election 2008
- f N - ’

The continuing war in Iraq and a deteriorating economy contributed to President Bush's unpopularity. The collapse of the financial markets in the fall of 2008 did little to improve the situation. More than two-thirds of Americans disapproved of his handling of the presidency. As a result, in the 2008 presidential election, Americans voted for a change in direction by electing Democrat Barack Obama,
U.S. senator from Illinois. In defeating Republican Senator John McCain of Arizona, Obama made history as the first African American to be elected president of the United States.
On taking office, Obama pushed through an economic stimulus package to combat the recession brought on by the crash of the financial markets. In
addition, he fulfilled a campaign promise by passing a sweeping health care reform bill. However, aspects of health care reform drew criticism from some people. In addition, many Americans expressed their unhappiness with continued high levels of unemployment. This discontent allowed Republicans to gain a majority of seats in the U.S. House of Representatives during the 2010 midterm elections.
In foreign policy, Obama drew up plans to end combat operations in Iraq and in Afghanistan. He also continued to combat terrorism. In 2011, the United States struck a blow against al-Qaeda, when special forces tracked down and killed Osama bin Laden in Pakistan.
h
Barack Obama, his wife, Michelle, and daughters, Sasha and Malia, celebrate his victory at Grant Park in Chicago on November 4,2008.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•William Jefferson Clinton •H. Ross Perot •Hillary Rodham Clinton
•North American Free Trade
Agreement (NAFTA)
•Newt Gingrich
•Contract with America •Al Gore
W.
Bush • Barack Obama
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a time line of President Clinton’s major actions during his two terms. Use a form such as the one below.
Explain whether each action was a success or a failure for Clinton.
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	EVALUATING
Evaluate the impact of the relationships among the legislative, executive, and judicial branches on the presidential election of 2000.
ANALYZING EFFECTS
How did a third party impact the presidential election of 2000?
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
How does NAFTA represent the dynamic relationship between the U.S. free enterprise system and international trade policies?
ANALYZING EVENTS
Describe U.S. involvement in world affairs during this period. Think About:
•	the crisis in the Balkans
•	the 9/11 attacks
•	the global war on terror
7.	SUMMARIZING
How did organizations such as the Heritage Foundation and the Contract with America contribute to the conservative resurgence of the 1990s?
868 Chapter 26
The New Global Economy
MAIN IDEA
j WHY IT MATTERS NOW j Terms & Names Because of technological	New types of business have	•service sector	• General
advances and new trade	meant new work environments	•downsize	Agreement on
laws, the U.S. economy	and new challenges for American	•Bill Gates	Tariffs and Trade
underwent a boom during	workers.	•dotcom	(GATT)
the late 20th century.			•multinational
			corporation
OneAmericah's Story
hmhsocialstudies.com
|R IHMiMulxU It J 
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the major changes in the U.S. economy during the 1990s and early 2000s.
▲
Workers at the John Roberts clothing factory
As Bill Clinton took office in 1993, some regions of the nation, particularly the Northeast, were still in an economic recession. Near Kennebunkport, Maine, the John Roberts clothing factory faced bankruptcy. With help from their union, the factory workers were able to turn their factory into an employee-owned company.
Ethel Beaudoin, who worked for the company for more than 30
years, was relieved that the plant would not be closing.
A
Personal Voice ethel beaudoin “ It’s a nice feeling to be part of the process ... of deciding what this company buys for machinery and to know the customers more intimately. They’re our customers, and it’s a nicer feeling when the customers know that the coat that we put out is made by owners/’
—quoted in Divided We Fall
Beaudoin's experience offered one example of the economic possibilities in America. A new global economy—brought about by new technologies, increased international competition, and the end of the Cold War—changed the nation's economic prospects.
The Shifting Economy
Americans heard a great deal of good news about the economy. Millions of new jobs were created between 1993 and 1999. By the fall of 2000, the unemployment rate had fallen to the lowest it had been since 1970.
The United States in Today's Worh
y,C.ONOM/e
BACKGROUND
GREENSPAN AND THE FED
Alan Greenspan was chairman of the Federal Reserve System (the Fed) from 1987, when he was appointed by President Ronald Reagan, until he retired in 2006. The Fed has been described as the economic pacemaker of the United States because it helps determine how much money there will be in the American economy.
Before being elected president in 2000, George W. Bush made it a point to meet with Alan Greenspan before meeting with any other government officials in Washington.
But there was alarming news as well. Wage inequality between upper- and lower-income Americans—the income gap—widened. Median household income began to drop. Although economists disagreed about the reasons for the economy's instability most everyone agreed it was undergoing significant changes.
MORE SERVICE, LESS SECURITY
Chief among the far-reaching changes in the workplace of the 1990s was the explosive growth of jobs in the service sector, the part of the economy that provides services to consumers. By 2008, nearly 80 percent of American workers were teachers, medical professionals, lawyers, engineers, store clerks, waitstaff, and other service workers. Low-paying jobs, such as sales and fast-food, grew fastest. These positions, often part-time or temporary, offered limited benefits. Many corporations, rather than invest in salaries and benefits for full-time staff, hired temporary workers, or temps, and began to downsize—trim payrolls to streamline operations and increase profits. These private sector decisions to downsize were meant to create economic opportunities for some citizens. By increasing profits, they benefited the shareholders who owned corporate stock. However, they also had unintended consequences for the economy as a whole. Manpower, Inc., a temporary services agency, became the largest U.S. employer, earning $2 billion in 1993 when 640,000 Americans cashed its paychecks. In 2008, about one-fifth of the nation's labor force worked in temporary or part-time positions.
Of those cut in downsizing, younger workers suffered higher rates of unemployment. In 2008, about 14 percent of workers aged 16 to 24 were unemployed—more than double the national rate. And many young Americans are living at home longer and are less financially secure than American youth in the past.
FARMS AND FACTORIES
The nation's shift to a service economy came at the expense of America's traditional workplaces. Manufacturing, which surpassed farming mid-century as the largest job sector, experienced a sharp decline in the 1980s and 1990s. In 1992, for example, 140,000 steelworkers did the same work that 240,000 had accomplished ten years earlier. The decline in industrial jobs contributed to a drop in union membership. In 1945, 35 percent of American workers belonged to unions; by 2008, only 12 percent were union members. In the 1990s and early 2000s, unions had trouble organizing. High-tech and professional workers felt no need for unions, while low-wage service employees feared losing their jobs in a strike. Some workers saw their incomes decline. The increased use of computer-driven robots to make manufactured goods eliminated many jobs, but it also spurred a vibrant high-tech economy. Those with advanced training and specialized technical skills or a sense of entrepreneurial risk-taking saw their salaries rise and their economic security expand.
HIGH-TECH INDUSTRIES
In the late 1990s, entrepreneurs turned innovative ideas about computer technology into huge personal fortunes, hoping to follow in the footsteps of Bill Gates, the decade's most celebrated entrepreneur. Gates founded the software company Microsoft. By 2008, it had made him the second wealthiest individual in the world, with assets estimated at about $53 billion. A rapid outcropping of new businesses accompanied the explosive growth of
the Internet late in the decade. The NASDAQ (National Association of Securities
Dealers Automated Quotation System), a technology-dominated stock index on
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
How did
the change from an industrial economy to a service economy affect Americans' economic security?
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
How did
downsizing affect people?
870 Chapter 26
Persons Employed in Three Economic Sectors*
Year	Farming	Manufacturing	Service Producing
1900	11,050	7,252	6,832
1950	6,001	18,475	20,721
2012	994	16,994	112,654
*numbers in thousands Sources: Historical Statistics of the United States, Colonial Times to 1970; Statistical Abstracts of the United States, 1953, 1954; Bureau of Labor Statistics (online)			
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Charts 1- What sector of the U.S. economy has seen the greatest decline in workers over the past century? 2. In terms of employee participation, by roughly how many times did the service sector grow between 1950 and 2012? Wall Street, rose dramatically as enthusiasm grew for high-tech businesses. These businesses were known as dotcoms, a nickname derived from their identities, or addresses, on the World Wide Web, which often ended in ".com." The dotcoms expanded rapidly and attracted young talent and at times excessive investment funding for such untested fledgling companies.
Thousands of smaller businesses were quick to anticipate the changes that the Internet would bring. Suddenly companies could work directly with consumers or with other companies. Many predicted that the price of doing business would fall markedly and that overall worldwide productivity would jump dramatically.
The boom of new business was termed "The New Economy."
However, the positive economic outlook fueled by "The New Economy" was short lived. In 2000, only 38 percent of online retailing made a profit. As a result, many dotcoms went out of business. This decline had many causes. Entrepreneurs often provided inadequate advertising for their e-companies. Also, many dotcoms had hard-to-use Web sites that confused customers. The unsuccessful dotcoms caused many investors to stop putting money in Internet businesses.
In 2002, the U.S. economy was also hard hit by corporate scandals, when Enron was charged with using illegal accounting practices and WorldCom filed what was then the largest bankruptcy claim in U.S. history. Investors began to lose faith in corporations. In addition, the continued threat of international terrorism had a negative effect on the economy. All of these factors caused the NASDAQ to decline. After the NYSE and NASDAQ rose again to record highs in 2007, they both were rocked by the global financial crisis of 2008 and 2009.
Change and the Global Economy
In 1900 U.S. trade with the rest of the world was worth about $2.2 billion (roughly 12 percent of the economy). Over a century later, U.S. trade with other countries exceeded $4 trillion (about 30 percent of the economy). As American companies competed for international and domestic markets, American workers felt the sting of competing with workers in other countries.
INTERNATIONAL TRADE
The expansion of U.S. trade abroad was an important goal of President Clinton's foreign policy. In 1994, in response to increasing international economic competition among trading blocs, the United States joined many other nations in adopting a new version of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT). The new treaty lowered trade barriers, such as tariffs, and established the World Trade Organization (WTO) to resolve trade disputes. The United States in Today's Worl

’US'
World Trading Blocs, 2010
NEW"
ZEALAND
Andean Community (CAN)
Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC)
Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN)
Central American Common Market (CACM)
Caribbean Community and Common Market (CARICOM) Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS)
Council of Arab Economic Unity (CAEU)
European Free Trade Association (EFTA)
European Union (EU)
Group of Eight (G8)
Economic and Monetary Community of Central Africa (CEMAC)
North American Free Trade Agreement (NARA)
Organization of the Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) Southern Common Market (MERCOSUR)
Southern African Development Community (SADC)
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Location What is the only G-8 country located outside Europe and North America?
2.	Location To which world trade organizations does the United States belong?
E3
a
INTERNATIONAL COMPETITION
With the increase of global trade, many U.S. businesses transformed into multinational corporations, or large corporations with branches in several countries. Multinational corporations are beneficial in that they provide new jobs, goods, and services around the world and spread technological advances. However, by building factories in countries with lax governmental regulation, some multinational corporations may be able to employ harmful environmental and labor policies, leading to pollution and unsafe working conditions. Also, international trade agreements caused some American workers to worry about massive job flight to countries that produced the same goods as the United States but at a lower cost. In the 1990s, U.S. multinational corporations frequently moved their operations to less economically advanced countries, such as Mexico, where wages were lower. After the passage of NAFTA, more than 100,000 low-wage jobs were lost in U.S. manufacturing industries such as apparel, auto parts, and electronics. Also, competition with foreign companies helped U.S. companies to maintain low wages and decrease benefits, jgj
INTERNATIONAL SLOWDOWN
Around the turn of the 21st century, the global economy began to slow down. Between 1997 and 2002, the gross domestic product in Japan declined by 6 percent. In 2001, the economies of more than a dozen countries were in recession, and many other countries reported lower growth Background
“Job flight" had occurred in the 1970s, when cheap but quality auto imports from Japan and Germany forced many U.S. workers out of high-paying jobs.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
Q)
What were some of the
effects of NAFTA
ond ft ATT?
872 Chapter 26
rates than they had the previous year.
The flow of foreign direct investment (FDI) to developing countries declined dramatically. As a result, the economies of these countries were particularly hard hit. For example, the overall growth of Africa's economies slowed to 2.7 percent in 2002.
The U.S. economy also suffered. As it happened, both the U.S. and world economies began to reverse the downward trend by 2004. However, in late 2007 a global financial crisis began, brought on by the collapse of several major banking firms. Financially secure banks cut back on lending. As a result, businesses found it difficult to get the credit they needed to invest in new
inventory or pay their employees, much less hire new ones. The U.S. unemployment rate jumped and the stock market dipped, earning the period the nickname the "Great Recession."
In response to the economic downturn, the government passed legislation intended to spur recovery through investment in the public and private sectors. The Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP) committed $475 billion to stabilize the U.S. banking and automobile industries. The American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (ARRA) distributed over $8 billion in funds to individuals in the form of tax credits and through programs such as Medicaid, food stamps, and unemployment benefits. ARRA also impacted the private sector through grants and loans for government contracts awarded to American businesses. Several economic studies agree that the government's stimulus efforts added jobs, increased GDP, and reduced unemployment. The recession officially ended in June 2009, though some worry that the economy remains on uncertain footing.
•service sector •downsize
• Bill Gates •dotcom

▲
A
Lehman Brothers worker is surrounded by photographers on the day that the investment bank declared bankruptcy. 1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
• General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT)
•multinational
corporation
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a cluster diagram like the one below, record the major changes that occurred in the U.S. economy during the 1990s.
Which change has affected you the most? Explain.
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING CAUSES
A variety of factors affect the U.S. economy. Identify and discuss the role of each with a partner.
Think About:
•	individuals, including entrepreneurs
•	multinational corporations
•	government policies and legislation in the private and public sectors
•	international events
ANALYZING ISSUES
How do you explain some Americans’ fears over the international trade agreements?
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
How was downsizing a private sector action meant to create economic opportunities for citizens? What were its unintended consequences?
The United States in Today's World

I
lilljj
KELO v. CITY OF NEW LONDON (2005)
ORIGINS OF THE CASE
In 1998, a private company proposed building a research facility on a large piece of unused land in New London, Connecticut. Hoping the new facility would revive the surrounding area's economy, the city planned to use its power of eminent domain to give nearby land to a private developer. The developer intended to tear down the private homes that were occupying the land in order to build a hotel, restaurants, shops, offices, and private high-rise apartments. The city believed these projects qualified as public use, but local homeowners including Susette Kelo disagreed and took the matter to the courts. THE RULING
The Supreme Court ruled that the planned development of the land qualified as a public use because It was intended to improve the city’s poor economy. LEGAL REASONING
The Fifth Amendment’s Takings Clause gives the government the right of eminent domain, the power to take private property for public use. The question in Kelo v. City of New London was whether the economic benefits of a private development constitute public use under the Fifth Amendment.
Justice John Paul Stevens, writing for the 5-4 majority, ruled:
LEGAL SOURCES
“For more than a century, our public use jurisprudence has wisely eschewed [avoided] rigid formulas and intrusive scrutiny in favor of affording legislatures broad latitude in determining what public needs justify the use of the takings power.”
According to the Court, the Fifth Amendment did not require a literal definition of public use; the “broader and more natural interpretation of public use as ‘public purpose’” was sufficient.
In her dissenting opinion, Justice Sandra Day O’Connor argued that the decision blurred the distinction between private and public use of property.
“Under the banner of economic development, all private property is now vulnerable to being taken and transferred to another private owner, so long as it might be upgraded—i.e., given to an owner who will use it in a way that the legislature deems more beneficial to the public—in the process.”
U.S. CONSTITUTION
U.S. CONSTITUTION, FIFTH AMENDMENT
(1791) “[N]or shall private property be taken for public use, without just compensation.”
U.S. CONSTITUTION, FOURTEENTH AMENDMENT
(1868) “[N]or shall any state deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law. . .
RELATED CASES
BERMAN v. PARKER (1954)
The Court interpreted the Takings Clause of the Fifth Amendment, determining that private property can be taken for a “public purpose" with just compensation.
HAWAII HOUSING AUTHORITY
v. MIDKIFF (1984) The Court held that the power of eminent domain allowed a state to take property from an oligopoly for distribution to a wider population of private residents.
874 Chapter 26
WHY IT MATTERED
The Fifth Amendment protects an individual’s right to own private property. This protection is one of the principles upon which our economic system is based. However, the same amendment also gives government the right to take private property for public use, with just compensation. This right allows government officials to force property owners to sell their land to the government at what is determined to be a fair price. In many instances, the government’s use of eminent domain is beneficial for communities and the individuals and industries that live and operate there. For example, for years the right has been used to create public roads or railroad tracks that improve transportation and make trade more efficient, benefiting the community as a whole.
By expanding the definition of public use to include ventures by private developers, Kelo has also expanded the circumstances under which local governments can seize private property. This decision has the potential to broaden the impact of governmental actions on individuals,
industries, and communities with
respect to Fifth Amendment proper-
ty rights. Some observers worried
that the Kelo decision would allow
governments to take actions that
would benefit some at the
expense of the others.
HISTORICAL IMPACT
The Kelo decision has served as something of a cautionary tale. Many Americans worried that the ruling gave local government too much power to abuse its right of eminent domain. In response,
43 state legislatures and 8 state supreme courts have taken measures to restrict the use of eminent domain and strengthen property rights protections. In June 2013, the House Judiciary Committee approved the Private Property Rights Protection Act, which would prohibit governments that receive federal funds from using eminent domain to transfer private property from one owner to another for economic development. The legislation is a direct response to the Kelo ruling. In New London, the company whose research facility prompted the development has announced plans to leave the area, and the condemned and bulldozed neighborhood where Susette Kelo once lived remains vacant.
Susette Kelo stands outside her New London home.


1
Llii
THINKING CRITICALLY
CONNECT TO HISTORY
1. Developing Historical Perspective Do research to find another example of a government exercising its right of eminent domain. Explain how the governments actions in that instance affected individuals, industries, and the community.
CONNECT TO TODAY
2. Do you think the government’s right of eminent domain always serves the public good? What impact does such an action have on Fifth Amendment property rights? Explain your opinion, as well as any circumstances under which your perspective might change.
hmhsocialstudies.com
The United States in Today's World
I
I
I


TEKS IOC, 27A,27C,28A,28B,28C
Technology and Modern Life
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Advances in technology have increased not only the pace but also the comfort of many Americans’ daily lives.
Providing access to the new technology and regulating its use are two current challenges facing 21st-century America.
rOne American's Storyj
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on technological changes discussed in this section.
For years, Rudy Garcia-Tolson was confined to a wheelchair. After undergoing a double amputation he was fitted with carbon fiber prostheses—artificial replacements for missing body parts. These lightweight, strong, and durable new legs now make many things possible for Rudy.
A
Personal Voice rudy garcia-tolson 661 told them to cut my legs off. I saw pictures of people running with prosthetic legs. I didn’t want to stay in a wheelchair. ... My legs won’t stop me. Nothing stops me.... I like to show kids that there’s no limitations— kids or challenged people or adults, there’s no limitations to what a person can do. . . . My motto Is, If you have a brave heart, that's a powerful weapon. ”
—quoted in Press-Enterprise, January 1, 2000
Advances in medical technology have permitted Rudy to live a more fully active life. He competes in races and won a gold medal in swimming at the 2004 paralympics. Throughout the 20th century and into the 21st, technological developments helped Americans become more active in
:	Terms & Names	
• information	•Telecommuni-
superhighway	cations Act of
• Internet	1996
•telecommute	•genetic
	engineering
The Communications Revolution
In his 2011 State of the Union address, President Obama explained, "Our" free
enterprise system is what drives innovation." Private businesses are motivated by
profit to develop better products than their competitors. At times, the government
supports innovation by providing funding. These combined efforts have allowed
Americans to benefit from new, life-changing technologies.
876 Chapter 26
Analyzing
Political Cartoons j-
“VACATION, 2000”
By the end of the 20th century, millions of Americans owned any number of personal communication devices. People were able to speak to or correspond with each other instantaneously almost anytime, almost anywhere. The cartoon suggests that Americans are dependent on their communication devices, and that the once relaxing and peaceful family vacation has given way to the hustle and bustle of constant access.
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons
1.	What modern-day communication devices are being used in this cartoon?
2.	In what ways do the characters in this cartoon seem trapped by modern-day communications technology?
ENTERING THE INFORMATION AGE
In the 1980s, the computer industry transformed the world. Instead of giant mainframes and minicomputers, desktop workstations now ruled business. Home computers became widely available. The information superhighway—a network of communication devices linking people and institutions across the nation and the world—promised to advance the revolution further. In 1994, Vice President Al Gore began to oversee the government's participation in developing this superhighway. Even though private industries would build the superhighway, the government would keep access democratic, ensure affordable service for everyone, protect privacy and property rights, and develop incentives for investors. Vocabulary
Interface:
the point of communication between a computer and any other entity, such as a printer or human operator
The 1990s enjoyed explosive growth of the Internet, an international network linking computers and allowing almost instant transmittal of text, images, and sound to users around the world. Use of the network was further popularized by the World Wide Web, which provided a simple visual interface for words and pictures to be seen by an unlimited audience. Through an electronic connection, such as a TV cable or phone line, users could access an array of media, from streaming video to research archives, from online shopping catalogs to customized news broadcasts. As businesses, schools, and organizations began to use the Web as a primary form of communication, new forms of social interaction emerged. Users developed online communities, such as MySpace and Facebook, to "meet" and communicate with one another. By 2009, nearly 228 million Americans used the Internet regularly to send email, to network, to share music and photos, or to browse through pages on the Web.
BUSINESS AND MARKETPLACE APPLICATIONS
The late-20th-century advances in computers and communications have had an impact on American society and business comparable to the industrial developments of the late 1800s. The desire to capitalize on these innovations for profit drove several companies to enter the marketplace with technology products developed for personal use. As a result, consumers now clamor for the most current technology in cell phones, laptop computers and tablets, and other personal electronic devices. The United States in Today's World
These innovations have affected the workplace as well. Because of cell phones, fax machines, the Internet, wireless connectivity, and overnight shipping, people can more readily telecommute, or work from a location of their choice instead of going to an office every day Computer-based management techniques have also allowed many businesses to streamline. For instance, some manufacturers have implemented just-in-time (JIT) systems, in which they bring in only as many raw materials as are needed to produce the goods their customers demand. Such efficiencies allow them to use their resources elsewhere.
LEGISLATING TECHNOLOGY
In the 1980s, the government was slow to recognize the implications of the new communications technology. In 1994, however, the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) began to auction the valuable rights to airwaves and collected over $9 billion. Then, with the rapid growth in the communications industry, the federal government took several steps to ensure that consumers received the best service. Congress passed the Telecommunications Act of 1996, removing barriers that had previously prevented one type of communications company from starting up or buying another related one. While it increased competition in the industry, the law also paved the way for major media mergers. When Capital Cities/ABC Inc. joined the Walt Disney Company, industry watchdogs noted that this reflected the trend toward concentrating media influence in the hands of a few powerful conglomerates. The passage of the Telecommunications Act won applause from the communications industry but only mixed reviews from the public. Consumer activists worried that the law would fail to ensure equal access to new technologies for rural residents and poor people. Civil rights advocates contended that the Communications Decency Act (part of the Telecommunications Act) restricted free speech because it barred the transmission of "indecent" materials to minors via the Internet. Since the early 2000s, the issue of network neutrality has created considerable controversy. Supporters of network neutrality want regulations established that would prevent service providers or the government from restricting access to, or content delivered on, the Internet.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
Explain the revolutionary nature of communicating via the Internet.
Scientific Advances Enrich Lives
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
How might the Telecommunications Act affect consumers?
At NASA Langley Research Center in Virginia, an aerospace engineer wearing stereo glasses sees a 3-D view of a space station simulation, as shown in the background.
The exciting growth in the telecommunications industry in the 1990s and early 2000s was matched by developments that revolutionized robotics, space exploration, and medicine. The world witnessed marvels that for many echoed science fiction.
SIMULATION, ROBOTICS, AND MACHINE INTELLIGENCE
Visual imaging and artificial intelligence (a computer's ability to perform activities that require intelligence) were combined to provide applications in industry, medicine, and education. For example, virtual reality began with the flight simulators used to train military and commercial pilots. Today, with a headset that holds tiny video screens and earphones, and with a data glove that translates hand movements to a computer screen, a user can navigate a "virtual landscape." Doctors have used virtual reality to take a computerized tour of a patient's throat and lungs to check for medical problems. Surgeons have performed longdistance surgery through telepresence systems— gloves, computers, and robotic elements specially 878 Chapter 26
wired so that a doctor can operate on a patient hundreds of miles away. Architects and engineers have used virtual reality to create models of their designs. Modeling also affected the nightly newscast. Using supercomputers and improved satellite data, meteorologists could offer extended weather forecasts that reached the accuracy of one-day forecasts of 1980. The use of such technologies has increased worker productivity.
As technology became more sophisticated, computers increased in capability. IBM s Deep Blue defeated chess champion Garry Kasparov in 1997. Computational linguists steadily improved natural language understanding in computers, thus fine tuning the accuracy of voice recognition systems.
Robots grew more humanlike as engineers equipped them with high-capacity chips simulating brain function. By the early 2000s, robots had the ability to walk on two legs, interact with people, learn taught behaviors, and express artificial feelings with facial gestures.
Background
The International Space Station was established by joining and expanding upon the Russian station, Mir, and the American Spacelab.
SPACE EXPLORATION
In the 1990s, astronomy expanded our view of the universe. In 1997, NASA's Pathfinder and its rover Sojourner transmitted live pictures of the surface of Mars to millions of Internet users. Shuttle missions, meanwhile, concentrated on scientific research and assembly, transport, and repair of orbiting objects, paving the way to possible human missions to Mars and other space travel in the coming century. NASA concentrated on working with other nations to build the International Space Station (ISS). The ISS promised to offer scientists a zero-gravity laboratory for research in medicine, space mechanics and architecture, and long-term living in space. Ellen Ochoa, part of the first shuttle crew to dock to the ISS, hoped to inspire young students:
A
Personal Voice ellen ochoa Tm not trying to make everyone an astronaut, but I want students to think about a career and the preparation they’ll need... tell students that the opportunities I had were a result of having a
good educational background. Education is what allows you to stand out.”
Dr. Ellen Ochoa
-quoted in Stanford University School of Engineering Annual Report, 1997-98.
A shuttle crew in 1993 aboard the Endeavor repaired the Hubble Space Telescope, which returns dazzling intergalactic views. In late 1995, astronomers using observatories discovered the first planet outside our own solar system. Since then dozens more have been detected. On July 21, 2011, the Atlantis crew completed the final mission of NASA's 30-year shuttle program. However, U.S. space exploration goes on and continues to benefit Americans' quality of life in many ways. In addition to the discoveries we can make about the universe, the innovation required to develop vehicles and other systems for space travel has yielded many products of use on Earth, from sunglasses and smoke detectors to the magnetic resonance imagery (MRI) machines used for medical scans. Also, space exploration is inspiring to society as a whole, convincing Americans that no challenge is too big to overcome.
BIOTECHNOLOGY
The most profound insight into the book of life came from the field of biotechnology. The Human Genome Project, an international effort to map the genes of the human body, and Celera, a private company in molecular biology, simultaneously announced in 2000 that they had sequenced nearly all of the human genome only a decade after the research began. Cooperation via the Internet and access to computerized databases by multiple research groups vastly accelerated the scientists' ability to identify and order over three billion chemical "letters" of The United States in Today's World 87
Researchers work at the Beijing Genomics Institute at Shenzhen in southern China.
the genetic code of DNA. Molecular biologists hoped that this genetic map would offer the key to treating many inherited diseases and diagnosing congenital disabilities, and that drug makers could one day design pharmaceuticals for each patient's particular profile.
DNA had been in the spotlight before the breakthrough announcement. In well-publicized legal proceedings, prosecutors relied on DNA evidence to help prove the guilt of defendants who may have left behind a single hair at a crime scene. Others, wrongly imprisoned, were released when genetic analysis proved their innocence.
But different opinions arose over some of the new
"biotechnology." Some speculated that technological progress outpaced social evolution and society’s ability to grapple with the consequences. In 1997, Scottish researchers cloned Dolly the sheep from one cell of an adult sheep. Shortly thereafter, two Rhesus monkeys were cloned in Oregon, and many wondered whether human cloning was next. Firms sought to patent genes used for medical and research applications, using the principle of invention and property. Advances such as these, as well as gene therapy, artificial human chromosomes, and testing embryos for genetic defects all sparked heated debates among scientists, ethicists, religious leaders, and politicians.
The use of genetic engineering—the artificial changing of the molecular biology of organisms' cells to alter an organism—also aroused public concern. However, the Federal Department of Agriculture (FDA) holds that genetically engineered foods are safe and that they require no extra labeling. Scientists in the late 1990s modified corn and rice to provide resistance to pests and increase nutritional value. In 1996, the European Union limited the importation of such products in response to consumer pressure, allowing only those clearly labeled as having been genetically modified.
MEDICAL PROGRESS
People suffering from some diseases benefited from advances in medicine in the 1990s and early 2000s. Cancer survival rates improved drastically as clinicians explored the use of gene therapy, genetically engineered antibodies, and immune system modulation. Improvements in tracking the spread of HIV—the virus that causes AIDS (acquired immune deficiency syndrome)—through the body made researchers better prepared to find a cure. AIDS patients were treated with combination therapies, and public health officials advocated abstinence and "safer sex" practices to control the spread of HIV. Improved technology for making medical diagnoses offered new hope as well. Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), for example, was used to produce cross-sectional images of any part of the body. Advances that will make the MRI procedure ten times faster will also make MRI more widely available and cheaper to use. Medical researchers look ahead to using fleets of tiny "nanosensors ” one-thousandth the width of a human hair to find tumors and to deploying "nano-bots" to repair tissues and even genes.
Background
In 2007, about 14,100 Americans died from AIDS, roughly one-third the 1992 number.
care.
880 Chapter 26
ENVIRONMENTAL MEASURES
Energy consumption in the United States has been increasing gradually since the 1970s. Despite efforts to cut petroleum consumption since the energy crisis, the transportation sector remains almost completely dependent on petroleum. In 2009, Americans consumed 8.8 million barrels of petroleum in the form of gasoline per day. Use of coal, natural gas, and other energy sources has also increased since the 1970s, as Americans have adopted more technologies requiring electricity to operate in their homes and workplaces. While the total energy consumption is going up, however, energy use per household has been on the decline. Increased energy efficiency of appliances, heating, and air conditioning has offset increases in home size and use of household electronics. As more products requiring energy to function become a part of Americans' daily lives, they continue to find ways to use energy more efficiently. With the spreading use of technology came greater concern about the impact of human activities on the natural environment. Scientists have continued examining ways to reduce American dependence on pollution-producing fossil fuels. Fossil fuels such as oil provided 84 percent of the energy in the United States in 2009 but also contributed to poor air quality, acid rain, and global warming. Many individuals have tried to help by reducing consumption of raw materials. The recycling of glass bottles and jars, plastic bottles, newspapers, cardboard, and aluminum cans and other materials is now commonplace. In 2007, recycling saved the energy equivalent of nearly 11 billion gallons of gasoline.
IMPROVED STANDARD OF LIVING
American scientific discoveries and technological innovations have had a positive affect on the standard of living. Improvements in communication and transportation have made it possible for the United States to participate in the global economy. New technological advances led to new industries, which created jobs for more Americans. Innovations have improved productivity, which enables prices of goods and services to decline and wages to increase. As a result, Americans are able to take advantage of consumer technologies such as personal computers and mobile devices that make their lives easier. Finally, new medical technologies improve health and increase life expectancy. However, the pace of innovation has slowed since the 1970s. The federal government and private industries will have to work together to reinvigorate American innovation so that the nation can continue to reap the benefits. 13
\ ASSESSMENT
B
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
• Information superhighway •Internet
•telecommute
•Telecommunications Act of 1996
•genetic engineering
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
On a chart like the one shown, list four of the technological changes described in this section and explain how each change has affected your life.
Technological Change	Effect on Me
1.	
2.	
3.	
4.	
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING EFFECTS
Explain the effects of scientific discoveries and technological innovations on U.S. economic development. How do they improve the standard of living?
ANALYZING ISSUES
How does the free enterprise system drive innovation and its application in the marketplace?
5.	SUMMARIZING
How has the application of technological innovations in the workplace improved productivity?
Think About:
•	computers
•	robotics
•	just-in-time systems
ANALYZING EFFECTS
Explain how space technology and exploration improves the quality
The United States in Today's World
Hurricane Katrina Proposition 187
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on demographic changes in the United States.
One American's Story

Every ten years the United States conducts a census, or head count of its population. The results of the census determine, among other things, how billions of federal dollars are spent for housing, health care, and education over the coming decade. The Census Bureau estimates that the 1990 census undercounted Latinos by more than five percent. This undercount resulted in a loss of millions of dollars of aid to municipalities with large Latino populations, as well as denying Latinos political representation in all levels of government.
During the census conducted in 2000, Antonia Hernandez, President and General Counsel of the Mexican American Legal Defense and Education Fund (MALDEF), spearheaded the national jHagase Contar! Make Yourself Count! campaign. MALDEF workers canvassed neighborhoods urging residents to complete the census. They stressed that all information was fidential and discussed the high stakes of being counted.
con-
Antonia
Hernandez,
MALDEF’s
president
1985-2003
A
Personal Voice antonia hernandez “ The census not only measures our growth and marks our place in the community, but it is the first and indispensable step toward fair political representation, equal distribution of resources, and enforcement of our civil rights.” —Public statement for iHagase Contar! campaign, 2000
Data from the 2000 census revealed that the Hispanic population had grown by close to 58 percent since 1990, reaching 35.3 million. In the next seven years, it grew by nearly 30 percent to 45.5 million.
Urban Challenges
One of the most significant socio-cultural changes in American history has been
the movement of Americans from the cities to the suburbs. The years after World
War II through the 1980s saw a widespread pattern of urban flight, the process
in which Americans left the cities and moved to the suburbs. At mid-century the
population of cities exceeded that of suburbs. By 1970, the ratio became even
882 Chapter 26
By the early 2000s, after decades of decline, some major cities across the country had increased their populations while others slowed or halted declines. The transformation of the United States into a nation of suburbs had intensified the problems of the cities.
j MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
$ List the factors that influenced middle-class residents to leave cities for suburbs.
CAUSES OF URBAN CHANGE
Several factors contributed to the movement of Americans out of the cities. Because of the continued movement of job-seeking Americans into urban areas in the 1950s and 1960s, many urban American neighborhoods became overcrowded. Overcrowding in turn contributed to such urban problems as increasing crime rates and decaying housing. During the 1970s and early 1980s, city dwellers who could afford to do so moved to the suburbs for more space, privacy, and security. Often, families left the cities because suburbs offered newer, less crowded schools. As many middle-class Americans left cities for the suburbs, the economic base of many urban neighborhoods declined, and suburbs grew wealthy. Following the well-educated labor force, more industries relocated to suburban areas in the 1990s. The economic base that provided tax money and supported city services in large cities such as New York, Detroit, and Philadelphia continued to shrink as people and jobs moved outward.
In addition, many downtown districts fell into disrepair as suburban shoppers abandoned city stores for suburban shopping malls. According to the 1990 census, the 31 most impoverished communities in the United States were in cities.
By the mid-1990s, however, as the property values in the nation's inner cities declined, many people returned to live there. In a process known as gentrification, they purchased and rehabilitated deteriorating urban property, oftentimes displacing lower income people. Old industrial sites and neighborhoods in locations convenient to downtown became popular, especially among young, single adults who preferred the excitement of city life and the uniqueness of urban neighborhoods to the often more uniform environment of the suburbs.
Architecture
History Through
REBUILDING THE RIVERFRONTS
As part of the effort to revitalize cities, a number of architects, landscape architects, and urban planners have focused on enhancing what for many urban centers had become a neglected eyesore—their waterfronts. In Pittsburgh, landscape architects turned a dreary strip of concrete and parking lot into Allegheny Riverfront Park, an inviting stretch of natural walkways and recreation areas.
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Visual Sources
1.	Why might landscape architects consider improving riverfronts to be a key part of revitalizing cities?
2.	In what other ways could architects and urban designers make city living more attractive?
The United States in Today's World
SUBURBAN LIVING
While many suburbanites continued to commute to city jobs during the 1990s and early 2000s, increasing numbers of workers began to telecommute, or use new communications technology, such as computers, modems, and fax machines, to work from their homes. Another notable trend was the movement of minority populations to the suburbs. Nationwide, by the early 2000s, more Latinos, Asians, and African Americans lived in the suburbs than lived in the core cities. Suburban growth led to intense competition between suburbs and cities, and among the suburbs themselves, for business and industry. Since low-rise suburban homes yielded low tax revenues, tax-hungry suburbs offered tax incentives for companies to locate within their borders. These incentives resulted in lower tax revenues for local governments—meaning that less funds were available for schools, libraries, and police departments. Consequently, taxes were often increased to fund these community services as well as to build the additional roads and other infrastructure necessary to support the new businesses.
The shift of populations from cities to suburbs was not the only significant change in American life in the 1990s and early 2000s. The American public was also growing older, and its aging raised complex issues for policymakers.
HURRICANE KATRINA
Urban areas can also face challenges due to extreme weather. In 2005, New Orleans experienced widespread flooding as a result of a combination of physical and human geographic factors. In August, Hurricane Katrina—a massive storm with sustained winds of 125 mph—made landfall along the coast of the Gulf of Mexico and devastated parts of Alabama, Mississippi, and Louisiana. Much of the city of New Orleans lies below sea level, using levees to hold back surrounding waters. The city was flooded when these levees failed in the aftermath of the hurricane. Investigations have revealed that design flaws in the levees caused them to burst under the weight of Hurricane Katrina's storm surge. The human suffering due to the storm and subsequent flooding was immense. The Aging of America
Vocabulary
infrastructure:
the basic facilities, services, and installations needed for the functioning of a community or society
The Graying of America, 1990-2030
Year	Number of Americans 65 and older*	Percent of U.S. population
1990	31,081	12.4
2000	34,837	12.7
2010	40,268	13.0
2020	54,804**	16.1**
2030	72,092**	19.3**
* numbers in thousands		
** projected totals		
Source: U.S. Census Bureau		
The U.S. Census Bureau documents that in 2008 Americans were older than ever before, with a median age of 36.8—four years older than in 1990. Increased longevity and the aging of the baby boom generation were the primary reasons for the rising median age.
Behind the rising median age lie several broad trends. The country's birthrate has slowed slightly, and the number of seniors has increased as Americans live longer because of advances in medical care and living healthier lifestyles. The number of people over 85 has increased at a faster rate than any other segment of the population, to 5.7 million in the year 2008.
The graying of America has placed new demands on the country's programs that provide care for the elderly. These programs accounted for only 6 percent of the national budget in 1955. By 2010, these programs consumed about one-third of the national budget.
The major programs that provide care for elderly and disabled people are Medicare and Social Security. Medicare, which pays medical expenses for senior citizens, began in 1965, when most Americans had lower life expectancies. By 2010, the costs of this program exceeded $465 billion.
884 Chapter 26
MAIN IDEA
Predicting
Effects
What are the factors that will force an eventual restructuring of Social Security?
Social Security, which pays benefits to retired Americans, was designed to rely on continued funding from a vast number of younger workers who would contribute taxes to support a small number of retired workers. That system worked well when younger workers far outnumbered retirees and when most workers didn't live long after retirement.
In 1996, it took Social Security contributions from three workers to support every retiree. By 2030, however, with an increase in the number of elderly persons and an expected decline in the birthrate, there will be only two workers' contributions available to support each senior citizen. Few issues loomed as large in the recent presidential elections as what to do about Social Security. If the government does not restructure the system, Social Security will eventually pay out more money than it will take in. Some people suggest that the system be reformed by raising deductions for workers, taxing the benefits paid to wealthier Americans, and raising the age at which retirees can collect benefits.
The Shifting Population
In addition to becoming increasingly suburban and elderly, the population of the United States has also been transformed by immigration. Between 1970 and 2010, the country's population swelled from 204 million to more than 309 million. Immigration accounted for much of that growth. As the nation's newest residents yearned for U.S. citizenship, however, other Americans debated the effects of immigration on American life.
A CHANGING IMMIGRANT POPULATION
The most recent immigrants to the United States differ from immigrants of earlier years. The large numbers of immigrants who entered the country before and just after 1900 came from Europe. Change in U.S. Foreign-Born Population, 2000-2011
Percentage Increase in Foreign-Born Population
■ 75.1% or greater « 50.1 to 75.0%
□ 25.1 to 50.0%
EZ3 25.0% or less
Foreign-born population increased nationally by 29.8%.
N.H.
Mass.
Source: U.S. Census Bureau
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
Movement Use the map to create a chart showing the percentage increase in foreign-born population for each state. Then use the map and your chart to pose and answer a question about geographic distributions and patterns.
The United States in Today's World 8l
Lowe Shee Miu, of Oakland, California, stands in front of a monument commemorating Chinese immigrants at Angel Island—the Ellis Island of the West.
In contrast, more than 30 percent of immigrants since the 1960s have come from Asia and about 50 percent from the Western Hemisphere, primarily Mexico.
In Mexico, for example, during three months in 1994-1995, the Mexican peso was devalued by 73 percent. The devaluation made the Mexican economy decline. As a result, almost a million Mexicans lost their jobs. Many of the unemployed headed north in search of jobs in the United States.
This search for a better opportunity continued throughout the 1990s as thousands of legal and illegal immigrants arrived each day—the vast majority from Mexico. To help those persons seeking more opportunity in America, a temporary guest worker program for those immigrants residing illegally in the United States was proposed several times in the early 2000s. By 2010, however, this guest worker program had not been enacted into law.
Census Bureau data indicated that patterns of immigration are changing the country's ethnic and racial makeup. By 2001, for example, California had
become a "majority-minority" state, with Asian Americans, Latinos, African Americans, and Native Americans making up more than half its population. By 2009, three other states—Hawaii, New Mexico, and Texas—had also become majority-minority states. Arizona, Georgia, Maryland, Mississippi, and New York were close, with minority populations of 40 percent.
DEBATES OVER IMMIGRATION POLICY
The presence of such a large number of immigrants has also added to the continuing debate over U.S. immigration policies. Many Americans believe that their country can't absorb more immigrants. By the early 1990s, an estimated 3.2 million illegal immigrants from Mexico, El Salvador, Guatemala, and Haiti had made their way to the United States. Many illegal immigrants also arrived from Canada, Poland, China, and Ireland. They took jobs many Americans turned down, as farm workers and domestic servants—often receiving the minimum wage or less and no benefits. By 2009, an estimated 10.8 million illegal immigrants resided in the United States. Hostility toward illegal immigration has increased in states such as California and Arizona, two states with high percentages of immigrants. In 1994, California passed Proposition 187, which cut all education and nonemergency health benefits to illegal immigrants. By March 1998, Proposition 187 was ruled unconstitutional. In 2010, Arizona passed a law that enhanced state and local police authority to enforce federal immigration laws. These efforts to control immigration inspired political participation among Hispanic voters, who saw themselves as targets.
As more immigrants make their way to the U.S. and the nation’s ethnic composition changes, debates about immigration will continue. Those who favor tighter restrictions argue that immigrants take desired jobs. Others, however, point to America's historical diversity and the new ideas and energy immigrantsbring.
Background
The U.S. Census has asked a race question on every census since the first survey in 1790. Since 1890, the categories and definitions have changed with nearly every census.
| ^ain ipea |
Comparing
How are
current arguments
against
immigration
similar to those
used in the past?
886 Chapter 26
NATIVE AMERICANS CONTINUE LEGAL BATTLES
As the nation debated its immigrant policies, the ancestors of America's original inhabitants continued to struggle. The end of the 20th century found most members of this minority enduring extremely difficult lives. In 2007, about 25 percent of Native Americans lived below the poverty line, more than two times the poverty rate for white Americans. Furthermore, Native Americans endured suicide rates and alcoholism rates that were considerably higher than that of the general population. In the face of such hardships, Native Americans strived to improve their lives. Throughout the 1990s, dozens of tribes attained greater economic independence by establishing thriving gaming resorts. Although controversial for promoting gambling, reservation gaming—$27 billion a year industry by 2008—provided Native Americans with much-needed money for jobs, education, social services, and infrastructure. Over the past decades, Native Americans have used the courts to attain greater recognition of their tribal ancestry and land rights. In 1999, for example, the U.S. Supreme Court ruled that the Chippewa Indians of Minnesota retained fishing and hunting rights on some 13 million acres of land that were guaranteed to them in an 1837 treaty. Across the nation, a number of other tribes have had similar land rights affirmed.
America in a New Millennium
As the 21st century begins, Americans face both new problems and old ones. Environmental concerns have become a global issue and have moved to center stage. Furthermore, poverty remains a problem for many Americans in the late 20th century, as does the increasing threat that terrorist acts pose to Americans at home and abroad.
It is clear that the new century America faces will bring changes, but those changes need not deepen divisions among Americans. With effort and cooperation, the change could foster growth and tolerance. The 20th century brought new ways of both destroying and enriching lives. What will the 21st bring? Much will depend on you—the dreamers, the decision makers, and the voters of the future.
1. TERMS & NAMES •urban flight
For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•gentrification	• Hurricane Katrina
Proposition 187
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Demography is the study of statistics about human populations. Use a table like the one below to summarize the demographic changes occurring in the United States.
Demographic Changes	
Urban distribution	
Age	
Ethnic and racial makeup	
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	HYPOTHESIZING
As urban problems become more common in the suburbs, how might the residents of suburbs respond? Base your answer on existing behavior patterns. Think About:
•	the spread of suburbs farther and farther from the city
•	the new ability to telecommute
•	the tax problems that suburbs face
COMPARING AND CONTRASTING
How was the immigration that occurred in the 1990s and early 2000s similar to and different from earlier waves of immigration?
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
How do disagreements over immigration policy reflect the benefits and challenges of a diverse population?
ANALYZING ISSUES
How did physical and human geographic factors impact the levee failure in New Orleans after Hurricane Katrina?
The United States in Today's World
TRACING THEMES
Immigration and Migration
Immigrants to the United States have been part of a worldwide movement pushing people away from traditional means of support and pulling them toward better opportunities. Most immigrants have left their homelands because of economic problems, though some have fled oppressive governments or political turmoil.
War has often been the deciding factor for people to immigrate to the United States or to migrate within the country. Others have migrated to escape poverty, religious persecution, and racial violence. But the chief lure in coming to the United States or migrating within its borders continues to be the opportunity to earn a living.

MIGRATING TO THE WEST
Throughout the 19th century, Americans continued their movement westward to the Pacific Ocean. Victory in the War with Mexico in 1848 greatly increased the amount of land under American control, and thousands of Americans moved out West to take advantage of it.
Two important consequences emerged from this movement. First, following the discovery of gold in California, hundreds of thousands of people from around the world rushed in to strike it rich. Within a year, there were enough residents in California to qualify it for statehood. Second, Americans disagreed over whether the new lands should be open to slavery. That disagreement fueled the fires that led to the Civil War.






! -

ADAPTING TO AMERICAN WAYS
With hope and apprehension, millions of foreign immigrants poured into America’s pulsing cities during the early 20th century. Bringing with them values, habits, and attire from the Old World, they faced a multitude of new experiences, expectations, and products in the New World.
Many native-born Americans feared that the new immigrants posed a threat to American culture. Instead of the immigrants being allowed to negotiate their existence by combining the old with the new, they were pressured to forget their old cultures, languages, and customs for more “American” ways.
MIGRATING FOR JOBS
Throughout the 20th century, African Americans migrated across the United States. In the Great Migration of the early 20th century, they left their homes in the rural South. Of the millions of African Americans who left, most moved to cities, usually in the North.
The Second Migration, sparked by World War II, allowed African Americans to take industrial jobs— many formerly held by whites—to support the war effort. This migration had lasting consequences for the civil rights movement. Many African Americans who remained in the South moved to cities, where they developed organizations that helped them fight segregation.

•!
IN SEARCH OF A NEW LIFE
In 1964, 603 Vietnamese lived in the United States. A decade later, as the Vietnam War ended, hundreds of thousands of Vietnamese refugees fled their homeland for other nations, including the United States. Vietnamese immigration to America continued, and by 1998 there were nearly 1 million Vietnamese-born persons living in the United States.
The men and women who made this long and arduous journey from Vietnam are part of the changing face of U.S. immigration. Beginning in the 1970s, Asians and Latin Americans replaced Europeans as the two largest immigrant groups in the United States. Between 1970 and 1990, about 1.5 million Europeans journeyed to America’s shores. During that same period, roughly 5.6 million Latin Americans and 3.5 million Asians arrived. This trend has continued. In 2008, the largest immigrant groups in the United States hailed from Mexico, the Philippines, India, and China and Hong Kong respectively. These most recent arrivals to the United States have come for largely the same reasons—greater freedom and economic opportunity and the chance to begin a new life.

Wit
The United States in Today's World
CHAPTER
ASSESSMENT
TERMS & NAMES
For each term or name below, write a sentence explaining its significance.
1.	William Jefferson Clinton
2.	NAFTA
3.	Contract with America
4.	George W. Bush
5.	service sector
MAIN IDEAS
6.
8.
9.
10.
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) Telecommunications Act of 1996
genetic engineering urban flight Proposition 187
The Changing Face of America
(pages 882-887)
7.	How has urban flight changed both cities and suburbs?
8.	What challenges do experts think the United States will face in the future?
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a time line of important events from the 2000 election, using a form like the one below. Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
The 1990s and The New Millennium
(pages 860-868)
1.	How did Clinton’s impeachment trial affect U.S. citizens’ trust in government and its leaders?
2.	What factors led George W. Bush to victory in 2000?
The New Global Economy (pages 869-873)
3.	Summarize which parts of the economy grew during the 1990s and which declined.
4.	Why was the World Trade Organization founded?
Technology and Modern Life (pages 876-881)
5.	What resources did the Internet make available?
6.	What were the positive and negative influences that technology had on American lives in the 1990s?
event
event
I
event
event
Which event do you think was the turning point? Explain.
DEVELOPING HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
Reread the Historic Decisions of the Supreme Court feature on pages 874-875. How does the principle of eminent domain demonstrate the effects of government actions on individuals, industries, and communities? How does it affect Fifth Amendment property rights? EXPLAINING TURNING POINTS
What is the significance of the years 2001 and 2008 as turning points in American history? Explain. VISUAL SUMMARY THE UNITED STATES IN TODAY'S WORLD
\
\

TECHNOLOGY
Technological revolution1 □
ECONOMICS
U.S. records its longest economic expansion. Service industries grow; manufacturing declines; telecommuting increases. Trade relations become globalized.
890
Clinton is impeached. U.S. becomes involved in conflicts in the Balkans and the Middle East. Election 2000 is settled by the Supreme Court; George W. Bush wins.
TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
Use the graphs below and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer questions 1 and 2.
)------------------------------
1.	Which U.S. population was too small to appear on the 2000 graph but is represented on the 2010 graph?
A
Latinos B
Native Hawaiians and other Pacific Islanders C whites D blacks
2.	What conclusion can be drawn from the 2010 census data, compared with the data from 2000?
F
There were more immigrants in the Midwest. G
The population of ethnic minorities increased. H
The 2000 census reflects a broader range of categories.
J
Immigration has slowed in the 2000s. 3.	Which country was not a member of the G8 in 2000?
A
China B Japan C Italy D
United States ^Whmhsocialstudies.com
I TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests • Tutorials

INTERACT WITH HISTORY
^WriteSmart Recall the issues that you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. As a “think tank”director who researches and analyzes future issues, you are asked to write a concise summary of the five most important issues facing Americans in the 21st century. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your summary. Then present it to the class.
&
ON WRITING
"’J'WriteSmart
Based on what you have read in this chapter, write a paragraph discussing the historical significance of the 2008 presidential election. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your paragraph.
COLLABORATIVE LEAR|
VCEHTURY
Working in a small group, use the Internet and library resources to find data about energy use in the United States since the 1960s. Consider the following:
•	How has energy use changed over the past several decades? What factors account for these changes?
•	How have changes in energy use impacted the American way of life?
Present your findings in a poster.
The United States in Today's Worh
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Creating Thematic Maps
DEFINING THE SKILL
Maps are scale representations, usually of land surfaces. (See Chapter 5 End-of-Chapter Skill Activity.) A thematic map is a special-purpose map that focuses on a particular topic. The location of football stadiums, a country's natural resources, election results, and major battles in a war are all topics you might see illustrated on a thematic map.
Creating a thematic map involves clarifying information and representing geographical data visually. Creating a map is similar to taking notes, except that you draw much of the information. When you draw, it is easiest to use an existing map as a guide. You can include data on climate and population and on patterns or distributions of human activity.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: CREATE A MAP
The following chart shows the numbers of immigrants who planned to settle in the southwestern states of the United States in 1995. The map below depicts the data given in the chart. 0 Determine what map you should use as a guide. Find a map of the Southwest that you can recreate.
0 Decide how best to show the data. These data can be grouped in three broad categories of numbers: more than 100,000; 10,000 to 100,000; and less than 10,000.
0 Select a title that identifies the geographical area and the map’s purpose. Include a date or time span.
0 If appropriate, draw and label the lines of latitude and longitude. Use the guide map’s scale and a ruler to help you correctly space the lines of latitude and longitude.
© Draw the subject of your map, following your guide map carefully. Color or mark the map to show its purpose. Use each color or symbol to represent similar information.
© Include a key or legend explaining colors, symbols, or shading. The map’s legend allows readers to interpret what the colors or symbols that you’ve used on your map mean. Also, reproduce the scale and compass rose from the map you used as a guide. These tools help readers to interpret your map within in a larger context.
APPLYING THE SKILL
Turn to Chapter 26, p. 889, in "Immigration and Migration" and read the section "1970-Present." Create a sketch map showing different continents from which people immigrated to the United States during this time period. Use a modern world map with continents outlined as a guide. You can add arrows from each continent pointing to the United States. Include a legend to indicate different figures from the immigration data.
1.	Determine what map you should use as a guide.
Find a map of the world that you can recreate.
2.	Decide how best to show the data.
What categories of numbers can you use to show immigration data on the map?
3.	Select a title that identifies the geographical area and the map’s purpose.
What date or time span can you include on your map? What title helps indicate its purpose?
4.	If appropriate, draw and label the lines of latitude and longitude.
Use the guide map’s scale and a ruler to help you correctly space the lines of latitude and longitude if it feels appropriate to add them to your map.
5.	Draw the subject of your map, following your guide map carefully.
Color or mark the map to show its purpose. What colors and symbols will you use for each continent or for different groups of data?
6.	Include a key or legend explaining colors, symbols, or shading.
Create a legend that indicates what the colors or symbols that you've chosen represent. Also, reproduce the scale and compass rose from the map you used as a guide.
891
Essential Question
myNotebook
What important issues does the United States face in the 21 st century?
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills (TEKS)
9A, 9B, 10E, 11B, 11C, 11F, 13B, 14A, 14B, 19B, 19E,22CZ 25C,25D, 26A,26C,31B SECTION 1: The War on Terrorism SECTION 2: Global Involvement
SECTION 3: Civil Rights in the 21st Century
SECTION 4: Immigration
SECTION 5: Social Issues and Government Responses
SECTION 6: Conservation and the Environment
SECTION 7: Globalization and Cultural Diffusion

I
Lv
L
ci- . J. I


wyNotebook
iy-
WITH HISTORY
You are an American citizen preparing to vote in an upcoming election. As a voter, it is your responsibility to be informed about the myriad issues confronting society and government today. You must educate yourself about all sides of these issues to ensure that you make the right choice at the voting booth. As you read the chapter and explore the issues below, use the annotation tools in your eBook to record your thoughts.
Explore the Issues
•	How do these issues affect you?
•	How can political decisions positively or negatively affect these issues?
•	How would you like your elected officials to approach these issues?
i *	Jr -

Issues for the^21st Century 8
TEKS19B
The War on Terrorism
How can the United States combat terrorism?
On the morning of September 11, 2001, two airliners crashed into the twin towers of the World Trade Center in New York City and a third smashed into a section of the Pentagon, across the river from Washington, D.C. A fourth airliner crashed in a field in the Pennsylvania countryside. Nineteen Arab terrorists had hijacked the four planes and used them as missiles in an attempt to destroy predetermined targets. The first three planes hit their intended targets. In the fourth plane, passengers fought the hijackers and the plane went down short of its target.
Explosions and raging fire severely weakened the twin towers. Within two hours after the attacks, both skyscrapers had crumbled to the ground. One wing of the Pentagon was extensively damaged. About 3,000 people were killed in the attacks—the most destructive acts of terrorism in modern history.
Historical Perspective
Terrorism is the use of violence against people or property to extort changes in societies or governments. Throughout history, individuals and groups have used terror tactics to achieve political or social goals. In recent decades, however, terrorist groups have carried out more and increasingly destructive attacks. Terrorist activities impact people of all ages around the world. The U.S. National Counterterrorism Center recorded over 14,000 terrorist incidents worldwide in 2006 alone.
Modern international terrorism gained world attention during the 1972 Summer Olympic Games in Munich, Germany. Members of a Palestinian group killed two Israeli athletes and took nine others hostage, later killing them. Palestinian terrorists also used airplane hijackings and suicide bombers.
Since then, terrorist activities have occurred across the globe. The Irish Republican Army (IRA) used terrorist tactics for decades to oppose British control of Northern Ireland. The IRA officially renounced violence in 2005. In South America, a group known as the Shining Path terrorized the residents of Peru throughout the late 20th century. The group sought to overthrow the government and establish a Communist state. In 2004, Islamic radicals killed and injured nearly 2,000 people with a series of bombs exploded on the Madrid subways.
Groups belonging to the al-Qaeda terrorist organization operate in many countries. Officials have linked several major attacks against U.S. facilities in Africa to al-Qaeda, including bombings at the U.S. embassies in Kenya and Tanzania. Jemaah Islamiah, an Islamic revolutionary group linked to al-Qaeda, has organized numerous attacks throughout Southeast Asia.
In 2011, a car bomb exploded outside the government quarter in Oslo,
Norway. Two hours later, Anders Behring Breivik took over an island with a sum-
mer camp in Buskerud and killed 69 individuals. In April of 2013, two bombs
exploded near the finish line at the Boston Marathon, in Boston, Massachusetts,
killing three and injuring 264.
894 Chapter 27
Tactics and Motives
Most terrorists target high profile events or crowded places such as subway stations, restaurants, or shopping malls. Terrorists choose these spots carefully to gain the most attention and to achieve the highest level of intimidation.
Terrorists use bullets and bombs as their main weapons. In recent years, however, some terrorist groups have used biological and chemical agents in their attacks. These actions involve the release of bacteria or poisonous gas into the air.
The reasons for terrorist attacks vary. Traditional motives include gaining independence, expelling foreigners, or changing society. These objectives frequently give rise to domestic terrorism—violence used by people to change the policies of their own government or to overthrow their government.
In the late 20th century, another type of terrorism began to emerge. Terrorists wanted to achieve political ends or destroy what they considered to be forces of evil. They attacked targets not just in their own country, but anywhere in the world. These terrorists were even willing to commit suicide to ensure the success of their attacks.
9/11 and Its Impact
On September 11, the weapons the terrorists used were planes loaded with fuel. The planes became destructive missiles when they crashed into their targets. Firefighters worked around the clock trying to find survivors in the wreckage. Medical workers rushed to staff the city's trauma centers. But after the first wave of injured were rescued, there were few survivors to treat.
A flood of volunteers assisted rescue workers. From around the country, people sent donations of blood, food, and money to New York City. After the first few days, the work at "ground zero," the World Trade Center disaster site, shifted to recovering bodies and removing the massive amount of debris.
Once the area was cleared, plans to rebuild the site were proposed. In February 2003, a development committee chose a design for a new building complex comprised of several buildings—including Freedom Tower, intended to be the tallest building in New York City—and a memorial park with reflecting pools. Construction of the new design began in 2006.
The attacks of September 11 dramatically altered the way Americans looked at life. For the first time, many Americans became afraid that terrorism could happen in their own country at any time.
This sense of vulnerability intensified when another wave of attacks hit the United States a few days after September 11. Letters containing anthrax spores were sent to people in the news media and to members of Congress in Washington, D.C. When inhaled, these spores could damage the lungs and cause death. Five people died after inhaling the spores in tainted letters.
Some investigators believed that the letters were sent by a lone terrorist and not by a terrorist group. No link between the letters and the September 11 attacks was ever found. The anthrax letters increased Americans' fear of terrorism.
The twin towers of the World Trade Center in New York burn after the September 11 attacks.
▼
Issues for the 21st Century
To help share information about the risk of terrorist attacks with the American people, the department created the Homeland Security Advisory System.
The United States Responds

After conducting a massive investigation, the U.S. government determined that Osama bin Laden, a Saudi Arabian millionaire, had directed the terrorists responsible for the September 11 attacks. The terrorists were part of the al-Qaeda network. The home base for al-Qaeda was Afghanistan, ruled by a strict Islamic regime called the Taliban. The Taliban supported the terrorist group. In return, bin Laden provided fighters to the Taliban.
The United States, led by President George W. Bush, built an international coalition, or alliance, to fight terrorism and the al-Qaeda
network. After the Taliban refused to turn over bin Laden, coalition forces led by the United States began military action in Afghanistan. In October 2001, the United States launched Operation Enduring Freedom. The military began bombing Taliban air defenses, airfields, and command centers, as well as al-Qaeda training camps. Within two months, U.S. special forces and marines and fighters from the Northern Alliance, a coalition of anti-Taliban Afghan troops, drove the Taliban from power.
American forces stormed into Iraq in March of 2003 over intelligence of weapons of mass destruction. By early April, Iraqi president Saddam Hussein's regime had fallen. He was later captured and the United States moved to establish a new Iraqi government. In the years that have followed, U.S. troops have been stationed throughout the Middle East to train local security forces and help resolve conflicts. President Barack Obama worked towards the withdrawal of military forces in Iraq from 2009-2011. In 2011, President Obama announced U.S. forces had finally succeeded in killing Osama bin Laden in Pakistan.
FIGHTING TERRORISM AT HOME
To combat terrorism on the home front, the Bush administration created the Department of Homeland Security in 2002. This executive department was designed to analyze threats, guard the nation's borders, seaports, and airports, and coordinate the country's response to attacks. The Department of Homeland Security also searched for terrorists in the United States. The government soon discovered that the al-Qaeda network had used "sleepers" to carry out its terrorist attacks. Sleepers are agents who enter a country, blend into a community, and when called upon, secretly prepare for and commit terrorist acts. U.S. officials detained and questioned Arabs and other Muslims who behaved suspiciously or violated immigration regulations. Many suspects captured in Afghanistan were held in a prison camp at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba. The United States faced criticism at home and abroad regarding its treatment of detainees. Critics claimed that detaining people without charging them and without access to attorneys violated their civil rights. The government argued that limiting civil liberties in wartime to protect national security was not unusual. U.S. officials used the same argument to try some terrorist suspects in military tribunals rather than in criminal courts.
USA PATRIOT ACT
In Congress, lawmakers took up the question about how to prevent future terrorist attacks. In the years before 2001, many lawmakers opposed measures that infringed on the civil rights of Americans. After 9/11, Congress quickly passed the USA PATRIOT Act on October 26, 2001 to give the government power to conduct search and surveillance of suspected terrorists. This law allowed the government to: 896 Chapter 27
•	detain foreigners suspected of terrorism for seven days without charging them with a crime. In some cases, prisoners were held indefinitely.
•	tap all phones used by suspects and monitor their e-mail and Internet use.
•	make search warrants valid across states.
•	order U.S. banks to investigate sources of large foreign accounts.
•	prosecute terrorist crimes without any time restrictions or limitations.
Some people questioned the constitutionality of the law. They claimed that it violated the First, Fourth, Fifth, Sixth, and Seventh Amendments. In 2005 it was revealed that President Bush had ordered the National Security Agency (NSA) to spy on American citizens' international telephone calls and e-mails without obtaining warrants.
Some critics complained that it gave law enforcement too much power and posed a threat to basic freedoms. To address these concerns, Congress agreed to let some provisions of the law expire after a certain period of time. Since that time, there have been repeated extensions on certain provisions for security purposes. In 2011, President Obama signed the PATRIOT Sunsets Extension Act.
An airport security official inspects a traveler’s shoe at a security checkpoint.
AVIATION SECURITY
The federal government's role in aviation security also increased. National Guard troops began patrolling airports, and sky marshals were assigned to airplanes. In November 2001, President Bush signed into law the Aviation and Transportation Security Act, which made airport security the responsibility of the federal government. Previously, individual airports had been responsible for their own security. Because of this new law, an agency called the Transportation Security Administration (TSA) was created to inspect airline passengers, baggage, and cargo, as well as noncitizens training to be pilots. The TSA is also responsible for safety on railroads, buses, and mass transit systems. As the United States fights terrorism and tries to balance national security with civil rights, the public debate over security measures continues. 1.	SUMMARIZING
How would you summarize the reaction of the American people to the attacks of 9/11?
ANALYZING EFFECTS
How did the U.S. government respond to the threat of terrorism after 9/11?
3.	EVALUATING
Why do some people think the USA PATRIOT Act is unconstitutional? Explain the constitutional issues raised by this act and other responses to the 9/11 terrorist attack.
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
Why do you think that certain provisions of the USA PATRIOT Act have been continually renewed?
Issues for the 21st Century 81

Global Involvement
How does the United States participate in international organizations and treaties?
Issues regarding the sovereignty of the United States have been up for debate since the nation's beginnings. The nation's first President, George Washington, warned about maintaining America's independence and not giving up power to other nations. In the 21st century, the U.S. has continued to be widely involved in world affairs. In doing so, America's leaders have had many debates about the nation's sovereignty and the role it should take on the world stage.
Historical Perspective
The UN General Assembly meets in the UN headquarters before a vote on a resolution to condemn abuses by the Syrian government.
In George Washington's Farewell Address of 1796, he advised America's current and future leaders to not give into foreign influence. He warned that the United States should avoid permanent alliances and not let the affairs of other countries interfere with the nation's peace and prosperity. For about 100 years, U.S. leaders mostly followed Washington's advice and kept the nation largely isolated from world affairs outside of the Western Hemisphere.
U.S. foreign policy changed during the 20th century. Some leaders wanted to remain isolationist, but ultimately America was drawn into the First World War. After World War I ended, debates over America's sovereignty were ignited when President Woodrow Wilson called for the formation of the League of Nations. Wilson believed that having such an international organization would help secure lasting peace in the world. Opponents of the League complained that it would limit America's independence in international affairs. In the end, the United States did not join the League of Nations.
Following World War II, an international organization known as the United Nations (UN) was formed to replace the League of Nations. This time, the United States took an active role in its creation. The UN continues to operate as a kind of world government.
Today, the debate continues over whether international organiza-
tions and treaties should have authority over America's actions in global affairs. The U.S. continues to grapple with the UN and international treaties regarding military and other actions it takes that affect the whole world.
War In Iraq
After the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, the United States called for a renewal of the arms inspections in Iraq. In November 2002, the UN Security Council passed a resolution designed to force Iraq to give up all weapons of mass destruction (WMD). The Security Council is responsible for maintaining international peace and security. The United States is one of the council's five
898 Chapter 27
permanent members. Being a permanent member gives the United States more influence in the council. When the arms inspections resumed, Hussein refused to cooperate fully. Soon, the United States and Great Britain cut off diplomatic relations with Iraq.
In early February 2003, U.S. Secretary of State Colin Powell gave a presentation to the UN Security Council, maintaining that Iraq was hiding WMD. Soon thereafter, the United States and Great Britain pressed the UN to pass a resolution that authorized the use of military force against Iraq. As an alternative, France, Germany, and Russia presented a plan that called for intensifying the inspections.
The United States and Great Britain countered by claiming that a new UN resolution was not necessary since Iraq was in violation of the old agreement. They also claimed that Iraq's violation justified the use of military force to overturn Hussein's regime.
OPERATION IRAQI FREEDOM
In March 2003, the United States and Great Britain launched Operation Iraqi Freedom without the approval of the UN Security Council. The war began with massive air raids; sections of Baghdad were the primary targets. Coalition troops had taken control of most of Iraq by April 14. Hussein was captured on December 13, 2003. He was convicted of crimes against humanity and hanged in 2006. SEARCH FOR WMD
The case for going to war against Iraq was based on assertions by the United States, and British governments that Saddam Hussein had WMD. Once major combat ended on May 1, U.S forces began an extensive search for WMD. Movable biological laboratories were located, but by mid-2005, no WMD had been found. This led many in the United States and Great Britain to question the necessity for the war. Bush and British Prime Minister Tony Blair responded by claiming that they had based their decision on intelligence that was later proved faulty. Critics also questioned the legitimacy of the war given that the UN Security Council had not approved of taking military action. In May 2005, a top-secret memo known as the Downing Street memo became public. It suggested that the Bush administration had planned to invade Iraq as early as July 2002. IRAQ AFTER HUSSEIN
After the fall of Hussein's regime, the United States led in the establishment □f the Coalition Provisional Authority (CPA) to temporarily govern Iraq and oversee its reconstruction. The creation of the CPA had the approval of the United Nations Security Council. On June 28, 2004, the CPA was replaced by a temporary government made up of Iraqis. And □n January 30, 2005, Shiite Muslim parties won a majority of seats in Iraq's election for a transitional National Assembly that would draft Iraq's constitution. Shiites eventually agreed to allow members of the Sunni Muslim minority to participate in shaping the country's constitution. On October 15, 2005, Iraqi voters narrowly accepted
a new constitution. In December, Iraq held elections to choose a permanent parliament. The Shiites captured a majority of seats, but not enough to control the government.
Despite this progress, violence between Sunnis and Shiites continued to plague Iraq. Insurgents, or rebels, engaged in acts of violence that killed thousands Militants also attacked U.S. troops. In response, President Bush announced i plan in January 2007 to send 20,000 more U.S. troops to Iraq. In February 2009, President Obama unveiled a plan to remove all U.S. troops from Iraq. The last U.S. ;ombat forces left Iraq on December 18, 2011.
In Baghdad, Iraqis pull down a statue of Saddam Hussein after the
dictator’s regime is overthrown.
Issues for the 21st Century 8!
International Criminal Court
Another organization that seeks to help govern the international community is the International Criminal Court (ICC). It is the first treaty-based international criminal court. It is set up to try individuals who are accused of serious crimes that affect the international community. The court was adopted in July 1998, but did not become active until July 2002.
The ICC was ratified by 122 countries, but it did not receive approval from the United States. Some Americans think it is a good idea to have a neutral international court that deals with genocide and other crimes against humanity. Others do not want to see U.S. soldiers or other Americans tried in an international court for crimes. They say that America's founders never intended for Americans to be tried in courts outside the United States.
Treaties Regulating Global Energy
In the 21st century, members of the international community have made efforts to combat climate change. One of the main goals has been to reduce the amount of air pollution created from burning fossil fuels. Many believe that these pollutants are causing Earth's climate to change in a negative way. Many experts think that the carbon dioxide gas released when people use fossil fuels is building up and warming Earth's climate. They believe that by reducing greenhouse emissions, the negative effects of climate change can be offset or reduced. Differing opinions about climate change, including whether or not humans are causing it, have made it difficult to reach a consensus on what should be done about it.
THE KYOTO PROTOCOL
The Kyoto Protocol is an international treaty that seeks to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases. The agreement is connected to the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change. The Kyoto Protocol was adopted in Kyoto, Japan, in December 1997 and went into effect in February 2005. Under the Protocol, countries' emissions of greenhouse gases have to be recorded and revealed in annual reports. Students in Beijing, China, show their support for the Kyoto Protocol.
900 Chapter 27
Many who think that Earth's climate is changing and is affected by human activity believe that the Kyoto Protocol is a necessary step in the right direction. Critics of the Protocol do not like the idea of American industries being monitored by an international organization and governed by the terms of an international treaty. They believe that no Americans should be subjected to any jurisdiction outside of the U.S. Constitution. The United States is a signatory, or signer, of the treaty, but so far it has declined to ratify it.
THE COPENHAGEN ACCORD
The Copenhagen Accord is an international treaty that calls for a continuation of the Kyoto Protocol. It also encourages a strengthening of worldwide efforts to combat climate change. Like the Kyoto Protocol, the Accord stresses that dramatic cuts in greenhouse gas emissions is necessary to slowing the effects of climate change. The Accord set an initial deadline of January 31, 2010, for countries to submit their goals for reducing emissions. The goal is to significantly reduce emissions by 2020. In the United States, support for the Accord is divided along similar lines as the Kyoto Protocol. Many who believe that climate change is real support the Accord. They want to reign in industries' emissions of air pollutants and other factors that can magnify climate change. Those who think climate change is not occurring do not support the Accord. They believe American industries should not be regulated by an international organization.
Civil War In Syria
In 2013, a brutal civil war continued in the Middle Eastern nation of Syria. In August that year, there was a suspicious and deadly attack that killed more than 1,000 people. Members of the international community suspected that President Assad of Syria had used chemical weapons on his own people. President Barack Obama and members of his administration wanted to punish Assad's regime with military action. However, other member nations of the UN, such as China and Russia, thought there was not enough evidence to connect the chemical attacks to Assad.
Some UN member nations voted against taking forceful action against the Assad regime. Different sides argued whether or not the United States should intervene without UN approval and support. Americans continue to debate who decides when it is necessary to use military force. People have different views on whether the final authority should come from the UN Security Council or the President, Congress, or the American people. Ultimately, the United States decided to follow a diplomatic path with the UN approval and avoided military conflict with the Syrian government.
ANALYZING ISSUES
What are the pros and cons of the United States’ participation in international organizations and treaties?
EVALUATING DECISIONS
Do you think the United States had the authority to launch Operation Iraqi Freedom without the approval of the UN Security Council? Explain your answer. Think About:
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
Why do you think there is so much disagreement over American industries reducing greenhouse gases? Explain your answer.
2. SUMMARIZING
What are the main goals of the Kyoto Protocol and the Copenhagen Accord?
• the circumstances that led up to
the military operation • the intelligence that the United
States and Great Britain were aware of up to that point
FORMING OPINIONS
Some Americans believe that global organizations are attempting to
undermine U.S. sovereignty through
the use of treaties. Do you agree or
disagree? Support your answer.
Issues for the 21st Century 91
TEKS9A.9B, 10E, 11B,26C
Civil Rights in the
21st Century
How has the Civil Rights movement grown and changed in the 21st Century?
At the dedication of the Martin Luther King, Jr., Memorial in Washington, D.C. in October 2011, President Obama acknowledged that if Dr. King were alive today, he would recognize that the nation still faces many civil rights challenges. President Obama said that these challenges include neighborhoods with schools that are underfunded and lack of good health care for all. Much has changed since Dr. King’s time, but the Civil Rights movement continues in the 21st century. African Americans, Hispanic Americans, women, and other groups continue to work for equal rights. Although there are many issues that still need to be resolved, many victories have been achieved in the present-day Civil Rights movement.
Historical Perspective
The Civil Rights movement in the United States had its start during the colonial days with those colonists who opposed slavery. It continued in the 1800s with the abolition movement.
In December 1865, after the Civil War, the Thirteenth Amendment to the Constitution was ratified. It officially outlawed slavery in the United States and its territories. In 1868, the Fourteenth Amendment was ratified. This amendment recognized the citizenship of African Americans and granted the same civil rights to all people in the United States except for Native Americans. Two years later, the Fifteenth Amendment was passed to guarantee the right to vote to African American men. Women had not yet gained the right to vote.
African-American civil rights suffered setbacks after Reconstruction. In the late 1800s, legalized racism returned to the South. Some states passed new laws that defied the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments. These so-called black codes differed from state to state, but they often prevented African Americans from voting or traveling freely. They also kept African Americans from owning certain kinds of property or working at certain kinds of jobs. Supported by the Supreme Court's 1896 ruling in Plessy v. Ferguson, the segregation of African Americans and white people was the law of the land in much of the United States in the early 1900s.
In the late 1800s and early 1900s, a new group of champions joined the battle for civil rights. They included Booker T. Washington and W. E. B. Du Bois. Du Bois helped found the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP). This organization was established in 1909. In the decades ahead, the NAACP would be a powerful voice in the struggle to improve the legal rights of African Americans.
902 Chapter 27
Hispanic Civil Rights
Issues for the 21st Century
African-American Civil Rights
The Civil Rights movement continues to work for equal rights for African Americans. In August 2013, on the 50th anniversary of Dr. King's March on Washington, civil rights leaders named three areas that they believe still need correction. These areas are the gap between rich and poor, efforts to restrict voters' access to the polls, and discrimination in the criminal justice system.
Many leaders have also criticized the recent ruling from the Supreme Court that struck down a key part of the Voting Rights Act of 1965. Martin Luther King III, the son of Dr. King, has said that more work needs to be done to achieve his father's vision of a country free of racial prejudice.
Congressman John Lewis, who nearly died in a march for voting rights in Selma, Alabama, in 1963, also spoke at the March on Washington anniversary. He summed up the work that lies ahead for the Civil Rights movement. He said, "We have come a great distance
since that day, but many of the issues that gave rise to that march are still pressing needs in our society—violence, poverty, hunger, long-term unemployment, homelessness, voting rights, and the need to protect human dignity."
Today's civil rights workers hope to bring about as much progress as was made a half-century ago. They are taking up the cause of justice and equality with new tools. They use the Internet and social media to spread their message. They register student voters electronically and also file online petitions.
Pro-immigration supporters take part in a rally held by LULAC in Dallas,
Texas.
their appearance resembled those who perpetrated the attacks. This led to more Americans being suspicious of other immigrant groups as well. Many Americans began calling for better border security, including between the United States and Mexico. Even though many Hispanic Americans had been living in the United States for hundreds of years, they faced increased discrimination.
In 2004, some anti-immigrant activists began organizing along the U.S.-Mexico border. Groups who supported immigrant rights held rallies to counter those activists. In 2006, Latin American immigrants and their supporters began holding demonstrations across the country in support of immigrant rights. They also protested the growing hostility toward undocumented workers. In May 2006, some Hispanic immigrants took part in a Day without Immigrants, in which they boycotted work, school, and shopping areas to remind people of the importance of immigrants to the U.S. economy.
In the discussion of Hispanic civil rights, immigration reform remains one of the most important and most polarizing issues. The president and leaders from both parties in Congress continue to debate the issue, but it has been difficult to reach agreement between all the different sides involved. Meanwhile, advocacy groups such as the League of United Latin American Citizens (LULAC) continue to work for equal rights and equal opportunities for Hispanic Americans.
Women’s Rights
U.S.
Appeals Court Judge Rosemary Barkett (center) delivers the keynote address during a special session of Florida's high court honoring the state's first 150 female lawyers on June 15, 2000, in Tallahassee, Florida. In 1961, President John F. Kennedy named a commission to study the status of women in the workplace. Its report revealed that employers paid women less than men for equal work. The report also said that women were rarely promoted to top positions in their fields. About 40 years later, the U.S. Census Bureau found that more women than ever before worked outside the home—about 60 percent. Women made up 47 percent of the American work force. Yet in 2005 they held only 16.4 percent of the most senior jobs, according to a sampling of
the Fortune 500, the nation's 500 largest companies.
Women have made great strides in recent decades. In 2002, they filled half of all jobs in managerial and professional specialty areas. Women have also been entering new fields, including construction work and equipment repair. The increase in the number of women in managerial and other professional jobs has helped change and shape American culture.
Despite these positive signs, the key issues of unequal pay and unequal representation remain. Women are still making less than their male counterparts— averaging only 77 cents for every dollar earned by men.
In the nation's most top-level jobs, men continue to vastly outnumber women. As of 2007, women headed only ten Fortune 500 companies. Very few women who became corporate officers held line positions, jobs with profit-and-loss responsibility. In 2005, women held only 10.6 percent of line positions while men held 89.4 percent of them.
904 Chapter 27
Civil Rights for All
In the 21st century, advocacy groups have become concerned that the constitutional rights of some Americans are being violated. Gay rights groups are working to secure what they view as "marriage equality" for gay people. Groups who believe that some laws violate their right to bear arms are working to expand gun rights.
GAY RIGHTS
The gay rights movement in the United States has made great strides in recent years toward equal rights and opportunities. For instance, after years of protesting the U.S. military's policies regarding gay soldiers, the "Don't Ask, Don't Tell" policy that prevented openly gay individuals from joining the military was repealed in 2011. In addition, gay rights activists and many other American citizens believe that gay people should have the same right to marry the people they love that straight, or heterosexual, people have. Marriage Equality USA is one organization that is working to get same-sex marriage legalized in the United States. It does this through education, outreach, and media campaigns. Those supporting same-sex marriage have seen progress at the state level and in federal court. Supporters of the traditional idea of marriage, as the union of one man and one woman, have fought back. Groups like the National Organization for Marriage oppose what they call the "redefinition" of the institution.
GUN OWNERSHIP RIGHTS
In 1993, President Bill Clinton signed the Brady Act, which called for states to place a five-day waiting period on the sale of handguns. During that period, police check the potential buyer's background. If they find a criminal record, a gun permit is denied. However, four years later, in June 1997, the Brady Act was substantially weakened when the Supreme Court ruled that the federal government could not force state or local officials to run background checks on potential buyers of handguns. At the center of the gun-control issue lies a long-standing constitutional debate. The Second Amendment to the Constitution states this: "A well-regulated militia, being necessary to the security of a free state, the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed." The National Rifle Association (NRA), which is opposed to tougher gun-control laws, argues that gun control laws violate this right to bear arms. Founded in 1871, the NRA is an American non-profit organization that promotes firearm ownership. The group's involvement in politics centers on its belief that firearm ownership is a civil right protected by the Second Amendment.
Others contend that the Second Amendment was not intended to guarantee a right to personal weapons. Rather, its purpose is to protect the state's right to maintain military units. However, recent rulings from the Supreme Court have affirmed that it is an individual right.
1. SUMMARIZING
What new rights did the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments guarantee to African Americans?
3. EVALUATING
ANALYZING EFFECTS
How do you think increasing numbers of women in managerial and other professional roles help shape American culture? Explain your answer.
How is today’s Civil Rights movement different from how it was in the past? How is it similar?
Think About:
• rights that African Americans
ANALYZING CAUSES
Now that about a third of the states have legalized same-sex marriage, do you think more states will follow? Explain your answer.
fought for in the past • rights that African Americans
fight for today
5. CATEGORIZING
Identify and describe the organizations promoting civil rights for African Americans, Hispanic Americans, women, and other civil rights movements.
Issues for the 21st Century
TEKS13B, 22C, 26A, 26C
Immigration
How does immigration affect the United States?
For hundreds of years, immigrants have come to the United States from numerous places throughout the world. The many immigrants who became U.S. citizens are held together by a common bond. That bond is their shared belief in the self-evident truths stated in the Declaration of Independence, that all people are created equal and have the right to "Life, Liberty, and the pursuit of Happiness."
Immigrants who came to the United States looking for a better life have also helped shape the country. Latino ranchers developed many of the tools and skills of the American cowboy. Chinese laborers laid the tracks of the transcontinental railroad. African Americans, though not voluntary immigrants, labored to develop the agriculture of the South and the industry of the North. Farmers and workers of every origin built the nation we know today.
Today's immigrants from Latin America, Asia, and other parts of the world continue to shape American culture. They bring new ideas and new traditions. They also affect America's demographic patterns, which are the ways in which the nation's population changes.
Historical Perspective
America has always been a nation of immigrants. From 1900 into the 1940s, economic troubles and rapid population growth spurred more than 16 million Europeans to move to the United States. The same pressures have more recently hit Asia and Latin America, with the same effect on the United States. Between 1989 and 2009, more than 21 million new immigrants came to the United States. Many immigrants eventually choose to become naturalized citizens.
The pros and cons of immigration have been argued throughout American history. In the 1700s, Benjamin Franklin worried about the number of Germans immigrating to Pennsylvania. Sharp anti-immigration sentiment spurred the nativist movement that developed in the 1830s and the America First campaign of the 1920s.
Americans today are divided on the issue. Some agree with former New York City mayor Rudolph Giuliani that immigrants "challenge us with new ideas and new perspectives." They look at America's history of diversity and believe that immigrants bring new energy to the country. Others side with Dan Stein of the Federation for American Immigration Reform, who has said that "large-scale immigration is not serving the needs and interests of the country."
The Debate Over Immigration
Complicating the debate over immigration has been the issue of immigrantswho enter the country illegally. By 2009, the number of immigrants who have arrived
906 Chapter 27
in the United States illegally was estimated at close to 11 million. A 2004 report by the Center for Immigration Studies suggested that households headed by immigrants who are in the country illegally each used about $2,700 more in federal government services than they paid in taxes.
Congress had addressed such issues in the 1990s, passing laws that toughened measures to bar illegal entry and limit benefits to immigrants who arrived illegally. In February 2005, President George W. Bush proposed a new approach. Stating that "America's immigration system is . . . unsuited to the needs of our economy and the values of our country," he endorsed a guest worker program. This program would have allowed foreigners to work in the United States for a set period of time. However, as of 2010, a guest worker program had not been enacted into law. In 2013, the debate over immigration reform continued.
In the meantime, some states took action on the illegal entry of immigrants. For example, in 2010 Arizona passed a law that enhanced state and local police authority to enforce federal immigration laws.
ECONOMIC DEBATE
Those who favor immigration limits claim that immigrants take jobs from Americans. However, data suggest that immigration has not hurt the economy and may have helped fuel its growth. At the same time that millions of immigrant workers—including some undocumented workers—were joining the work force, the overall trend in unemployment was downward. However, in 2009, when unemployment rose above 9 percent, the number of illegal immigrants in the United States fell. Another argument focuses on wages. Economists agree that immigrants tend to work for lower wages than native-born workers. Harvard University economists estimated that one-third of the gap between low-paid and high-paid workers results from higher numbers of immigrants. But they also reported that other factors—foreign trade, declining union membership, and new technology—play a greater role in lowering wages.
Immigrants fill skilled, high-paying jobs as well. Current law limits the number of immigrants who may enter the United States within specific employment categories, or preferences. The 2009 limit was set at about 140,000. However, there were more applicants than places in 2009.
RESPONSIBILITIES OF CITIZENSHIP
Some people are concerned that certain immigrants never become citizens and so fail to completely participate in American life. Statistics show that legal immigrants are becoming citizens in ever-higher numbers. Even so, many immigrants eligible for citizenship have not applied to become citizens. Experts attribute this to a variety of factors, including the rising cost of filing for citizenship, a backlog of applications, and a presumed lack of interest among some immigrants. The oath of U.S. citizenship carries with it such responsibilities as voting, serving on juries, and, in some cases, military service. CULTURAL CONCERNS
The diversity of the U.S. population has raised concerns that America has no common culture. Some say that at 12.6 percent of the population, the foreign-born are too numerous in America. Historian David Kennedy points out that in 1910 the percentage was even higher—14.7 percent. Those who favor limits claim that new immigrants do not mix with other groups and instead form ethnic neighborhoods that divide society. Others believe that immigrants enrich American cultural life. Historically, many immigrants have joined together in tight-knit ethnic communities. This has helped them to keep many of their native customs alive, even as they have begun to blend into American society. Aspects of their vibrant heritages and religions have shaped the broader culture. The traditions of immigrants from Africa, Asia, Europe, and Latin America, as well as other newcomers representing a variety of racial and ethnic groups, have contributed to the nation's diverse culture and identity.
Issues for the 21st Century
MORAL ISSUES
The issue of asylum—providing a safe place for people fleeing oppression—has been the toughest of all. While immigration is allowed for
political asylum, those who flee famine or poverty are turned away. Are such
policies fair?
Some rules allow relatives of immigrants to enter the country. Representative Lamar Smith of Texas believes that these rules admit immigrants who "have no marketable skills and end up on welfare." Yet, social scientist Nathan Glazer says that concern about the number of immigrants conflicts with sympathy for those "trying to bring in wives, children, parents, brothers, and sisters."
Some observers believe that there are simply too many immigrants. Slow immigration for a time, they suggest. In polls taken in mid-2010, about a third of the population seemed to agree with this idea, expressing the opinion that the level of legal immigration should be decreased.
Immigration and Religion
Immigrants coming to the United States have always brought their cultures, languages, and traditions with them. They also bring their religious beliefs. Most settlers in the original English colonies were Protestant Christians. Later immigration increased the numbers of Catholics, Jews, and other groups. Recently, new immigrants have brought even greater diversity. As more immigrants come from Asia and Africa, various cultures and religions have been introduced to the United States.
Today about 80 percent of people in the United States identify themselves as Christians. Among organized religions, the next largest group is Judaism, with about 2 percent of the population. Religions such as Islam, Buddhism, and Hinduism are growing, although members of each faith still make up less than 1 percent of the total U.S. population.
The First Amendment of the U.S. Constitution guarantees the "free exercise" of religion, which means that anyone may practice his or her beliefs. By guaranteeing freedom of religion, the Constitution has enabled the United States to become increasingly diverse in terms of religion.
Unfortunately, some religious minorities have faced persecution in the United States. In the wake of terrorist actions against the United States committed by Muslim extremists, some Muslim American citizens and Muslim
s
5
Religious leaders from Muslim, Christian, and Jewish faiths gather to oppose an anti-Muslim incident in 2011.
I
908 Chapter 27
Tomorrow’s Population
immigrants have been the targets of discrimination, violence, and other civil rights abuses. In response, organizations such as the Council on American-Islamic Relations (CAIR) have been working to protect and expand the political rights of Muslim Americans, to ensure that they are able to enjoy full and equal participation in American society and government.
1 Members of the Latin American community in Los Angeles raise their hands to bless fruit baskets as a sign of immigrants’ daily work in California’s fields. The sign reads “This fruit is the product of immigrants’ labor.”
The U.S. census, which measures the population every 10 years, reveals several trends changing the face of America. For example, a comparison of 1980 and 2000 census data shows that the U.S. population has grown more diverse, a trend expected to continue. Ethnic minorities—such as African, Asian, and Hispanic Americans—currently make up about 30 percent of the U.S. population. Of the more than 30 million foreign-born residents in the United States, more than 50 percent were born in Latin America and about 25 percent were born in Asia. By 2050 these groups are expected to form about half of America's total population. The number of Asian Americans is expected to more than triple. Hispanic Americans are expected to become nearly one-fourth of the U.S. population. The nation's growing minority groups will likely play a leading role in the future.
In part because much recent immigration has come from Latin America, Hispanic Americans are the largest and fastest growing minority group in the United States. It is estimated that by 2020, Hispanics will total an estimated 60.4 million people and account for half of the growth of the U.S. labor force. With their rising numbers have come newfound political and economic powers. Many people point to the Hispanic vote as a key factor in recent state and national elections.
About 50 percent of Hispanics in the United States live in either Texas or California. After California, Texas has the largest Hispanic population, mostly of Mexican origin. Unlike with earlier European immigrants, Mexican immigration has not come in a single wave but rather a continuous flow for more than 100 years.
ANALYZING ISSUES
What are some of the benefits of continued immigration to the United States? What are some of the drawbacks?
2.	SUMMARIZING
Explain actions taken to expand
political rights for religious
minorities in American society.
ANALYZING EFFECTS
How have immigrants who have entered the United States illegally affected the debate over immigration? Think About:
•	the number of immigrants who have arrived illegally
•	their use of federal government resources
4.	EVALUATING
In what ways do you think U.S. citizens today embrace the self-evident truths stated in the Declaration of Independence? Explain your answer.
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
How have Hispanic Americans helped change the demographic patterns of the United States? Explain your answer.
Issues for the 21st Century
|J TEKS11B,UF
Social Issues and Government Responses
Who has the responsibility of helping the poor, the uninsured, and the retired in the United States?
Politicians come into office with their own goals. President Lyndon Johnson, a former Texas high school teacher and long-time member of Congress, became president with the bold goal of creating a Great Society in which problems such as poverty and racism would be eliminated. Many of these programs passed and still exist today, such as Medicare and Medicaid. Medicare provides health insurance for senior citizens, while Medicaid provides medical care for the poor.
Many conservatives opposed Johnson's Great Society programs. They argued that his costly programs would increase both the size of government and the country's debt. They feared a larger central government would rob people of their democratic freedoms. Since the founding of our country, political leaders have disagreed about the role of government in business and our private lives and no one has yet found a solution to eradicate these issues.
Historical Perspective
The United States was established on such ideals as human equality, limited government, and democratic representation. Today, as when our nation was founded, the American government is separated into three branches—the executive branch, the legislative branch, and the judicial branch. For over two hundred years, these three branches have worked under a system of checks and balances so that no one branch ever becomes too powerful. When the government gets involved in social issues, it needs to work within this system to pass laws and garner support.
With each new administration, leaders across the political spectrum propose and enact different approaches to solving social issues such as poverty, health care, and financial support for retirees. Some leaders advocate for government to play an expanded role in people's lives, creating government programs to provide benefits. Others believe that government should take a more limited approach, allowing state and local programs to solve problems. They are wary of the cost of these government programs and the risk of taking away individual control.
Citizens influence these views by voting for candidates whose ideals most closely match their own. People also try to influence government through political and social advocacy groups. These groups do not hold office, but they try to influence lawmakers by swaying public opinion and arguing for certain legislation. Each group has its own motive for action and advocates for its cause. For example, the Republican National Hispanic Organization advocates within the Republican Party for more electoral participation by Hispanic minorities for Hispanic interests and issues. Americans for Democratic Action advocates for progressive approaches to economic and social justice, environmental policy, and civil rights.
910 Chapter 27

Health Care
One major challenge for the future is health
care. Advances in medical science are help-
ing Americans live longer. The nation's
average life expectancy today is 78 years.
By 2025 it is expected to be about 80.
The U.S. population is aging, and people typ-
ically require more health care as they age.
Thus, as older Americans make up a large
part of the population, health care issues will
affect more people.
At the same time, the costs of health care and health insurance are rising. The availability of health care and the role of government in health care have been major concerns in the United States in the 21st century. Political leaders across the spectrum have debated for over fifty years how medical coverage for the uninsured should be funded.
HEALTH CARE AND POLITICS
National health insurance for Americans was first proposed by President Truman in 1949, but Congress failed to approve it. It took President Lyndon B. Johnson to enact Medicare in 1965. The program covered most of the cost of medical care for people age 65 and above. By the 1990s, Medicare required an increasing share of federal spending. In hopes of controlling costs and providing universal coverage, President Clinton proposed a complex plan. However, lobbying by doctors and private insurers and the public's mistrust of big government caused Congress to defeat Clinton's plan in 1994.
Meanwhile, many Americans were afraid they would be denied health insurance because of preexisting conditions—medical conditions that are already present when a person applies for coverage. The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, passed in 1996, partly addressed that concern. It limited the situations under which insurers could exclude from coverage those with preexisting conditions.
HEALTH CARE AND THE ELECTION
Health care continued to be a hot topic during the 2000 presidential campaign and beyond. One of the issues was the rising cost of prescription drugs. About 40 percent of people on Medicare were without prescription-drug coverage. In 2003, President George W. Bush signed the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act (MMA). This law provided access to drug coverage for elderly and disabled people on Medicare, beginning in 2006. Another worrying issue for policymakers in the early 2000s was the number of people without health insurance. This problem was extensive—some 17.4 percent of nonelderly Americans were uninsured in 2008. About 8 million of the uninsured were children.
In 2008, Barack Obama made health care reform one of his major campaign issues as he ran for president. The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (PPACA), was signed into law in 2010 by President Obama. It extended the Children's Health Insurance Program (CHIP), a program that provides health coverage to children of low-income families. It also tackled the issue of uninsured adults. It extended private insurance coverage through individual mandates— that is, requiring individuals to get some level of health coverage. Beginning on October 1, 2013, uninsured individuals could purchase health insurance plans that had been set up in accordance with the Affordable Care Act. Individuals continue to discuss whether the government should be able to mandate that people obtain health insurance.
▲
The Affordable Care Act is trying to address issues surrounding access to medical care for more Americans.
Issues for the 21st Century
CHECKS AND BALANCES
The PPACA, also known as Obamacare, shows the system of checks and balances in action in tackling social issues. President Barack Obama, from the executive branch, suggested the law to Congress. Members of the legislative branch, in Congress, passed the law in 2010. When some critics opposed the law, they brought a case to the Supreme Court. The Court, part of the judicial branch, ruled that the law was constitutional and should be enacted. Poverty
Poverty has long been a problem in America. A variety of factors, including illness, discrimination, natural disaster, and economic downturns, have caused people to struggle to support themselves. In the 1960s, President Lyndon B. Johnson declared "unconditional war on poverty." His administration expanded education, training, and financial aid for the poor. The proportion of people living below the poverty level—the minimum income necessary to provide basic living standards— fell from 20 percent in 1962 to only 11 percent in 1973. However, economic hard times reappeared in the early 1980s and the poverty rate began to rise. Although the poverty level has both risen and fallen since then, in recent years it has continued to grow.
FEDERAL WELFARE REFORM
Throughout the 20th century and into the 21st, political leaders have disagreed about the best way for the government to help alleviate poverty. Some leaders feel that the government should provide relief programs, despite the cost, as it is the obligation of the government to help the citizens. Other leaders feel that there is little the government can do to solve the problem, so funds should go toward growing the economy instead. Their criticism led to cries for welfare reform. In 1996, the Republican Congress and President Clinton passed the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act—a law that cut more than $55 billion in welfare spending over six years and limited recipients' eligibility to receive cash assistance to a five-year maximum. In addition, the bill cut benefits to recipients who had not found a job within two years. Supporters cheered the reforms, claiming that they transformed a system from one that fosters dependence to one that encourages self-reliance. Opponents of the law accused the federal government of turning its back on the poor—especially children.
In February 2006, Congress reauthorized the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) program created by the 1996 bill. Between August 1996—when the bill creating TANF passed—and March 2006, the number of people on welfare declined to its lowest percentage since 1969.
NEW LEGISLATION A
new economic crisis caused President Obama to sign into law the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act in 2009. Funds from the Act could be used to fight hunger through the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), alleviate homelessness through Neighborhood Stabilization Funds, provide job training through the Workforce Investment System, and increase income support for the unemployed. Opponents of these programs want to create tougher qualification guidelines. Despite the approaches and programs, in 2012, around 16% of the United States population lived in poverty—almost 50 million people. Social Security
Another area that has been debated by political leaders is how to reform Social Security so that it will have enough money to pay retirees. Providing monthly pensions to retired people or their survivors is the best-known Social Security program.
912 Chapter 27
PREDICTING EFFECTS
What issues do you think impact the solvency of long-term entitlement programs such as Social Security and Medicare? Discuss these issues in a small group.
The Social Security Act, or FICA, began as a centerpiece of the Second New Deal in 1935 and was funded by a tax on workers and employers. It created a pension fund for retired people over age 65 and offered government aid to poor people for the first time. Since its beginning in the 1930s, Social Security has been expanded to cover children, people with disabilities, and others. It also manages numerous welfare programs.
Funding Social Security poses several problems. One problem relates to population—when the baby boomers (those born between 1946 and 1964)
retire, their huge numbers—about 70 million by the year 2020—may overburden the entitlement programs. A second problem relates to longevity—Americans now live longer, so an individual's share of benefits from the program is greater than in the past. Third, the number of workers paying into Social Security per beneficiary will drop when the boomers start retiring.
Currently, Social Security collects more in taxes than it pays in benefits. The extra goes into a trust fund that is invested. Around the year 2016 the program will begin paying out more to beneficiaries than it takes in from the payroll tax. The program will begin to rely on the Social Security Trust Fund to pay retirees. If that trend continues, after 2037, Social Security will be able to cover only about 75 percent of scheduled benefits.
AN ISSUE OF REFORM
Most experts recommend reforming the system. One suggestion is to replace Social Security, or part of it, with private retirement accounts. Other options include raising social security taxes, cutting benefits to recipients, raising the retirement age, and allowing individual investing. Political advocacy groups such as the American Association of Retired People (AARP) and the National Center for Policy Analysis (NCPA) are also actively involved in the policy reform efforts with Social Security. A SOCIAL AND POLITICAL ISSUE
Not surprising, the issue of Social Security has been a political issue in recent elections. President George W. Bush outlined an approach to privatization in 2000 and 2004 that did not garner enough support to pass. In 2008, Republican John McCain favored a partial privatization plan and Democrat Barack Obama called for raising the cap on the amount of income subject to the FICA tax. The unresolved issue continued to be debated in 2012. 1.	EVALUATING
What political leaders have made changes to health care? Do you agree or disagree with their actions?
MAKING INFERENCES
Why do you think the AARP is
involved in issues around Social
Security reform?
ANALYZING
What role do you think the govern-
ment should have in solving social
issues such as health care and
poverty?
Issues for the 21st Century
TEKS11B, 14A, 14B
Conservation and
the Environment
Can the nation balance conservation with economic progress?
In 1990, Oregon logger Bill Haire hung a new ornament on the mirror of his truck: a tiny owl with an arrow through its head. The trinket represented Haire's feelings about the federal government's decision to declare millions of acres of forest off limits to the logging industry in order to protect the endangered spotted owl.
"If it comes down to my family or that bird," said Haire, "that bird's going to suffer." The battle between loggers and environmentalists over the fate of the spotted owl is just one example of the nation's ongoing struggle to balance conservation with industrial progress.
Historical Perspective
Conservation, the management and protection of the earth's resources, began as a national movement in the United States during the early 1900s. In the wake of the country's industrial revolution, the federal government enacted numerous measures to protect the nation's natural surroundings.
In the early 1900s, President Theodore Roosevelt made a powerful impact on protecting natural resources. Roosevelt expressed a particular interest in preserving America's forestlands. "Like other men who had thought about the national future at all," he once remarked, "I had been growing more and more concerned over the destruction of the forests.” The first national park, Yellowstone, had been signed into law in 1872 by President Ulysses S. Grant. Thirty years later, Roosevelt established the first wildlife refuge in Florida and added more than 150 million acres to the nation's forest preserves. He used his executive power to set aside national forests as public lands, establish parks, monuments and historic landmarks, and urge Congress to create the Forest Service to manage this land in 1905. In 1916, President Woodrow Wilson signed an Act passed by Congress that created the National Park Service to oversee the parks. Today, there are over 400 national parks throughout the United States and its territories.
The 1960s and 1970s witnessed a resurgence of the conservation movement. In 1962, marine biologist Rachel Carson published her book Silent Spring, which warned of the destructive effects of pesticides. The book awakened Americans to the damage they were inflicting on the environment. In the two decades that followed, Congress created the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) and enacted such measures as the Clean Air Act, the Clean Water Act, and the Endangered Species Act—all in an effort to restore the health of the country's natural resources. And, since 1970, the country nearly tripled the size of its national park space.
By the early 2000s, Americans had done much to improve the environment. Between 1970 and 2008, for example, the nation's yearly production of carbon monoxide emissions dropped from 204 million to about 72 million tons.
914 Chapter 27
Challenges of Population Growth and Distribution
Despite the strides Americans have made in protecting their natural resources over the past half century, environmental problems still exist, and the nation still struggles to strike a balance between conservation and economic growth.
Business is deeply tied to resource development. As the world's population grows, so do the demands for housing materials, food, and other resources. Increased population growth and distribution in urban areas causes strain on the environment as people and businesses compete for and deplete resources. As businesses and corporations extract resources to meet these demands, the ecosystems are altered through these losses. Our increased demand for natural resources continues to drive the debate between environmentalists and industrialists around how to ensure supply of resources while also conserving the environment.
THE GREENHOUSE EFFECT
Such a struggle is clearly visible in the greenhouse effect. The greenhouse effect is the rise in temperature that Earth experiences because certain gases in the atmosphere trap energy from the sun. Without these gases, heat would escape back into space and Earth's average temperature would be about 60°F colder. Greenhouse gases, such as carbon dioxide, methane, and nitrous oxide, occur naturally in the air. But the burning of fossil fuels and other human activities add to the levels of these gases, amplifying the greenhouse effect and causing an increase in global warming. Global warming is the rise in the earth's surface temperature over time. Earth's temperature has steadily increased over the last 100 years due in part to increased pollution caused by humans' activities. Global warming could prompt a range of environmental calamities, from severe flooding in some parts of the world to drought in others.
In 2005, a treaty called the Kyoto Protocol took effect. It aims to reduce greenhouse gases overall by requiring developed countries to lower their emissions. The United States—the world's largest producer of greenhouse gases—signed the treaty but did not ratify it. President George W. Bush expressed doubt about global warming for several years. He also claimed that the protocol was unfair because developing countries such as China were exempt. As of 2013, the Obama administration had not pushed for ratification.
▲
Hikers enjoy a wilderness trail.
Issues for the 21st Century 91
I
Energy Sources	__________________
One issue of great concern to Americans today is the nation's growing appetite for energy. The United States is by far the world's largest consumer of energy. The United States consumes 19 percent of the world's energy, nearly all of it in the form of non-renewable fossil fuels such as oil, coal, and natural gas. In fact, the gap between how much energy the United States uses and how much it produces is widening. To fill this gap, the United States imports about a third of its energy. Much of the fuel America uses comes from places such as the oil-rich Middle East. The reliance on foreign sources has left the United States vulnerable to price increases and fuel shortages.
In 2005, President Bush outlined a plan to lessen U.S. dependence on oil imports. He proposed using more nuclear power, giving tax credits to buyers of energy-efficient cars and appliances, building new refineries, and drilling for more oil at home. Five years later, President Obama presented a similar plan. However, he also pushed for heavier use of renewable energy sources and for taxes on businesses that produce high levels of carbon pollution.
Fluctuating gasoline prices in 2007 and 2008 and a massive oil spill in the Gulf of Mexico in 2010 caused new energy worries. Balancing energy needs with environmental concerns is an issue that Americans will grapple with for years.
Managing the Environment
Since the early 1900s, the federal government has had an active, although often debated, role in protecting natural resources. Since the creation of the National Park System, over 84 million acres of land have been protected from mining for minerals, raising trees for lumber, and diverting water for waterpower. Yet corporate and business interests argue that resources are needed to support the needs of the growing population.
Conservation efforts look to conserve, or protect, ecosystems and the diversity of life that they support. Over the past fifty years, these conservation efforts have grown to include not only land resources but also the protection of air and water. As the population grows and businesses expand, particularly in urban areas, our impact on the environment has grown and pollution levels have grown. The federal government has responded by enacting legislation and creating federal agencies connected to conservation and resource management.
THE ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY
In 1970, President Richard Nixon created the Environmental Protection Agency, or EPA, to address environmental issues surrounding pollution. The agency was charged with strengthening and enforcing laws that govern water and air quality and monitoring the creation and emissions of toxic substances. THE ENDANGERED SPECIES ACT
In addition to protecting the air and water, Congress has passed laws to protect plants and animals. As humans continue to utilize resources and impact the environment, their actions affect ecosystems. In 1966, Congress passed the Endangered Species Preservation Act. This aimed to list species as endangered and protect their habitats to avoid extinction. In 1973, Congress passed the Endangered Species Act, which expanded protections for threatened and endangered wildlife. Congress has continued to amend this Act over the past twenty years as the specifics for conservation have grown and changed. CONTINUED EFFORTS
In addition to federal efforts, a number of states have made independent efforts to help. California, for instance, has some of the
nation's strictest air-pollution control laws, and these have helped to provide the
916 Chapter 27
Golden State with much cleaner air. Other states are playing their part as well in the nation's ongoing conservation effort.
However, there is still much to be done, especially about water pollution. One indicator is data collected by the Environmental Protection Agency for the first decade of the 2000s, which showed that beach closings—mostly due to unsafe levels of water pollution—were at historically high levels.
Social Action Groups and Private Citizens
Not all action has been through government.
Advocacy groups, such as the Marine Conservation Institute and Oceana, advocate for ocean and marine life conservation and protection. Private groups, such as the Nature Conservancy and local land trusts, have raised money to purchase forest and watershed lands and keep them pristine. In Texas several entrepreneurs created the Fossil Rim Wildlife Center, a 1,700-acre wildlife sanctuary for more than 50 animal species.
Private citizens also help. Private citizens can conserve resources such as water, land, plants,
and animals and protect them for future generations. People can choose energy-efficient appliances to help reduce energy and water use. Water management is a critical issue in some states where the demand exceeds the supply. In such cases, water ecosystems must be protected and managed carefully.
Another way to become involved is by contributing money and time to conservation efforts. Some individuals join advocacy groups or non-profits that work for land and water conservation or support political candidates who support their beliefs.
In Texas, 97 percent of the land is privately owned. The governor's office issued a report outlining specific programs designed to help landowners with conservation efforts on their land. One example is the Texas Parks and Wildlife Department's Private Lands and Habitat Program, which provides support to individual landowners in helping them conserve wildlife habitats found on their property.
Many states have wildlife departments, such as the Texas Parks and Wildlife Department, to address issues such as land use, wildlife, education, and conservation.
CRITICAL THINKING
PREDICTING EFFECTS
Do you think the United States eventually will engage in greater domestic exploration of its natural resources to meet its growing energy needs? Why or why not?
FORMING GENERALIZATIONS
What role do you think the government and private citizens should have in managing the environment?
ANALYZING EFFECTS
What are two effects of population growth and distribution on the physical environment?
Think About:
•	energy use
•	manufacturing
•	supply and demand of resources
4.	HYPOTHESIZING
Is it possible for political leaders to address issues of conservation and balance economic progress simultaneously? Support your answer with details from the text.
Issues for the 21st Century
TEKS25C, 25D
Globalization and
Cultural Diffusion
How does American pop culture spread to other countries around the world?
In 1851, Louise Amelia Knapp Smith Clappe wrote letters to her sister in Massachusetts to describe her life in the gold mining camps near San Francisco. Each letter took over three months to deliver. Today, Olivia can sit down at a computer in San Antonio and update her blog about Hollywood movies. Once she publishes her article online, Akili in Kenya and Hisako in Japan can read her thoughts and share their own ideas about popular culture instantaneously. Technological advances and new inventions have changed the way people communicate ideas.
Historical Perspective
Smartphones allow people to have wireless Internet access from almost any location.
In the 1940s, when computers first came into use, they took up huge rooms and required fans or elaborate air-conditioning systems to cool the parts that provided them with power. In the years since, the parts that power computers have become miniaturized and have become much more powerful. Today, not only can personal computers perform operations more quickly than the first giant computer did, but they are also affordable for many people. The development of inexpensive personal computers has made it possible for ordinary families to use the latest technology.
The numbers alone demonstrate the influence of computer technology on modern life. In 1984, only 8.2 percent of households in the United States had a personal computer. By 2003, more than 60 percent owned one. By 2011, that number had grown to nearly 76 percent and nearly 72 percent were logging onto the Internet both at home and at work. What's more, nearly every business in the nation, from hospitals to accounting firms and airports, has implemented computer systems to handle many daily operations.
Technology and Daily Life
The Internet has linked computer users around the world. Developed in the late 1960s by the U.S. Department of Defense, the Internet soon spread to universities. In the 1990s, it boomed in popularity among the general public. Now millions of Americans use the Internet daily for activities that range from working to shopping for groceries to getting the news.
Cellular phones have also transformed communication by allowing people to carry their phones anywhere. In 1985, about 340,000 Americans were cell phone subscribers. In 2012, the Pew Research Center noted that 88% of adults in the United States owned a cell phone. The invention of tablets and smartphones has expanded access to music, maps, email, news, businesses, and social networks from any location.
918 Chapter 27
A
Global Economy Computer technology has not only improved how Americans work, but has also dramatically altered how they live. Millions of citizens now buy everything from flowers to books to stock online. Technology has helped to build a more global economy—one in which countries around the world are linked through business. Via the Internet, companies on different continents do business as though they are in the same city. Trade and investments among nations have expanded, and the economies of various countries are more closely linked. This increased trade has led to globalization, connecting the cultures and economies of the world more quickly than ever before.
▲
Globalization connects cultures around the world.
GLOBALIZATION AND TRADE
Expanded and improved transportation, communication, and technology systems allow for better distribution of goods, services, and ideas around the world. Economic globalization has opened up the traditional marketplaces for acquiring raw materials and creating and distributing goods and services. Businesses choose more diverse geographic locations to source the different aspects of production and distribution. Stronger transportation systems and instantaneous communication systems allow access for these goods more quickly and economically, taking away barriers that existed in the past. Computers have changed not just industries but also the lives of individual workers. Technology has given people access to far more information than ever before, which has improved productivity in many industries. Workers share information through computer networks. Laptops and cell phones have enabled increasing numbers of people to work at home or in multiple locations. Communication and technology advances allow many large companies to outsource various tasks such as support services. For example, a company in Florida may outsource technology support for customers to telephone operators in India.
BENEFITS AND CHALLENGES
Globalization has allowed people around the world to have access to materials, goods, and services they may not have had in the past. But with each change comes challenges as well as benefits. In the United States, people have different opinions about economic globalization, as businesses build factories in different countries and outsource work to employees abroad. People worry about job loss as domestic companies move their factories and hire workers abroad to take advantage of lower wages and costs. Others feel globalization creates jobs as new international markets increase exports and new workers are needed to create products. Regardless, globalization affects the economy of countries around the world as imports and exports are affected through these transactions. Cultural Diffusion
Just as globalization has impacted the economies of the world as countries interact
through business, it has also affected their cultures. In our global market, citizens
interact more frequently with one another. In doing so, they share their culture
and influence each other in their beliefs, behaviors, and actions. This has led to
social globalization and cultural diffusion.
Issues for the 21st Century

I
Cultural diffusion describes the way cultural practices diffuse, or spread, from
one community to another and how cultures borrow traits such as beliefs, ideas,
and material objects from one another. With increased contact comes increased
diffusion. In today's world of instantaneous communication, cultural diffusion is
constant.
Cultural diffusion is not a new concept. People of various cultures have interacted with each other for centuries as people have journeyed, done business, and moved around the world. The United States has always drawn business people, travelers, and immigrants from other lands. In doing so, people have brought and shared their foods, languages, traditions, and values.
Today, you can find Ethiopian, Chinese, Brazilian, and French restaurants in the United States. Likewise, American fast-food restaurants can be found in places such as Australia, India, and Argentina. For example, McDonald's has restaurants in more than 100 countries, and Starbucks has opened coffee shops in 37 countries.
Tools such as videos, digital photography, cell phones, and the Internet allow for people around the world to share and expand upon popular culture.
POPULAR CULTURE
Popular culture is a collection of ideas, attitudes, and images that are part of a mainstream culture heavily influenced by and spread through the media. Pop culture can include movies, music, fashion, and values that are popular in a particular culture. Technology has made the spread of pop culture more dramatic. In the 1920s, new media such as radio and movies were able to reach a growing share of the nation's population. The radio helped break down barriers that had once separated country folk from city folk. Increasingly, people all across the country were sharing the same information and enjoying the same pastimes, creating a shared culture. Printed materials and television also helped spread pop culture.
Today, the Internet is a driving force spreading popular culture around the world. People around the world can hear the same news and listen to the same music. They can hear the same advertisements and buy the same products. Not only can individuals receive the information, but they can help create and share it as well.
The Internet and media sources such as radio, movies, and social media sites have spread American pop culture quickly. Young people around the world can be found listening to American music, wearing American fashions, and watching American movies. Movies can be seen, made, and distributed around the world, providing viewers the opportunity to experience different cultures and to have a shared global experience.

*
▼
THE SPREAD OF HIP-HOP
To look at how cultural diffusion can permeate the global market, examine the spread of hip-hop around the world. Originating in New York City in the 1970s, hip-hop usually includes rap music, deejaying, graffiti painting, and hip-hop dancing. Hip-hop quickly took hold of popular American culture in New York City and spread through the country. Globalization allowed the hip-hop culture to spread even farther as youth around the world identified with the themes and styles of hip-hop. American movies such as Wild Style introduced people as far as Japan to the new style of dance and music in the 1980s. In the 1990s, global media companies saw an opportunity and began marketing hip-hop-related items to other countries. These included music, movies, clothing, and dance. Soon the hip-hop culture had become popular on six continents.
920 Chapter 27
THE GLOBAL SPREAD OF HIP-HOP
, j-' v
«
O
Hip-hop originated in New York in the 1970s. Q
Hip-hop developed from dub, a musical form brought to New York by Jamaican immigrants in the 1960s and 1970s. © Other U.S. Cities: Late 1970s, Early 1980s.
© Western Europe: Early to Mid-1980s; Africa: Early to Mid-1980s; Eastern Europe: Late 1980s, Early 1990s.
© South America and Caribbean: Mid-1980s.
© Southeast Asia and Australia: Early to Mid-1980s; South Asia: 1990s; China: 2000s.
As hip-hop spread, youth both borrowed elements of American hip-hop dance, music, and art, and influenced others as they incorporated their own cultural elements into their style and shared it with others. For example, in Japan, hip-hop fashion incorporate the Japanese language and symbols representing samurai. Lyrics often refer to Japanese food and other cultural references.
Today, hip-hop continues to be popular and the Internet draws the hip-hop community even more closely together. A video by South Korean rapper PSY spread like wildfire over the Internet after being promoted on social media. Although sung in Korean, the song and video found their way onto the top music charts for American audiences and influenced American pop culture.
New technologies continue to spread, promote, and alter popular culture around the world as ideas, values, fashion, media, and practices are shared. A website focusing on hip-hop allows people from around the world to come together to share their thoughts about current trends or to sell hip-hop-related goods and services. Video-sharing websites, blogs, and social media allow people to post videos, photos, music, and commentary instantaneously and remove any international barriers.
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING CAUSES
How do new technologies, movies, and the Internet help to create a common culture throughout the world?
2.	SUMMARIZING
What are the benefits and challenges of globalization?
3.	SYNTHESIZING
In what ways do you think the entertainment industry contributes to the global diffusion of American culture?
Think About:
•	Technology
•	Culture
•	Various media sources
ANALYZING EFFECTS
Identify the impact of popular American culture on the rest of the world over time.
MAKING INFERENCES
How would you account for the quick spread of hip-hop around the world? Support your answer.
Issues for the 21st Century
CHAPTER
ASSESSMENT
War on Terrorism
The United States created the Department of Homeland Security and passed new laws to fight terrorism.
Global Involvement
The United States has been involved in international organizations and treaties to address various global issues.
Civil Rights in the 21st Century
African Americans, Hispanic Americans, women, and other groups continue to work for their civil rights in the 21st century.
Immigration
Immigrants who have entered the United States legally and illegally have changed the country's demographic patterns.
MAIN IDEAS
Use your notes and the information In the chapter to answer the following questions.
The War on Terrorism (pages 894-897)
1.	What constitutional issues are raised by policy changes by the federal government in relation to terrorism?
Global Involvement (pages 898-901)
2.	In what ways does the United States participate in international organizations and treaties?
Civil Rights in the 21st Century (pages 902-905)
3.	Trace the development of the civil rights movement in the 19th century, including the ratification of the Thirteenth, Fourteenth, and Fifteenth Amendments.
4.	Describe the efforts of the National Rifle Association.
Immigration (pages 906-909)
5.	How have people of different ethnicities changed the demographics of the United States?
6.	In what ways have people of various racial, ethnic, and religious groups shaped American culture?
Social Issues and Government Responses
(pages 910-913)
7.	What are two political issues related to social issues in the United States?
8.	What are some controversies around how medical coverage for the insured is funded and what does this reflect about differences in political parties’ ideologies?
Conservation and the Environment (pages 914-917)
9.	What are the roles of government entities such as the National Park System, the EPA, and the Endangered Species Act in managing the environment?
Social Issues ano Government Responses
Political leaders disagree about the role that government should play in social issues such as poverty and health care.
Globalization and Cultural Diffusion (pages 918-921) 10. How does American pop culture spread to other countries?
CRITICAL THINKING
EVALUATING
How would the economy be both helped and hurt if Social Security benefits were cut? Conservation and the Environment
A growing population has caused challenges related to resource conservation, energy management, and greenhouse gases.
Globalization and Cultural Diffusion
American pop culture has spread around the world through cultural diffusion, and technological advances have led to social globalization.
PREDICTING EFFECTS
What impact do you think continued population growth in the United States will have on the physical environment? DEVELOPING HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
Create a continuum similar to the one below, labeled with more liberal at the left end and more conservative at the right end. Identify significant social and political leaders and advocacy organizations from throughout the chapter and mark where you think they would fall on the continuum. Write a paragraph to explain your conclusions. ◄ more liberal
more conservative
►
922 Chapter 27

TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
Use the quotation and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer questions 1 and 2.
6 In the end, the American dream is not a sprint, or even a marathon, but a relay. Our families don’t always cross the finish line in the span of one generation. But each generation passes on to the next the fruits of their labor. My grandmother never owned a house. She cleaned other people’s houses so she could afford to rent her own. But she saw her daughter become the first In her family to graduate from college. And my mother fought hard for civil rights so that Instead of a mop, I could hold this microphone.99
—San Antonio Mayor Julian Castro, keynote address to the Democratic National Convention,
September 4, 2012
1.	Based on the quotation, it is reasonable to conclude that many people from various ethnic groups —
A take part in marathons.
B work hard to make their children’s lives better.
C grow fruits and vegetables.
D always send their children to college.
2.	Based on the quotation, it is reasonable to infer that Mayor Castro’s mother fought for —
F integrated schools.
G the right to peacefully assemble.
H equal opportunities.
J the right to vote.
Use the chart as well as your knowledge of United States history to answer question 3.
U.S.
Life Expectancy, 1970-2010 Year	Expectation of Life Span at Birth
1970	70.8 years
1980	73.7 years
1990	75.4 years
2000	76.8 years
2010	78.7 years
Sources: U.S. Census Bureau and Centers for Disease Control and Prevention	
3.	Which of the following is true about the table?
A
There is no need to worry about Social Security. B
In 1990, life expectancy was around 75 years. C
After 2010, life expectancy started to drop. D
Life expectancy has decreased in the United States. INTERACT WITH HISTORY
"WriteSmart Think about the issues you recorded as you read the chapter. Select one of the issues discussed in the chapter and discuss it with a partner. Each partner should write three questions about the chosen issue. Consider what an informed voter would need to know. Then each partner should ask the other his or her questions. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to record your questions and your partner’s answers.
K*1	" ........
\CEMTURY
You have been asked to promote a civil rights cause that is important to your or your community. Think about the many civil rights challenges that people still face in the twenty-first century. Working with a partner, design and create a poster that supports the civil rights cause that you have chosen.
COLLABORATIVE LEARNI
5’.	/	"’J'WriteSmart
Imagine you are a member of Congress in October 2001. Consider whether you would support or oppose the USA PATRIOT Act legislation. Write a persuasive essay to bring others around to your point of view. Support your position with examples and address the concerns of those who take the opposite position. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your essay.
Issues For the 21st Century
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Using Databases to Pose and Answer Geographic Questions
DEFINING THE SKILL
Historians pose geographic questions to learn more about where and how people live in the world. They ask questions to learn more about geographic patterns and distributions. A geographic distribution shows where people, plants, and animals can be found in a certain area on Earth. Geographic patterns refer to the pattern of a geographic idea or event you are discussing. They can refer to repetitive distribution of such events as births, deaths, and life expectancies over time. One way to find information about geographic patterns and distributions is by using a database. A database is a collection of data, or information, that is organized so that you can find and retrieve information on a specific topic quickly and easily. The database will provide a list of all information related to your topic.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: POSE AND ANSWER QUESTIONS USING A DATABASE
The following is a chart containing data from the American FactFinder database on the U.S. Census Bureau website. Use the following strategies to use a database to pose and answer questions about geographic patterns and distributions. l Cumulative Estimates of the Components of Population Change, April 1, 2010, to July 1, 2012							
©Geography	Total Population Change	Natural Increase	Vital Events		Net Migration		
			Births	Deaths	Total	International	Domestic
United States	5,166,532	3,315,603	8,918,468	5,602,865	1,850,929	1,850,929	n/a
Northeast Region	443,846	395,229	1,436,538	1,041,309	60,214	481,109	-420,895
Midwest Region	388,808	573,004	1,875,748	1,302,744	-181,688	237,208	-418,896
South Region	2,700,074	1,224,387	3,387,504	2,163,117	1,457,189	691,462	765,727
West Region	1,633,804	1,122,983	2,218,678	1,095,695	515,214	441,150	74,064
© Source: U.S. Census Bureau, American FactFinder Database
o Choose your topic. Think about specific geographic patterns or distribution information you would like to examine. For instance, you might pose questions about the regional distribution of the U.S. population and how migration and vital events such as births and deaths affect that distribution.
© Identify a database you want to use to find Information. Do research to determine the best database to use
for the topic you are studying. The U.S. Census Bureau is a good resource for data about the population of the
United States. Another database might be a better choice for information about a different topic.
923 SKI
© Identify the headings and entries. Identify the column headings-or categories—and the row headings of the database to learn more about specific data. This database provides information about such categories as total population change, vital events, and net migration.
© Use the database to help you quickly find the information to answer your questions. You might ask, “Which region of the United States experienced the greatest increase in population from April 1,2010, to July 1,2012 due to international migration?”
STRATEGY: WRITE A SUMMARY
Databases can provide an overwhelming amount of information. It may help to summarize the information from the database in a paragraph. The population rates continue to grow steadily in the United States. The birth rate is almost twice the death '• rate. Population increases within the United States reflect both the natural increase due to birth and death	;
rates as well as the effect of international migration. From April 1, 2010, to July 1, 2012, the greatest net	1
increase was seen in the South. In this region, there was almost an even split between natural increase and	net	I
international and domestic migration to the area. The West also had a large increase in population, but the	f
majority was due to a natural increase. The net effect of international and domestic migration was a decrease in ? the Northeast and Midwest during this period. However, the overall population in these regions increased as a result of the birth rate.	‘
APPLYING THE SKILL
Turn to Chapter 27, Section 4, pages 906-909 and read the passage titled "The Debate Over Immigration." Read about the changing demographic patterns resulting from illegal immigration to the United States. Use a database to find out more about the geographic patterns of illegal immigration in the United States over the course of ten years. Then use the information in the database to write a summary of your findings.
1.	Choose your topic.
In this case, your topic is geographic patterns of illegal immigration in the United States over the past decade.
2.	Identify a database you want to use to find information.
Consider what database might be the best choice for your topic. Do you think the U.S. Census Bureau would have the data you need? Why or why not? Research your options.
3.	Identify the headings and entries.
Study the headings and entries to be sure that you understand the information presented in the database. What headings clarify the information in the database you found? What entries exist to help you pose and answer questions about illegal immigration to the United States?
4.	Use the database to help you quickly find the information to answer your questions.
Draft a few questions to help you write a summary that focuses on your topic. Include the answers in your summary.
